 It was the annual Klonvocation, and this year we were in Detroit.
 About 30 groups from all across the country - Klan, Christian Identities, WAR, skins -- were staying at one of the downtown hotels (managed, of course, by a fellow brother in arms), and there were even kindreds from Germany, Serbia and some National Front blokes from Jolly Old England.
 Our Klan was hosting the festivities, and after a full-day of meetings, lectures and classes our guests were ready to unwind.
  I was in charge of the Entertainment Committee, and it was up to me to provide some sport.
 I also had the awesome responsibility of topping last year's festivities down in Georgia.
 The good old boys down there had provided us a real treat, what with the six girls and two bitches they snatched after choir practice at one of the local coon churches.
 The year before that in Philly we had ourselves a salsa feast with some Spic Catholic school cunts the local boys nabbed during a field trip.
 Everyone was counting this year top them both, and I didn't want to let down my brothers and sisters.
 So I got the best brains in our Klan, we put our heads together, and came up with a real gangbuster idea.
 Detroit has a real big Nation of Islam group, and they're always ranting and raving about us blue-eyed devils.
 The Black Muslim women are always acting so uppity, too, and the teenage cunts come off as so pure and virginal.
 They're the pride of the Black race, just like an Aryan chick is the pride of the White race, only the White race is human and the Blacks are .
.
 well .
.
 not so human.
 So we figured if we really wanted to stick it to darky, we'd hit him right where he lives.
 We'd fetch us some pure Black Muslims cunts and turn them into nigger bitch ho-slaves for white cum.
 Before any of you start getting down on us for race mixing and inter-species breeding, let me just tell you what's what here.
 As long as you don't knock-up some black or mud cunt and produce a mongrel mulatto, you can use them for any purpose you choose.
 As subhumans, they belong to the beasts of the field, and God gave Adam and all his white descendents mastery over the beasts of the field in Genesis 1:26-31.
 Check it out for yourselves.
 The Israelites knew this back in Moses' time, too, which is why they always raped and took the Canaanite and mud-breed women slaves after they conquered a tribe of subhuman, dark-skinned beasts.
 That's in Deuteronomy 20-21 if you don't believe me.
 To yoke a nigger bitch to your will is no more a sin than to yoke an ox to a plow or put a bit and saddle on a horse.
 Even impregnating a brood nigger is not a sin if the bastard is treated from the moment of birth as a beast of the field.
 But this is not a Bible lesson, it's a story about what happened at our Klonvocation that magical weekend.
 Well, I took four of my most trustworthy brethren out to catch our prey that afternoon as the rest of the kindred listened to the Word being preached and prayed to God Almighty to deliver our white nation of the Jewish, Black and Mongrel Hordes.
 We also took along two Aryan sisters, Marcia and Wendy, to act as our decoys in the snatch.
 The Black Muslim school was letting out, and a quartet of lovely young sable-skinned bitches walked by themselves from the school, dressed in their flowing white virginal robes.
 Wendy and Marcia followed them closely for several blocks until they were well outside the range of the school or any of their classmates.
 Then as they turned onto a deserted side-street, the sisters pulled up alongside them.
 Wendy rolled down the window and waved a map helplessly.
 Hey, can you girls help us find out where we are.
 We're supposed to be going to Gross Point Park, but I don't think we're in the right area, are we? The Black Muslim girls glanced at each other, shrugged their shoulders and slowly went up to the car.
 As they all crowded around the window to study the map, we pulled behind the sisters' car and parked at an angle so that our side-door was at a 45 degree angle to the back bumper.
 I made one last scan of the surroundings and gave the order.
 The door opened, and my four soldiers stormed out.
 The girls were too shocked to even resist us.
 We had them safely tucked into the van in a matter of seconds.
 We made a U-turn and the sisters continued straight.
 They were to meet us at the hotel later.
 In the van, we quickly gained control of the four Black Muslim bitches.
 Two brothers clamped bits in their mouth while the other two shackled their wrists and ankles.
 Then they ran chains from the clamps on the bitches' bits through slots on their handcuffs to the locks on their foot-cuffs.
 Trussed up in this fetal position, the girls were then stuffed two each into large black trunks.
 When the lids on the trunks slammed shut and the locks snapped closed, I finally breathed a sigh of relief.
 Twenty minutes later, after we drove about making sure we had not been followed, we pulled up back into the hotel lot.
 The sisters' car was already there, and Wendy and Marcia were still inside waiting for us.
 We each confirmed that neither of us had been followed, and we then exited our vehicles, leaving the two trunks inside the sound-proofed vans.
 The Black Muslim cunts could stay on ice for awhile until the evening festivities began.
 No one besides my Entertainment Committee knew what the program for tonight was going to feature.
 I had done this first so it would be a pleasant surprise to the kindred, and secondly so that if we had been caught the rest of our brethren would have plausible deniability.
 Needless to say, the members of my SWAT team were quite pumped when we re-entered the Klonvocation, especially the sisters.
 They kept giggling to themselves all throughout the last lecture on the evils of the Jewish controlled pornography empire.
 The speaker showed us videotaped examples of the bestial couplings encouraged by the Jews, mutant black studs violating Aryan women.
 Judging by the soulless giggles of the white actresses, it was obvious they had been repeatedly drugged and subjected to excessive mind control to insure their eagerness, compliance and servility.
 I felt polluted just by watching the bestial couplings, and I could sense Satan fighting for my soul as my Aryan manhood began to flex its muscle at the stimulation.
 Only by facing such an abomination head-on, however, can we truly defeat it.
 As we watched the video montage, the pastor from Alabama led us all in prayer.
 Knowing that the seed being conjured in my loins had sprung from the impure influence of Satan, I withdrew my erection and offered it to the young Aryan maiden sitting next to me for proper cleansing.
 She appeared to be 13 or 14 years old, and was one of the fifteen Aryan teens whose enlightened parents had brought them to the Klonvocation.
 The pastor's lectures on the evils of Jewish pornography was, perhaps, even more crucial to the upbringing of our teenagers, our future.
 My white heart went out to the maiden as I watched her squirming in her seat, her eyes glued in horrified silence at the bestial images assaulting her pure-bred maidenhood.
 Yes, it was important we both undergo the proper cleansing.
 I motioned to her, and we both turned to look at her parents.
 Her father, a stern, Pacific Northwesterner from the Christian Identity delegation, nodded with a grim smile.
 She turned back to me, and I pointed to the rigid Aryan manhood she had grasped in her thin, snow-white hand.
  She licked her lips slightly and began to perform the cleansing ritual, pumping my stiffness eagerly with her inexperienced maiden hand.
 I patted her on the head and pointed to her own crotch area.
 She would need to be cleansed, too.
 She nodded obediently and opened her jeans, offering her own polluted nether regions to be expunged of the foul Satanic spirit nestling their.
 As she tugged the Satanic demon from my Aryan pride, I rubbed the lust demon from the folds of her Nordic womb.
 Elsewhere in the room, other brothers and sisters were busy cleansing themselves of the Devil's influence.
 In a few moments, we were all purified, although some of us needed several such ceremonies in order to wash fully the sin from our loins.
 At the pastor's conclusion, we all broke for dinner.
 Many asked me to tell them what the Entertainment Committee had in store for them this evening.
 Judging by our restlessness and the palpable giddiness of sisters Marcia and Wendy, the kindred knew it was something grand.
 Anticipation reverberated throughout the banquet hall as we broke bread, but my team remained true to their vow of secrecy.
 Finally, after dinner, the time for the entertainment had begun.
 My team of four went out to the van and withdrew the trunks, bringing them into the banquet hall.
 The hotel manager made sure all the doors and exits were secured from the inside.
 Only he had the master key, which would allow entrance from the outside of the hall.
 We were assured utter privacy for our glorious celebration.
 I approached the front of the room and stood at the lectern.
   Now for tonight's festivities, I announced, and the room burst into applause.
 I hope no one minds, but for posterity I have decided to videotape tonight's proceedings so that future generations of brethren and sisters can witness the historic events which will happen here tonight.
 I motioned to the team of two kindred cameramen I'd enlisted for the evening.
 They came before the crowd and did a panoramic sweep of the banquet hall before moving off into separate directions.
 My instructions to them had been simple - Get Everything? I wanted every nuance, every expression, every word, every glorious victory captured for all time.
 Tonight's proceedings would not only be an entertainment extravaganza, but it would also usher in a new era in God's Kingdom.
 Tonight I was going to recapture the birthright of God's Chosen; I was going to restore God's Rightful and Eternal Law; I was going to take the first step in making this nation and the White Race supreme once again.
 For our pleasure tonight we have brought along some guests, I continued, motioning to my team to open the trunks.
 The cameramen zoomed in on the scene, and in seconds the lids had been thrown wide.
 Within an instant, the terrified, trussed-up Black Muslim girls were hauled into the white light of Aryan truth and justice.
 Their eyes fluttered and teared over with the sudden brightness, and they shivered in sheer terror.
 My team unlatched the chains at their ankles and let out the length.
 They stood the girls up, and then refastened the chains through the foot cuffs.
  They now stood helpless before the assembled kindred, their mouths gagged with bits, their wrists and ankles cuffed together and long chains extending from their mouths to their feet.
 If they even tried to move, they lost their balance and wobbled.
 Each bitch had an attendant to keep them steady.
 We didn't need our prize beasts damaged or bruised in any way before the auction.
 These four beautiful Nubian she-beasts hale from this city's Nation of Islam school, the Oasis Academy.
 Look at their fine, black skin, I rubbed the dark cheeks of the nearest teen negress.
 She looked to be about twelve or thirteen.
 She was tall and slender with an angular neck.
 Her body reminded me of a fair black swan's, while her features were classic African native - tight kinky black curls, large eyes, wide nose and full jungle lips.
 Her name is Kimba the Fuck Beast, I announced.
, slapping her haunches and feeling her up through the white Muslim gown.
 These long, slender, gazelle-legs will wrap very nicely around a thrusting Aryan body, and despite her delicate appearance, I assure you, like all onyx-skinned fuck beasts she has been bred to be genetically disposed to taking great amounts of punishment.
 I yanked her by the bit to bring her head down to her knees, then I tugged out so she continued facing the crowd as I spoke.
 This ass will break in quite pleasurably, too, I added.
 As you can see, she has been raised to imitate all the proper social airs of human beings.
 Look at her posture and upturned nose.
 She has believed in the lies of Black Racial Pride that have been drummed into her since childhood.
 She will be a willful Fuck Beast at first, and a challenge to break, but think of the final result, when she is supplicated and plaint to your every whim.
 I slapped her thin black ass again with a resounding thwack.
 She requires a truly dedicated Master, one who will be both patient and stern, a Master dedicated to stripping of her false Pride and instilling within her the Eternal Truth that White is Right.
 To the Master who can do this, she will present a pet of unequalled docility and breeding.
 I yanked her head back up and tore away the front of her white robe.
 Her A-cup sized tits lay nestled beneath a plain beige bra which I summarily tore in two at the point where the two cups joined.
 Her obsidian egg-sized boobies wobbled free, the soft black skin ending in twin nipple points the size of pencil erasers.
 Granted, she does not have the mammoth mammary glands born by some of her breed, but they are pleasant nonetheless.
 See how they obediently conform to the shape of a suckling mouth, I spoke as I popped one and then the other out of my mouth.
 They glistened now with my spit and I tweaked her nipple nubs until they became even harder.
 Like all Fuck Beasts, her nipples are charged and highly responsive to stimulus.
 Even as she is being humiliated and degraded, they stand poised and erect in willingness.
 And look at this flat tummy, I continued, tearing down the white gown to reveal a flat, washboard belly and the slender curve of her gazelle hips.
 You could bounce quarters off this belly, or use it as a coffee table.
 She is truly an exquisite example of the Nubian beast.
 I stepped away from her and went to the next bitch in line.
 This Black Muslim cunt was just the opposite from her first companion.
 She appeared to be about sixteen or so, and she was caramel-skinned, short, busty and sported a large, protruding, negroid butt.
 Her face had more rounded features and a smaller, pointed nose, and her hair was much straighter and more manageable than Kimba's.
 These factors revealed to any intelligent observer that she had some white blood in her mongrel heritage.
 If you're looking for a big-titted cum cow, you've come to the right place tonight.
 Look at the udders on this caramel-skinned heifer.
 I went right to shredding the front of her white robe, and then tearing her huge, floppy brown breasts from the stretched-out DD cups of her pink bra.
 Her pendulous titties shimmied like butterscotch jello pudding, and her aureoles were the size of silver dollar pancakes.
 With a sturdy frame like this, you know she is built to be a real workhorse in the bedroom.
 To emphasize my point I slapped her tits hard, one at a time, and she winced but did not squeal.
 Then I squeezed them until they were as dark as plums and slapped them again.
 Again she winced and squealed somewhat, but did not howl like many other black bitches would have.
 Look at her pain tolerance.
 You give this bitch thirty lashes and she'd probably ride it out like nothing.
 Yes, her name is Lizzie, the Cum Cow for good reason.
 She needs a real Aryan to be her Master, one who will spare her no punishment, no matter how harsh.
 Her ample charms and resilience would be wasted on a lesser man.
 She begs to be ridden long and hard and often.
 Anything less, and she will become fat and lazy and good for no one.
 She will require a steady diet of white cum, and a Master who will never tire of taking care of her demanding needs.
 I tugged her head down so that she was in the same bent position as Kimba the Fuck Beast had been in.
  Then I whirled her around so her black bubble butt was facing the assembly.
 I ripped away at the back of her white gown until her bare, caramel-skinned ass burst free.
 Take a good look at that big, black ass.
 You'd better have a hundred plus lashes in you twice a day if you want to discipline her.
 Otherwise forget it.
 I slapped her hard to prove my point, and she barely whimpered.
 As for sodomizing this cow, you'd better get out a coke bottle if you want her to feel anything under all this padding.
 I pried open her asshole then to show its gaping circumference.
 She can probably shit a bowling ball out of here and not even blink, so those of you with a .
.
 smaller stature may want to pass this one by.
 I licked my fingers and stuffed almost my whole hand up her dry, unprepared asshole to prove my point.
 She groaned, but barely squirmed.
 She really was a fucking cum cow.
 I moved to the next cowering Black Muslim girl.
 She could have been no more than eleven and had a medium-well-done complexion all over her tiny, petite, compact body.
 Below her short, flat, artificially straightened hair, sharp, almost Oriental features made her resemble a frightened Siamese cat.
 This here is Tabitha, the Cock Kitten, I told the audience.
 Look how small and frightened she is.
 She is actually up here quivering and shivering.
 Look, she's crying now.
 She's scared as hell of all us blue-eyed devils, aren't you, Tabby? I yanked her by the bit and made her nod her head up and down while the assembly laughed.
 Breaking this little kitty will be sheer heaven for the lucky Master who gets her.
 Imagine how she'll feel completely at your mercy, as the invincible power of your white manhood subdues her quaking dark form and forces her to accept her status as your inferior, sub-human Cock Kitten.
 Look at this face and imagine what it would look like stuffed with a huge white cock, choke fucking her pathetic whimpering throat until your thick, Aryan baby butter comes burping out of her cute, little elfin ears.
 Imagine how that tiny, bawling throat will sound gasping for air and mercy as you rape her skull so savagely her big white eyeballs pop out of her skull.
 And get a load of these adorable little cock-kitten tits, I boomed, tearing at her robe and pulling down her white lacy bra so that her firm B-cup boobies bobbled free.
 And then there's her cunt, I went even further, moving the gown down her elfin frame.
 I tugged her by the bit and she leaned over just like the first two Black Muslim bitches.
 Then, like Lizzie the Cum Cow, I turned her around so that her soft, round, milk-chocolate ass faced the crowd.
 Then, I parted her black velvet ass-cheeks and exposed her glistening pink cunny and tiny brown poop hole to the appreciative kindred.
 Whereas there is a good chance all these bitches will be virgins, this one's cherry will be an absolute dream to shred.
 You know she'll scream and howl and tell you you're too big and you're killing her no matter what size you may be.
  She'll take it, though, no matter how much you give her because she's a nigger beast bitch.
 Don't let her small size fool you, or make you take it easier on her.
 Even though it seems like you might snap her in two at any moment, she needs and craves a good brutal fuck just like all nigger ho's.
 Her Master has to have no pity in his heart if he's going to keep her in line.
 Finally I moved over to the last girl in line.
 She combined all of the traits of the three previous girls into one prize, pure-bred package.
 She was taller than Tabby and Lizzie, but an inch or so shorter than Kimba.
 Her body was curvy and succulent, and although her tits were nowhere near the size of Lizzie's, they were proportionally perfect C cups.
 Her skin was about a shade lighter than Tabby's, but without the bleached mulatto taint of Lizzie's.
 Her face was definitely African - flat nose with flaring nostrils - but softer and cuter than Kimba's, more distinct and chisled than Lizzie's, and not as catlike as Tabitha's.
 Her hair was fluffed and curled, making a nice luxurious handful for her Master to grasp.
 As for her ass, it was full in the best sense of her Negroid heritage, plump and juicy but not fat like Lizzie's.
 She reminded me of one of the juicy jungle bitches you see in black music groups or on TV shows, she was that striking.
 Meet Rape Raven, I announced.
 This bitch is, perhaps, the finest beast of all.
 Someone give me a steak knife, I called to the crowd, and seconds later I had a sharp knife in my grasp.
 Just look at the sleek contours on this beauty, I gasped as I began slicing off her gown in tiny pieces, revealing more and more of her chocolate flesh as she did her best to keep her composure and balance.
 This bitch's Master will be the envy of every other Aryan slaveholder he knows.
 Breed this beast, and you can produce a whole litter of prize puppies.
 Think of the money you can make leasing her out to other Masters and breeders.
 Or, how about a throwing a gangbang party and charging eager Aryans $500 for a shot at her.
 I continued slicing her white gown to ribbons as I spoke.
 Just look at this body, and you know she'll ride like a dream, not just the first time, but the tenth time, the hundredth time, the thousandth time.
 And just look at the superb features here -- her mouth, I grabbed her mouth and squeezed her full lips together, tits, I sliced open her bra and mauled her tits before the crowd, pussy, the knife slit her panties and I yanked them down, and asshole, I spun her around, yanked her into a bent-over position and smacked her ass with a resounding thwack.
 It's like having Brandy or Little Kim or Tyra Banks, only she's better because she'll be your slave … forever! Rape Raven glared at me, and snorted in defiance.
 Amused, I slid the bit out of her mouth.
 Now what was that, Rape Raven? I asked.
 You blue-eyed devils are all going to fry when they find you.
 Minister Farrakhan will make sure of that.
 If your own courts don't crucify you, the Fruit of Islam will hunt you down to the ends of the earth and skin your white hides! Jesus, sister Wendy stood up and screeched.
 I want to see one of you Aryan studs fuck that uppity nigger bitch til the snot runs out of her jungle bunny ears! You will burn in hell, white she-devil … Rape Raven spit at sister Wendy before I jammed the bit back into her mouth.
 By Yahweh, I'll bid $1,000 for that no-good nigger cunt, one of the elderly Christian Identity brethren from Idaho roared.
 $2,000, a skinhead raised the bid.
 I'm sorry, gentlemen, I smiled.
 A bitch the stature of Rape Raven must wait until the final round of the auction.
 We will begin with Kimba the Fuck Beast.
 First, however, I think it's only fair that we consider everything these jungle bitches have to offer the prospective Master.
 We've seen their bodies, now let's take a look inside their bestial nigger brains.
 I motioned one of my team to remove the bit in Kimba the Fuck Beast's mouth.
 We will begin with Kimba here, our snooty little dark-skinned Fuck Beast.
 Look at the posture, brethren and sisters.
 Look at what the niggers have done here.
 They've bred her to be the perfect little Nubian princess.
 They've given her airs and poise and made her all prim and proper, just like she's a real human being instead of a sub-human Fuck Beast.
 This is an insult to the White Race, kindred! She mocks everything in God's created order with her uppity Black Pride attitude.
 She thinks she's the equal .
.
 no the superior of us savage white devils, don't you, Kimba? My name is not Kimba! she snarled at me.
 My name is Latisha, you blue-eyed devils, she shouted to the audience.
 Latisha! Do you hear me? The assembly broke into a raucous fit of knee-slapping laughter.
 Sure your name ain't Kunte Kinte? one of the good old boys shot back.
 How's 'bout CUNTe CUNTay? his buddy added.
 Maybe your name is CUNTe CUNTay, huh, cunt? The banquet hall erupted in laughter again.
 My name is Latisha, she shouted hyterically over the guffaws.
 I motioned to one of my team, and he handed me a pair of tin-snips.
 I silently walked up to the shaking Fuck Beast and closed the sharp blades on her right ear lobe.
 Now what's your name, Fuck Beast? I spoke coldly and evenly into her ear.
 The crowd went silent, waiting for her reply.
 A tear came to her eye as she felt the cold steel of the tin snips against her soft black flesh.
 M.
.
 my name .
.
 she stammered, … is .
.
 Latisha! she suddenly spat.
 Bonk! I imitated a buzzer on a game show.
 I'm sorry.
 The correct answer is Kimba the Fuck Beast.
 I clamped the snips down into her soft, black earlobe and squeezed.
 Ahhhhhh! her scream made my Aryan dick snap like a ratchet in my shorts.
 The Fuck Beast was learning now, learning her place in the universe, the White Universe! She would grovel like all beasts of the field groveled when they faced the White Light of the Law, the Lord's Eternal Truth.
 I held the bloody shard of nigger flesh out to the crowd for their approval.
 They burst into a round of feverish whoops and hollers.
 I jabbed what used to be her earlobe back into the Fuck Beast's face, tracing the bloody lump across her thick jungle bunny lips, then holding it before her eyes so she could see the evidence of her subhuman status.
 That is your earmark, beast.
 Aryan's mark all their livestock in accordance with the Laws of God.
 This shows all that you are a subhuman beast of the field, and the property of God's True Children.
 Your Master will brand you, of course, with the particular sign of his Klan.
 But from this day forward, wherever you go, your earmark will be a sign of your identity and your place.
 Now tell me again, I pressed, what is your name? L … she began.
 I clamped the tin-snips around her flared nigger nostril now.
 K.
.
 Kimba, she blubbered.
 Kimba.
 Kimba what? I twisted her nigger nostril and screwed up her face up so she was staring into my eyes.
 She paused, and I twisted some more, threatening to tear half her nose off.
 She closed her bulging, bleary, cue-ball eyes and gasped, Kimba .
.
 the Fuck Beast! The kindred rose to their feet in a standing ovation.
 Most had only read about the Process, the means by which black beasts are broken and stripped of their identity and sense of individual will.
 But now, at this year's Klonvocation, they were witnessing and experiencing the inspiring ceremony live, just as their white ancestors had done in the slave markets hundreds of years ago.
 Even I was caught up the electricity of the moment.
 The Lord's presence was truly in the room this evening, smiling down on His Children, pleased at Their work, glorified that His Will was once more being done in His Chosen Land … America, the home of the new and renewed Adamic Kingdom.
 I released the tin-snips from her nose and petted her kinky scalp.
 That's good, Kimba.
 That's a good Fuck Beast.
 I pulled her to her feet, and snapped the chain so that she stood straight and at attention.
 Her breeding took over, and she assumed her perfect posture once again, only this time most of the fire was gone from her eyes.
 Although she had taken the first step towards assuming her rightful place in God's universe, I still detected a glint of residual Black Pride behind her cowed attitude.
 Taking the name was only the first step in the breaking Process, and we weren't finished yet … not by a longshot.
  Kimba, I spoke to her softly, we are now going to begin the auction.
 But before we do that, I need you to answer some questions for the assembly.
 You can think of it like the question and answer round in the Miss America pageant.
 I will ask you questions, and you will answer me.
 Failure to answer … I extended my arm and one of my team handed me a bullwhip, … and it's whippin' time.
 Do you understand me, Fuck Beast! I cracked the whip across her flat tummy, and she teetered where she stood before one of my team steadied her back into place.
 Do you! The fire returned to her eyes now.
 The first lash always does this.
 Even the cowed beast will react in blind rage to being so harshly disciplined.
 That is why it is so important to administer a thorough whipping, especially with nigger Fuck Beasts.
 Like all domesticated beasts of burden, they have been bred to take excessive amounts of physical pain and torture.
 Although they are loathe to admit it, they even enjoy it at first.
 Despite her overt rage and defiance, I could smell the stark, musty odor of her natural animal instincts waft up from her dampening pussy.
 She could make a show of resistance, but her body would react like the body of any nigger Fuck Beast.
  Abuse stimulates the jungle fever in the negress's hot black cunt , and although she may howl with apparent anguish, internally the torture would fulfill what all nigger Fuck Beasts crave to make them complete.
 To serve their Aryan Masters as mindless brood mares.
  The trick, then, was to steadily and completely obliterate the years of false conditioning perpetrated by ZOG-sponsored mind control.
 The beast must be made to forsake and forget the Lies forced upon her subhuman intelligence by the combined terrorist forces of the mass media and the so-called public education system.
 A Fuck Beast like Kimba may take her new, God-given name, but she will be a slave in name only.
 The spark of who she once thought she was would still burn deep inside her, and that was what the Process was designed to extinguish forever.
 Like I said, we weren't done with the Process yet, not by a longshot.
  Go to hell, white devil, she spat at me like a rabid beast, the glob landing on my cheek.
 The first lash of the whip had renewed her stiff-necked wilfullness.
 She was ready for round two now.
 Great, I chuckled.
 I was hoping you'd be a dumb jungle cunt.
 I haven't horsewhipped me a nigger Fuck Beast in a long while.
 Although the bit had been taken from her mouth, the leash still remained around her neck, and I yanked the chain down until she was bent over, her slender black ass sticking in the air.
 Fucking nigger Fuck Beast ho', you will learn your place before your Aryan Masters! I hissed as the first blow crack-slashed across her chocolate haunches.
 Arrhhh …! she howled and squirmed about in her confinement, frothing at the mouth like the beast she was.
 Damn you … she managed to curse before a second, even harder blow devastated her backside.
 She tried to crumble to the floor, but I held her up by her leash and uncorked three more blows, each lash successively more severe than the one prior.
 Her black skin was now striped with welts.
 I motioned to a Klansman in the audience and he handed a shaker of salt from one of the tables.
 I lightly sprinkled the grains up and down the Fuck Beast's back as she squirmed in agony.
 Finally the burning overloaded her nerve endings and she went totally slack.
 An instant later, a puddle formed on the crotch of her white gown as her black cunt helplessly released a flood of hot, nigger piss.
 Please, she sobbed, mortified at the realization she had just soiled herself like an animal in front of a crowd of sadistic white devils.
 Please .
.
 stop .
.
 hurting me, she barely managed to gasp through the tears.
 Am I hearing you correctly? I mocked her.
 Are you asking your Master for mercy.
 Is that it, you tar-skinned Fuck Beast.
 Is Kimba asking her Master for mercy? I cracked another blow across her magnificent back and ass-cheeks, and her knees wobbled and buckled again.
 Stop .
.
 please, she looked up at me with a tear-stained face, the defiance gone from her voice, the uppity Black Pride bullwhipped out of her stuck-up nigger ass.
 Ask me for mercy, Fuck Beast! Mercy, please .
.
 she bawled.
 Please, what? I pressed.
 She looked up at me with confused eyes, and I yanked her leash so that the collar tightened around her slender, swan-like neck.
 How do you address me? I prompted her.
 I don't … another yank of the chain cut her off, and as she fought for oxygen I could see her ignorant little jungle-bunny brain trying desperately to think.
 How do you address me? I repeated.
 Master … she coughed through her strangulation.
 Master? I laughed.
 Since when does a savage Fuck Beast speak all proper like a civilized human being? Now how do you address me? I pressed, tightening the strangle hold on her neck.
 Think of what your great-great-grandmammy called her Aryan Lord as he whupped her fat, black, slave ass! I don't … she gasped, fighting for air, her cue-ball eyes bugging out as she rattled her brain helplessly for the answer that would save her life.
 Then the Light came to her eyes in a sudden flash, and she screeched as loud as she could.
 Massah! Mercy, Massah, she wept as I let the pressure around her slender neck go slack.
  Will you answer the questions now? I asked.
 Yes .
.
 please, she gasped, sucking in oxygen with a crazed look in here eyes.
 Yes, what? I snapped the chain again, and the collar went rigid, choking off her windpipe yet again.
 Yes, Massah, she barely managed to cough as her cue-ball eyes bugged out again.
  I let the chain go slack, and she sucked in air.
 Again! I jerked the chain, and cut off her breathing.
 Yes, Massah! she sobbed.
 That's good, I let the chain go limp and petted her kinky scalp again.
 You see, Kimba.
 That's all you need to do.
 Just obey.
 That isn't so hard, is it? She nodded, the tears still streaming down her shiny black cheeks.
 Is it? I yanked her head up by her tight kinky curls, and she winced.
 No, Massah, she corrected herself.
  Good girl, I stopped tugging her kinky hair and went back to petting her scalp.
 My Kimba's a good little nigger Fuck Beast, isn't she? Yes, Massah, she fought to get out the words, then sighed heavily.
 Her previous lifetime of mind control conditioning had made this simple, soul-saving phrase the ultimate taboo, but every time she spoke the words now it was like more and more weight was being lifted from her twelve-year-old shoulders.
 She was, in fact, allowing herself to get back to her roots, to discover the true God-ordained identity that the ZOG-controlled mass-brainwashing had denied her.
  You see, instinctively your subhuman negro beasts know they are not meant to exist on an equal plain with real human beings.
 But the mind control terrorism of ZOG-sponsored mass media and so-called public education has forced the black beast to become separated from this Eternal Truth.
 This is why there is a crack epidemic in our inner cities, and why nigger gangstahs are killing themselves on our streets every day.
 Nigger beasts need their Masters, just like cows and sheep and other livestock.
 Without their Masters they cannot survive on their own, just cows and sheep would soon become extinct if they were left to fend for themselves in the wild.
 To be quite honest, in this regard the Aryan race has let down the nigger.
 The Lord gave us stewardship over all the beasts of the field, but we have disregarded this edict as it bears upon the nigger animal.
 The Aryan has allowed himself to be duped by the ZOG-sponsored mass media and so-called public education system, and he has turned his back on God's word.
 The nigger beast needs us to exercise our rightful dominance once more to set the Law of God above man's false laws.
 This is why the Process is actually a deliverance for nigger Fuck Beasts like young Kimba.
 Once they are broken, all their problems cease to exist.
 They no longer have to pretend to be human.
 They no longer have to tax their feeble pea-sized brains in a futile attempt to be equal with beings who are their Chosen Superiors.
 With each Massah she gasps, our little Kimba is exorcising herself of the demon of so-called racial equality that has been possessing her entire short life.
 This is why we must insist the nigger beast call us Massah.
 It is for their own good.
 So you are ready to answer some questions, then? I repeated.
 Yes, Massah, she repeated, the words escaping more easily from her mouth.
 I detected her wincing when she realized what she'd said without thinking.
 Yes, her natural instincts were fighting the years of brainwashing, but the Process had not been completed yet.
 I patted her gently on the head and petted her kinky scalp to reinforce the positive steps she'd taken in her behavior, and despite her conditioning she unconsciously flashed a cute, pickaninny smile.
 Okay, here's question number one, I explained slowly so her ignorant brain could understand.
 What color is God? She looked up at me, tears welling in her eyes again.
 All that she had been taught in her Black Muslim schools came back to haunt her now.
 Her first impulse was to say Black, just like Minister Farrakhan taught, but she was now beginning to see the Truth.
 I don't know, she finally blubbered.
 I don't know what color God is.
 But what did they teach you in Black Muslim school? I pressed.
 What color did they say God was? Black, she blurted without thinking.
 Please don't whip me, Massah, she suddenly added by reflex.
 Please, Massah, she cried.
 I'm not going to whip you, Kimba, I stroked her kinky black scalp and she seemed to relax.
 You just answered my questioned.
 You see, as long as you do what I tell you, I won't have to whip you.
 Do you see that, Kimba? Do you? Yes, Massah, she whispered and flashed another unconscious pickaninny smile.
 Awwww … the crowd sighed affectionately.
 How sweet, a Klanswoman chimed in.
 She really does seem like a nice little nigger girl.
 She just needs some discipline that's all.
 I had a dog like that once, a Christian Identity woman added.
 Used to chew up everything.
 She just needed a firm hand, some good old-fashioned tough love, and she turned out to be a real nice doggie.
 She sure is cute when she ain't acting all uppity, a redneck added.
 She'd make a good little fuck beast, she would.
 See, Kimba, I kept petting her and she smiled some more.
 We don't want to hurt you, we just want to help you.
 Do you see that now? Yes, Massah, she smiled, and the crowd went awww again.
 Now let's get back to question one, okay? Yes, Massah.
 What color is God? White? she asked.
 Are you asking me or telling me, I quit petting her kinky scalp and let some anger seep into my voice.
 White, she reaffirmed positively.
 God is white.
 Good, I stroked her again.
 Now here's question number two, and remember be truthful.
 Who is superior, the white man or the black man? I .
.
 again her mind was fighting between her previous conditioning and the new revelation of Truth I'd reawakened inside her.
 It was the classic struggle between nature and nurture.
 This was what made the Process so invogorating.
 Answer the question, Kimba, I yanked her chain.
 Honestly.
 Th .
.
 I was taught .
.
 they always said … What? I pressed.
 What did the Nation of Islam teach you? They taught us that we were superior to you, she sobbed.
 That the Black Man was the original man and that the white man was an inferior genetic mutation created by an evil scientist named Yakub.
 They taught us that this inferior mutation mated with animals and that's how we got blue-eyed devils.
 And who are the blue-eyed devils, Kimba? I asked.
 I .
.
 I can't …  You have to answer the question, Kimba, I repeated.
 Now what did the Nation of Islam teach you? They told us you were the blue-eyed devils, she blurted.
 White people.
 They taught us you were inferior.
 That's fucking bullshit! one of the skinheads shouted out.
 White Power! he bellowed, stomping the floor.
 White Power! he repeated over and over again as the crowd joined him in the chant.
 Kimba burst out crying now, burying her face in shame on the floor.
 I'm sorry, Massah, she bawled.
 Please forgive me for saying that.
 That's what they taught us.
 You wanted me to tell you the truth, Massah.
 Please don' hurt me, Massah.
 I do anything fo' ya', Massah.
 Jus' p'ease don' whup me no mo'.
 The artificial poise and affectations slowly drained from her voice as she spoke, and her natural, instinctual, speech patterns took over.
 I'll spare you a whipping if you just answer the question, Kimba, I yanked her chain so she would quit blubbering.
 Who is superior, the Black Man or the White Man? You is, she slobbered, bending her neck down so she could lick my boots.
 I was surprised at her actions, but I accepted her impromptu display of utter subjugation.
 I lifted my boot up so I could give her the privilege of cleaning off the mud caked between the sole and the heel.
 The White Man is soo-perior, she droned as cleaned the bottom of my boots.
 And what are you? I asked.
 I's nuttin' but a niggah, ho' fuck beast, she smiled as she spoke, looking up to me for approval.
 I patted her on the head and then beckoned her to return to licking my boots.
 And what do you want? I asked.
 A Massah, she answered between licks.
 I's needs me a Massah.
 And what kind of Massah do you need, Kimba? Kimba needs her a White Massah who let me suhve him good.
 And how would you serve him? Kimba suhve her Massah real good, you see, she smiled.
 Will you suck your Master's cock? I asked.
 Kimba suck her Master's white cock real good.
 Kimba let her Massah do whatsever he wantsa to her.
 Are you a virgin, Kimba? Kimba be a virgin, yessur', she beamed up proudly.
 Kimba be a virgin fuck beast fo' her Massah.
 And what about your asshole? Kimba give her asshole to her Massah to fuck.
 Kimba do any'fing fo' her Massah.
 You see.
 Kimba might not know so much about fucking, but Kimba learn.
 Kimba let her Massah teach her real good.
 You see.
 The Process had broken her.
 So, what do I hear for this slender, temptuous negress fuck beast? I suddenly kicked into auctioneer mode.
 Come on.
 Don't be shy.
 Look at her and imagine what it will like throttling her and molding her beneath your will.
 What do I hear for Kimba the Fuck Beast? $500 of your American dollars, one of the Serbian skins belted out, waving a fistful of cash about.
 She would make quite a prize to take home.
 His comrades burst out in laughter.
 There was whispering in the crowd.
 $600, a skinny, southern Klansman hissed through his missing teeth.
 $700, the Serbian retorted.
 The Klansman's wife punched her husband's arm and pointed to Kimba.
 I want me that nigger girl, Cletus.
 $800! the Cletus the Klansman sneered.
 $1000 American dollars, the Serbian bellowed.
 She's all yours, the Klansman waved him off amid his wife's protests.
 You shut the fuck up, he growled as he smacked his woman across the face, cowing her immediately.
 That's $1000 going once .
.
 twice … I paused again.
 Sold! I yanked Kimba the Fuck Beast's bit and she stumbled forward.
 She teetered, lost her balance, and fell into the Serb's arms.
 He howled with laughter and mauled her.
 Key please, he pointed to the locks on her shackles.
 We wish to enjoy her black flesh now.
 She's your property, I tossed him the keys.
 Do what you want.
 Just clean up the mess when you're done, okay? Sure thing, pal, he smirked, slipping the keys in each of the locks and unshackling the tall, slender fuck beast.
 His comrades had joined him in a circle around her broken swan-like form.
 She tried to snuggle up to the Serb and be a good nigger slave, but her pathetic attempt just elicited more laughter from the Serbs as they manhandled her skinny body, forcing her to her knees.
  Please, Massah, she bawled.
 I's be good.
 I's take care a ya'.
 Shut your mouth, you little black beast, the Serb spit in her eye.
 We're trying to have us some fun here.
 Why's ya wanna hurts me, Massah? she bawled.
 I's be good.
 I's do whatsever my Massah wants me to.
 He said to quit your fucking gibbering, you baboon, another Sebian skin snarled, grabbing her hair and smashing her face against his bulging white crotch.
 You will suck this now, black bitch! Yes, Massah, she continued blubbering, not understanding why her new Masters were hurting her so much when she was obeying them.
 This would be a very important, pivotal lesson in her resurrection.
 It was crucial that she learn her utter worthlessness.
 She had to realize that her body was totally at her Master's whim.
 That he could punish her and abuse with impunity no matter what she said or how obedient she was.
 She had to learn to take her Master's attentions, ALL his attentions, with gratitude.
 This would be a supreme test, to see if the Process had truly taken, or whether she would need further lessons at the hands of her new Masters.
 Suck my white cock, you black beast, the Serbian at her face commanded.
 He had his stiff seven-inch prick jammed into her gasping mouth now, as his buddies whipped down their zippers and produced their own Serbian fuck rifles.
 Everyone at the Klonvocation had heard legends of the brutality of these stiff-cocked Sons of Adam could inflict, and it was certainly a rare honor to see them perform a live gangrape.
 I felt doubly blessed that the whole evening's festivities were being immortalized on videotape for future generations to admire.
 The Serbs moved like a well-oiled military unit.
 It was obvious they had gangraped their fair share of subhuman beasts.
 A nigger fuck slave is different than a Bosnian mutt-breed, however.
 She is tougher, more resilient, and needs a more inhuman touch if one is to get down and rape her very soul.
 They had a good start, though.
 All the Serbs had her kneeling face surrounded, and they were brutally passing her mouth from one cock to another like a game of hot potato - grasping her by her kinky curls, forcing her mouth down around their warheads, jabbing their thin white prick-spears deep into her windpipe, the jackhammering her throat wildly until one of their comrades grabbed her kinky curls and reprised the same violation all over again.
 Tears and pre-cum and blood made her savage face as black and slick as pure obsidian.
 Two Serbs lifted her up by her legs and she hung suspended amid the group like a gazelle on a spit.
 The Serb who'd shelled out the dough for her now poised his eight-inch truncheon up against the moist petals of her virgin cunt lips and skewered his entire length up her nigger fuck hole in one brutal, decisive stroke.
 She squeaked and squealed like a fuck beast being slaughtered and eaten alive by a pack of ravenous white tigers.
 The Serb in her black hole withdrew after a barrage of ruthless thrusts and displayed his blood-covered Aryan manhood for all the kindred to see.
 And there was great rejoicing, as the hall burst into a resounding chant of White Power! Another Serb now slammed into her ravaged twat as the rest of the crew continued to pass her mouth between their pricks like a beer bong at a frat party.
 Despite the fact that they were fucking the very air out of her twelve-year-old lungs, and their cocks were causing internal bleeding up her hot black cunt canal, Kimba the Fuck Beast rode their gangrape hurricane with incredible stamina.
 Like all nigger Fuck Beasts, she was genetically predisposed to withstand and even thrive on such abuse.
 She didn't even flinch now as she was turned over, bent like a hairpin and then lowered to the floor in the pile-driver position.
 Immediately, with the crowd cheering them on, two Serbs drilled their cocks into her shrieking mouth, a third and forth bent down to her chest and began biting at her egg-sized tits, while a fifth man straddled her legs and hips and plowed into her cunt, and the Serb's leader impaled her dry, unprepared asshole with a soul-shattering thrust of his eight-inch rape-saber.
 I motioned to one of the cameramen to leave the action and pan the transfixed crowd, finally ending his sweep on the utterly horrified and devastated faces of the three other Black Muslim girls.
 After twenty further minutes of solid, unabated fury, in which the Serbs continued changing positions and entry points like dancers in a carnal ballet, they finally dragged the rag-doll fuck beast back to a kneeling position so they could fire a massive fusillade of cum all over her catatonic face.
 The hot white spunk spurted out her nose and even from her eyelids as they unloaded blast after blast into her gaping, slack-jawed mouth.
 Unconscious now, she drowned in the deluge of Aryan seed, choking and gasping her last pathetic breath as the Serb leader choke fucked the remaining life from her once proud, Nubian carcass.
 The room now basked in the stony, awed silence of worshippers suddenly touched and transfigured by the Presence of the Lord.
 Jesus tits, Cletus the Klansman's wife gasped under her breath.
 They raped that little pickaninny fuck beast to death.
 One of the English skins started clapping slowly for his brothers in arms.
 He was joined by another set of hands, until the whole room erupted in a deafening applause.
 The Serbs dragged Kimba's life-spent body over to the Brit Bad Boys and offered the necrophilic spoils.
 The crowd watched as the Brits whipped out their beefy breakfast sausages and indulged in a little rigor-rape-amortis.
 This wholly unexpected teat made me glad once again I was capturing all this on film.
 After the Brits had sated themselves completely on the cold, jaundiced carcass, all eyes returned to the auction block where I had already begun to parade the next bit of livestock.
 Lizzie the Cum Cow.
 I slipped out the bit from Lizzie's mouth, and the puke started streaming out of the corners of her mouth.
 I quickly unzipped my fly, whipped out my hard nine-inch cock, knelt down to the floor, dipped my prick-head in the puddle of retch, stood up, and then rubbed my vomit-smeared manhood all over the mulatto Cum Cow's twitching face.
 I admired my handiwork for a moment before stepping back so all in the hall could gaze upon her quivering, quaking, hysterical form.
 And how are you doing, Cum Cow? I asked with a jocular lilt to my voice.
 Between the spewing and the sobbing, she couldn't speak.
 She just knelt there blubbering while the crowd hurled the scraps from their dinner plates at her.
 Somebody started a chorus of mooing, and pretty soon everyone had joined in the mocking tribute to Lizzie the Cum Cow.
 I finally yanked her leash and choked her into stillness.
 She watched me pick up the bullwhip and her big cue-ball eyes bugged out so far she looked like a big fat bullfrog.
 I's yo' big fat Cum Cow, Massah, she suddenly blurted, and the hall went silent.
 Someone please buy me so's I can gets my big fat black ass raped.
 Tha's alls I's wan', fo' some White Massah to rape my fat black ass.
 I smiled.
 Okay, brethren and sister.
 You heard the nigger beast.
 Now who wants to buy a side of fresh, grade-A, Cum Cow fuck-meat? $1200, Cletus the Klansman piped up.
 Me and my Klan boys wanna barbecue us some Cum Cow.
 The room laughed.
 You can have the fat-ass heifer, mate, one of the Brits piped up.
 Jah, the Germans laughed.
 You go and cook up some Cum Cow now.
 Everyone laughed again, and I said, Going once … twice … and sold to Cletus and his Klan.
 Hey, you got any BBQ sauce in this hotel of yours, Cletus asked the hotel manager.
  He nodded, went to one of the back doors of the banquet hall, unlocked it, and ducked into the back.
 I motioned for one of my team to watch the door in his absence.
 In five minutes or so, the hotel manager reappeared with a hand-truck filled with three cases reading Uncle Tom's Bar-B-Q Sauce.
 The assembly cheered as he wheeled the cart to the center of the hall.
 Cletus and his Southern-fried Klan boys met the manager and began to get to work opening the crates.
 The manager then motioned to one of my team, and they both left the hall again.
 Meanwhile, Cletus's wife dragged Cum Cow into center stage by her straightened, light-toned mulatto hair.
 The Cum Cow's eyes were wide with terror now, bugging out like cue balls as she watched the large jars of sauce unpacked one by one.
 She let loose a horrified, sickened wail as she saw the manager and his helper re-enter the hall with a large barbeque spit.
 Is that what I think it is? I asked the manager, suddenly catching wind of his brilliant idea.
 It's left over from a pig roast we had last summer, he replied proudly.
 I figured we could roast us up some tangy, barbequed Cum Cow.
 The hall erupted in anxious laughter.
 The Cum Cow finally realized the full impact of the ordeal she was about to undergo, and she blubbered like a plump veal calf helpless in her pen.
 I want me some of this big old rump roast, one of the Klansman grabbed Cum Cow's huge, bubble butt and kneaded the caramel flesh, digging his hands into her gaping, soaking wet gash.
 I want me some nigger tit meat, a young teenage maiden tugged on the Cum Cow's udders and licked the sweet brown skin.
 Can I mom? she asked her mother who was also poking, prodding and inspecting the slab of bawling Cum Cow meat.
 Sure, darlin', the Aryan mother laughed.
 There's plenty of Cum Cow here for everyone.
 Just remember, folks, I bought me this fat Cum Cow for a $1000, so I get me the prime cut.
 He took a razor-sharp dressing knife from his belt and traced an outline from the Cum Cow's heaving tummy down to her dripping, musky snatch.
 Gonna need to shave this down here, though, he laughed as he flattened the razor-sharp blade against her hairy mound , scraping away her stubborn, kinky pubes.
 Don't want'a be pickin' cunt hair out of my teeth all night.
 I jus' hate when that happens, know what I mean? We all burst out into laughter.
 One of the Brit skins started slapping some BBQ sauce on the Cum Cow's cunt for lubrication as Cletus continued shaving her beastly womb.
 Each time he withdrew the blade, he wiped the severed cunt hairs and BBQ glaze on the wide open spread of the Cunt Cow's massive ass-moons.
 In seconds, dozens of BBQ whisk brushes appeared, and we all dipped into the BBQ sauce and began marinating the sobbing, shaking mulatto beast.
  The children and teens especially seemed to enjoy this activity.
 One teen boy jammed his brush between Cum Cow's spread mudflaps and straight up her splayed poop chute.
 I'm gonna eat me her chitlins, he giggled as she screwed the brush deep into her intestinal cavities.
  Meanwhile, the BBQ pit had now been fully erected, and she was dragged over to the contraption.
 The spit was jammed up her cunt, and her head and arms were lashed to the spinning turret.
 Someone dumped some lighter fluid on the pile of charcoal below her as she howled and pleaded, a low fire starting to crackle below her succulent sweat-and-sauce-glazed caramel-colored snuff meat.
 It was regular party atmosphere, and we all smeared more and sauce along her beefy, flabby haunches.
 Cletus now stopped the spinning spit and whipped out his thin, six-inch white manhood.
 He spit in her bugged-out cue-ball eyes and placed his beat-red pecker helmet against the mulatto heifer's sobbing lips.
 Okay, now, Cum Cow, he poked her in the eye with his sharp needle prick.
 You suck this white cock good and maybe we stop this all right now.
 Whattaya say to that, you fat fucking beast? Yes! she screeched as she devoured his stiff six-incher, desperately sucking, licking and worshipping every inch in a desperate bid for survival.
 Gawd, Massah, Lizzie duz luvs suckin' yo' big white prick so's much.
 Please lets Lizzie suck yo' big white cock and lets Lizzie show's you what's a good little Cum Cum yo' Lizzie be, she pled between mouthfuls of his thrusting dick.
 Shut your ficking mouth and suck! Cletus slapped her face hard and grasped her by her pointy nigger ears.
 Using the ears like handles, he slammed her head down around his cock, battering her windpipe in a vicious skull rape while we all rested a moment, watched, admired, and cheered him on.
 Cum Cow took everything Cletus could dish out with the utter passiveness of a thoroughly subjugated slab of rape meat.
 As always I had been right.
 Big fat Cum Cows like Lizzie can take ungodly amounts of brutality and barely even bat an eyelash.
 That was why the Process needed to be so ruthlessly inhuman with them It was the only way you could truly break their black asses into utter compliancy, the only way they could truly learn their place.
 I thought of this as I admired the way Cletus banged into her throat.
 She was responding true to her breeding, her natural beastly instincts taking over as she yielded completely to his God-ordained superiority.
 Unconsciously, she had allowed a big smile to break across her slobbering face.
 It was the smile of a beast who had finally found her rightful place in the universe, her mouth and life completely at the mercy and whim of her true Master, slavering over his assault weapon like it was a giant, succulant sweet potato.
 As the flames began to lick her fat caramel belly, she purred contentedly, living only to serve and please her Rightful Master in any way he deemed fit.
 The entire crowd licked its lips as the smell of BBQed nigger flesh tickled our noses.
 Although we'd all just eaten, our hunger had been renewed by the prospect of sweet, succulent Cum Cow steaks.
 As she cooked and sucked impaled on the spit, Cletus took his knife and pressed it against her earlobes.
 Here's your earmark, you fucking filthy beast, he grunted as he sliced off her flesh.
 Dipping the meat in some BBQ sauce he fed the slice to his wife, who relished its savory sweetness.
 Someone get my branding iron, he ordered to his delegation, and as he ravaged the Cow's throat into obliteration the large iron suddenly appeared.
 How about it, Cum Cow? he asked his property.
 Do you want to be branded? Yessah, Massah.
 Please brand Lizzie's fat black ass so's everyone knows I's yo' little Cum Cow, she pleaded.
 The brand was buried in the coals until it was red hot, and then withdrawn.
 Cletus withdrew his cock from the Cum Cow's worshipful mouth, took the branding iron and walked around to the beast's big, bubble ass.
 You are my property, Cum Cow, he hissed as he pressed the searing iron into her meaty haunches.
 Thank you, Massah, Lizzie cooed.
 I's be yo' sweet li'l Cum Cow fo'ever.
 Cletus, somebody needs to tenderize that ass meat, Cletus's wife piped up.
 It's too tough.
 Okay, who's got the biggest cock in this place? Cletus asked.
 Somebody needs to fuck this Cum Cow's ass while she cooks on the spit.
 I ain't gonna serve up no tough nigger ass steaks.
 I paid good money for this here Cum Cow.
 All the Aryan men immediately dropped trou and whipped out their tools for inspection.
  You young Aryan maids go around the hall and inspect the weapons of your menfolk.
 Whoever finds the largest cock gets to help tenderize the Cum Cow's ass meat.
 The nine Aryan maidens present scampered gleefully throughout the room inspecting the proud array of Aryan armaments on display.
 Look at this one! one exclaimed, holding out the proud 8.
5 incher of a German skin.
 It is so long and hard, she gushed as she jacked it into even further dimensions of rigidness.
 That one is nice, kindred sister, another maiden chirped.
 But this tool is even more fearsome, she exclaimed wagging the 9+ incher she held adoringly in her hands.
 The Christian Identity race warrior on the other end smirked.
 A mighty weapon, kindred sister, another girl shouted.
 But this one makes it pale in comparison.
 As proof she stroked the monstrous 10-inch shaft of one of the Brits.
 By the White Lord Yahweh! a Christian Identity maiden of 11 years suddenly squealed.
 The room went hush and all eyes turned to her.
 In mute awe she pointed to the most fearsome white cum cannon anyone in the room had even seen.
 Proudly, it belonged to Otis, one of the cream of the Aryan crop from from my own Klavern.
 Although he had never finished the fourth grade after five successive attempts, Otis was one of the Glorious new Adams of the pure Aryan race.
 He stood at six geet, nine inches tall, and his oxlike body now sported a humungous, Herculean humping howitzer of well over 13-inches.
 Many of the Aryan men groaned in disappointment at the sight of it's dimensions, for not only did it comfortably protrude past 13-inches, it's thickness was that of a can of Campbell's soup, and it had none of the droop usually associated with such awesome rape machines, especially among the bestial nigger breeding bucks who commonly sported such monstrous, mutant members.
 Otis's Olympian godhood extended from his belly at well beyond a forty-five degree angle, and as he breathed the head wobbled up and down bumping against his six-pack stomach.
 The Aryan maidens now gathered around their sister who had found such a Glorious godhood.
 The lucky maiden grasped the thick shaft, her tiny quivering 11-year-old fingers barely able to wrap around one-third of Otis's gargantuan circumference.
 The maidens then led their exalted sister through the crowd in an impromptu procession.
 One of the skins began singing RAHOWA, a popular song among the young race warriors.
 The room joined in as Otis approached the Cum Cow on the spit: We are God's True Warriors, Breaking down all the barriers All you kikes and niggers are gonna pay When you wake up on Judgment Day Long-beard Yids bent beneath our Docs While we force you to suck big nigger cocks Kike cunts, niggah ho's and spic-mud sluts herded into the streets; Waiting to die by our Aryan meat There won't be none spared No Jew courts or nigger cops anymore - There will only be God's justice, Racial Holy War RAHOWA Sing it out loud RAHOWA Make your race proud   Sing it, Cum Cow! Cletus bellowed in her ear as he stopped turning the spit again, displaying Lizzie's fat, branded haunches before Otis's steely resolve.
 Sing it for all of us to hear.
 RAHOWA! she howled like a nigger cunt in a church choir.
 Sing it out loud.
 RAHOWA, make your race proud! Her nigger asshole is still so tight! the maiden at Otis's side giggled as she spread the Cum Cow's bloddy, branded mud flaps, dipped her fingers in some BBQ sauce, and jabbed them hard up into the beast's Hershey hole.
 Your magnificent white tool will break her in two.
 Poor Cum Cow, she tittered, taking her fingers out of the mulatto's, meaty, caramel ass and inserting them between the obedient snuff beast's lips.
 This is really going to hurt you, but it is the only way you will ever learn your place.
  The BBQ sauce bubbled and festered in the open wounds of Lizzie's branded bubble butt, and her caramel skin now burned in unrelenting agony from the fire below and the scalding sauce glazing her plump, roasting body.
 As Otis stormed the mulatto beast's sphincters with one savage thrust, the Aryan maiden licked her tongue down the Cum Cow's succulent, brazed body.
 OOOOOaaaaaHHHHH! the Cum Cow wailed in abject agony, the abuse finally shattering her subhuman threshold of pain.
 Oh, poor little Cum Cow, the Aryan maid cackled with glee.
 That's it, you can cry all you want to.
 Just remember, this is for your own good.
 She sneered and then took a giant bite out of the snuff beast's plump, juicy, sweetened ass-moons.
 With blood and BBQ sauce dripping down her ruby-red lips and snow-white chin, the Aryan maid chewed the hot, juicy chunk of caramel Cum Cow and smacked her lips.
 Needs more sauce, she wrinkled her nose and spread a brush-ful of hot BBQ on the wound.
 Waaaaaahhhhhh … the Cum Cow mooed beneath the twin torture of the scalding sauce and the 13-inch ramrod skewering her beefy, branded ass.
 Each of Otis's thrusts punctured the tough fleshy walls of her poop chute deeper and deeper.
 As Otis pulled back after each blow, his gargantuan Aryan godhood displayed the beast's blood further and further up his shaft, and the crowd could read the depth of his penetration into her bowels like his superhuman cock was a giant dipstick.
 He truly was tenderizing the tough, inner-flesh of her mulatto poop chute, and as he drove his bayonet deeper and deeper into her guts the Aryan Maid continued feasting on the Cum Cow's haunches.
 You just save that cunt stake for me, Cletus reminded the ravenous, pure-bred princess.
 He poked at her boiling, shaved tummy and snatch with a fork to test its juiciness.
 I like my filet of nigger cunt medium rare, he explained to the crowd, who laughed in response.
 Brown on the outside, pink and juicy on the inside.
 You just save her li'l pussy lips for me, Cletus, his wife nagged.
  The tender flesh melts right in your mouth, she told the assembly.
 It's even better than tit meat.
 OOOOOOggghhhh, Cum Cow mooed.
 Now, what do you say, Cum Cow? Cletus spanked his needle-prick across her agony-torn face.
 Thank you, Massah, Lizzie responded automatically.
 I's hope I's taste good for you.
 Lizzie try to be a tasty Cum Cow fo' her Massah.
 How's that monster cock feel up your ass, girl? one of the onlookers asked.
 He be rapin' my niggah asshole fine, he is, Lizzie drooled, riding Otis's savage ass-obliteration just as her breeding dictated.
 He be so hard and big, and it hurts so much, she bawled.
 But Lizzie likes it when it hurts.
 Lizzie love a big ole' white cock splittin' her fat ass in two so it bleeds.
 Lizzie want her ass all nice and tender fo' her Massah.
 Lizzie want so much to be all tender and tasty for her Massah.
 Rape my ass harder! she howled.
 You ain't rapin' me hard 'nuff.
 I need to be's tender fo' my Massah.
 You's gotta rape my black ass harder or's I's won' be tender 'nuff fo' Massah.
 Please rape my asshole harder.
 Please … Otis grunted, growled, and then let loose a ferocious banshee wail as he tapped every last bit of White Devil in his purebred Aryan soul, unleashing a demonic frenzy of utter ass-annihilation that reduced what remained of the Cum Cow's ass into melted caramel butter.
 After ten solid minutes of this merciless ass-Armageddon, he finally withdrew and staggered over to the Cum Cow's slobbering, slack-jawed mouth.
 Fuck you, nigger Cum Cow, he spat as his warhead belched a tidal wave of hot, Aryan cum across her zombified mulatto face.
 At the smell of his god-seed, Lizzie's nostrils flared instinctively, dilating to the circumference of pennies.
 Seeing the inviting diameter, Otis drove his spewing, ivory rape tusk straight up her nostril and into her subhuman pea-brain.
 Okay, everyone, cum and get it! Cletus's wife chortled as she sliced off a hunk of Cum Cow's tit meat and savored its charbroiled sweetness.
 She's done! As she twitched and writhed in the throes of her death spasm, the Klansmen unlashed her and drew the spit out from her dripping pussy.
 She was turned over on her back and one of the Serbs produced a carving knife.
 Her body still wracked with violent seizures, Cletus used the opportunity to mount her cooked cunt and jab his needle prick into her roasted pussy flesh.
 I'm gonna give her some secret sauce, he cackled as he thrust in and out of her roasted snatch, riding the wild undulations of her death contortions with a smile of utter bliss on her face.
 Any of you ever ride a beast to death? he asked.
 It's the greatest fucking feeling in the world.
 Look at her ride my tool, he boasted, drawing back as she bucked and humped him with an epileptic fury.
 And her mulatto Cum Cow cunt is just milking my prick, he added.
 I ain't never felt me a crazy nigger cunt like this one.
 Jesus, don't know if I'll ever be able to go back ta' straight fucking after this.
 Then you just gonna haf'ta rassle you up a whole herd of Cum Cows! one of the Texas Klansmen hooted.
 Gonna have to start yourself the Bar-X Cletus Rape Ranch.
 Hoo, doggie, look at him ride that crazy-ass Cum Cow! Yee-haw! Cletus whooped as he pounded into the gyrating torso of the dying beast.
 That's it, you fucking beast.
 Give me the fucking ride of my life! He bit into her tit meat and started feeding while her throes grew even more violent until she jerked up violently, snapping her cunt around Cletus's cock like a fleshy vise.
 Shee-it! he screeched, her cooked pussy draining every last drop of precious white seed from his spewing piss hole.
 Her body went totally limp and Cletus cautiously extracted his cock from her broiled womb, careful not spill any of the tasty seed from inside her belly.
 His hot spunk bubbling in the urn of her vulva, she looked positively delicious.
 He lowered his hungy jaws to her cooked caramel cunt steak and begin to feed his ravenous hunger.
 He carefully ate around her smoked pussy lips, however, finally tearing them away from her mound and handing them to his eager wife.
 When the kindred saw that Cletus and his wife were satiated, they began feasting on the Cum Cow from her brains to her toes.
 After a taste myself, I walked over to where Tabitha the Cock Kitten lay curled in the fetal position.
 She tried to avoid my eyes, but I jerked her leash and forced her to raise her head.
  And how are you, my little Cock Kitten? I asked playing with her bit.
 She glared up at me with soulless, virtually catatonic eyes.
 The atrocities she'd witnessed had rendered her dumb and utterly docile.
 I dragged her to center stage as the assembly licked the BBQ sauce and nigger blood from their fingers and returned to their seats.
 By now, Cum Cow's carcass had been picked clean and several of the children were playing with her skull like a soccer ball.
 One boy refrained, however.
 I had been noticing him all weekend, and it disturbed me.
 His name was Joshua Miller, he was 12-years-old, and his father, Hank, was my Klavern's secretary-treasurer, a Klansman tried and true.
 However, in this instance, even coming from impeccable pure Aryan stock, Joshua had not embraced his Blood.
 He wasn't like the rest of the children at all.
 He seemed more pale, weaker, more effeminate.
 His father had told me in confidence that the boy's family was terrified he was sissifying into cocksucking queer.
 Joshua and his family had prayed with an Identity Minister all the previous night to save the boy's soul, but it had seemed to do no good.
 He was still standing aloof from the festivities with a look of horror on his face.
 I decided then and there to resolve this crisis and return this Aryan boy back into the kindred - body, mind and soul.
 I raised my hands and the assembly went silent.
 We will now be auctioning off Tabitha the Cock Kitten, I announced.
 As you can see by the look in her eyes, her tiny nigger pea-brain has snapped, I yanked her up by her head, and her bugged-out, cue-ball eyes filled her entire catatonic face.
 She is now beyond broken.
 She is merely a rape toy, a veritable coonskin Raggedy Ann.
 I myself would like to start the bidding at $1000 in care of our local Klavern.
 The assembly buzzed with curious whispering.
 You see, I explained further, I want to perform an act of charity today.
 It has come to my attention that Joshua Miller, the son of our Klavern's treasurer Hank Miller, is not embracing the Blood of our Heritage.
 Hank fears that young Joshua grows weaker in his soul every day and will eventually become a cocksucking queer and a disgrace to our race.
 Just now, as the other children enjoyed the Cum Cow BBQ Joshua did not indulge himself in one scrap or morsel from the sacrificed mulatto beast.
 In fact, he now crouches in the corner crying like a cocksucking, sissy queer.
 I propose that our Klavern purchase Cock Kitten and then present her as a gift to the Miller family.
 Then, with all our encouragement, we will bring young Joshua up here and help him ascend into Aryan manhood by ceremonially raping this young Cock Kitten.
 Since she is merely a nigger beast vegetable now, she will be able to offer Joshua no resistance, thus she will not be able to intimidate or scare him.
 We can all help him be a man with this helpless little rape toy.
 Hear, hear! the assembly broke out in agreement.
 It was so heart-warming to see the kindred rally behind their brethren like this.
 No other race comes to the aid of their neighbor, stranger though he may be, like the Aryan.
 This should be proof positive to any that we are truly the only HUMAN beings upon this planet, and thus subsequently God's only Children.
 Joshua's parents retreated to the back of the hall and dragged their young son kicking and screaming to the center of the hall.
 Yes, we will accept your generous offer, and we present our son Joshua into your care.
 Please save his Aryan soul and teach him the way of Our Lord.
  Joshua, come with me.
 I took him by the hand now and led him over to where Tabitha the Cock Kitten lay curled up in the fetal position.
 She looked up at him hazily, and he began to sob again.
 Please .
.
 he bawled.
 She's hurt.
 Please don't make me do this.
 Let her go.
 I don't want to hurt anyone.
 Please.
 This isn't an anyone, Joshua, I told him.
 Little Tabitha here is a Cock Kitten.
 She is a nigger fuck beast, and you are an Aryan, and it is time to claim your birthright.
 She's a human being! Joshua bawled.
 She's a human being, and I'm a human being.
 We're all human beings! he shouted.
 The crowd was stunned.
 Never among our ranks had we heard such blasphemy spoken.
 Such words are not only an affront to man, but to God.
 Obviously, although he was only 12 years old, he had already been thoroughly conditioned by countless hours of ZOG-sponsored mind control and so-called public education.
 He had actually come to believe that niggers were people … were human, Yahweh forbid.
 For his own good, then, Joshua had to be taught the Divine Order of things before he became what the ZOG wanted all pure-blood Aryans to become -- cocksucking queers and sissified race traitors.
 Were this to happen to young Joshua, not even his Aryan blood would protect him on The Day of the Rope.
  He would be hunted down, strung up and hung from the lamp-posts with every pollutant in the gene pool - your kikes, your niggers, your spics, your dot-heads, your gooks, your camel-jockeys, your queers and dykes, and all the other assorted mutt-breed liberal mongrels.
 Young Joshua needed to get his pants down and his cock out before it was too late for him.
 He needed to smell the fertile beastliness of his dark-skinned quarry and let her fecund odors trigger the ruthlessness of his God-given supremacy.
 He needed to allow God's Law to inhabit his soul and his Aryan manhood.
 He needed to embrace the most holy of sacraments -- Inter-species Rape! I was not about to let the forces of ZOG-sponsored mind control and the so-called public education system claim another Aryan soul.
 I quickly motioned to his two sisters, and they approached standing above the cringing Cock Kitten.
 One was a year or so older than Joshua, and the other a year or so younger.
 Sisters of Joshua, do you want to see your brother bring shame to your Aryan blood? No, Uncle, the older sister, a buxom, ravishing blond named Mary whispered.
 What can we do to help him? asked his younger sister, Bridgette, a lithe, 11-year-old, freckle-covered, red-haired nymphet.
 You must help him take the prize which is rightfully his by his birthright, the birthright of all Aryans, I told them.
 You must take his Aryan manhood in hand and guide him down the true path of our Blood.
 If he does not rape this nigger fuck beast today, he will never claim his heritage.
 He will become an AIDS-infested, cocksucking queer, performing oral sex in public restrooms with pock-marked, syphilitic jew-queers.
 He will spread open his tight white anal cheeks and beg big-dicked black apes to sexually mutilate him.
 He will wear a blond wig and lipstick, and allow niggers, kikes and spics to call him their bitch as they continually gang rape his ass and mouth like he is a human toilet.
 He will defile God's Race and be sentenced to hang on the Day of the Rope, then later resurrected only to be sentenced once again to an eternity of damnation in the sodomy circle of Satan's filthy Black Pit.
 That is the fate awaiting your brother if you do not assist him in his Quest today.
 He must rape the little Cock Kitten … right here and now, in front of the kindred, for God and Man alike to witness.
 It is your brother's only means of Salvation.
 We will save our brother, Mary announced to the crowd, who broke into a hearty cheer at the pretty Aryan maid's display of bravery and racial pride.
 We will make him a credit to the Chosen Race.
 The Aryan Lord Jesus will smile down on him and give him the strength to rape her beastly nigger body.
 So be it, I solemnly pronounced.
 May we play with the Cock Kitten, too? little Bridgette suddenly asked shyly.
 The adorable 11 year old was licking her lips as she prodded the flinching Cock Kitten in the ribs with her foot.
 Would you like to play with the Cock Kitten? I asked, charmed by her youthful enthusiasm and wide-eyed, dewy sweetness.
 Um hmm, she nodded, absent-mindedly rubbing her hand between her smooth, thin alabaster legs while she continued worrying Tabitha with her tiny feet.
 And what would you do with the little Cock Kitten? I laughed.
 I think it would feel real good if she licked me down in my pee-pee, Bridgette giggled, kneeling down and stroking Tabitha's hair.
 The diminutive dark-skinned fuck beast cringed beneath the Aryan maiden's touch, and Bridgette giggled again, playfully tugging at Tabitha's ears.
 The image was totally adorable, and I wished I had a camera because it would have made a beautiful photo for my Klavern's next Christmas card.
 She would fuck very well with the strap-on dildo mom and dad got me for my birthday, Mary suddenly spoke up.
 She knelt down next to her sister and forcefully spread Tabitha's legs apart.
 While the elfish nigger squirmed instinctively, Mary burrowed her ivory white hands up the remains of the jungle-kitty's skirt, between her skittish chocolate thighs until she struck the juicy pink cunt meat now frothing over with instinctual rape heat.
 Could I put on a strap-on and fuck her, too? Bridgette asked her sister.
 Could I, Mary? Could I please? That would be so cool.
 I could rape her black ass while you rape her cunt.
 Come on … Please! she whined, and the whole assembly chuckled and cooed at the 11 year old's unabashed cuteness.
 Whoa, I laughed aloud, patting Bridgette on the head while the crowd clapped and carried on.
 I glanced to her parents, who were beaming with pride at the precocious pre-teen's display.
  Before you girls get to play with the Cock Kitten, you must first help your brother, I gently scolded both girls, who blushed with embarrassment, much to everyone's further amusement.
 Do you think you could do that, girls? Do you think you could help your brother rape the little Cock Kitten here? I asked.
  Take out your hard white cock, brother, Mary immediately turned to Joshua.
 It is time for you to become a white man.
 She left Cock Kitten's side now and approached her brother.
 For years now I have been putting up with the teasing of the other kids.
 They call you pussy and faggot and nigger lover.
 I have defended you and been ashamed of it … ashamed of you … ashamed of myself.
 This will end today! She grabbed her brother's hands and forced them to the snaps on his jeans.
 Now pull down your pants, or I will pull them down for you.
 Please, Mary! the boy begged.
 Please don't make me do this.
 Do it, Josh! Bridgette now joined her sister.
 Quit being so queer and do it.
 Everyone can see your white cock is hard through your jeans.
 You've got a hard-on.
 You want to fuck the little nigger Cock Kitten.
 So what's wrong with you? Just rape her and get it over with and quit being such a pussy about it.
 But it's wrong, he fought off his older sister's hands as Mary began tearing down his jeans.
 Don't you see that? She's not some animal.
 She's a human being … a kid like us.
 Look at her.
 Look in her eyes.
 She's terrified.
 Imagine if that were you lying there in a roomful of black people who wanted to rape and kill you.
 Imagine how scared you'd be.
 Can't you see? Then if it's so wrong, why is your white cock so hard? Mary announced to the crowd as she felt his stiff prick through his jeans.
 Come on, Joshua.
 Tell us! It's not right, he cried.
 I can't help it.
 Let me go.
 Let me out of here.
 Please don't make me do this … But your white cock is hard, isn't it? his older sister pressed him.
 Isn't it? Yes, he sobbed as she clutched it and squeezed.
 Now please just let me go.
 Your hard white cock is a message from baby Jesus, Joshua, Bridgette was next to her sister now, helping to tear down both Joshua's jeans and his false nobility.
 The baby Jesus is trying to show you the Truth, just like they teach us in Bible class.
 Your white cock is hard because the Blood flowing through it is pure.
 You cannot deny who you are.
 You can't deny your Race.
 Your one of God's Chosen people, she mimicked her Bible lessons, and the crowd sighed at the power of her young Faith.
 We were put here to rule the beasts of the field, just like it says in the Bible.
 The baby Jesus wouldn't lie to us, would he? she asked.
 Would he? she repeated.
 The room was silent as the assembled kindred waited for the boy's reply.
 His sisters now had his jeans and under shorts down to his ankles, and 6 inches of stiff, proud, Aryan manhood pointed out from his loins like the Spear of Destiny.
 Now, despite all the ZOG-sponsored brainwashing wrought by the mass media and so-called public education system, Joshua could not deny his body, his birthright.
 The Aryan Blood roared through his veins, calling him to cast aside the Lies of Satan and embrace the Truth of Yahweh's White Light.
 But still he struggled.
 The ZOG-sponsored mind control which had conditioned him was strong indeed.
 His mind rebelled against his instincts.
 He stood there shivering waging a war inside his body that would determine the fate of his immortal Aryan soul.
 It's all right, brother, Mary, his older sister, cooed in his ear as she soothingly and lovingly stroked his rock hard white cock.
 You are feeling your Blood.
 Do not fight it.
 All the pain in your mind will stop when you rape her fresh black cunt.
 Look at it, she pled with him.
 She motioned Bridgette to kneel down.
 Open up the Cock Kitten's juicy fuck hole for our brother, Mary commanded her sister, who dutifully obeyed.
 Can't you see how wet it is? Mary purred as she continued pumping her brother's shaft with long, luxurious strokes.
 The little Cock Kitten is in heat, Joshua.
 She is an animal.
 She wants to be savaged.
 It is in her animal nature, just like they teach us in Bible study.
 It is her place to bow and break beneath the all-powerful yoke of your God-appointed supremacy.
 You remember the pastor's lesson, don't you? she licked her brother's ear as she jacked his prick even more fiercely.
 'As the chicken lays us eggs, and the cow gives us milk, and the sheep sheds his wool, and …  … the ox pulls our plow, and the horse bares us upon his back, Josh found himself joining his sister now, reciting by rote the familiar prayer they spoke every week before the Lord.
 So must the nigger, so must the jew, so must the mud people, so must all beasts of the field submit to God's Will and the Will of His Chosen Master -- the Aryan, the New Adam, the White Man.
 Josh's eyes galzed over and he felt his sister give him a nudge forward.
 This is wrong! a voice cried inside his mind.
 This is inhuman! This is rape! Josh hesitated as he listened to the voice.
 Then he felt his sister nudge him forward again.
 He looked down to where she grasped his stiff 6-inch cock in the pink-tinged alabaster of her soft yet stern hand.
 He looked up into her eyes through his own tears of doubt and fear.
 She smiled at him and nodded, radiating the holiest and highest love of all, the love shared between pure-blood brother and sister.
 I'm scared, he stammered, wanting to throw himself in his sister's strong, gentle embrace.
 What if I .
.
 What if I can't .
.
? You are a white man, of pure Blood and Heart, his sister assured him as led him by his cock to where his animal sacrifice lay splayed and helpless on the floor.
 You will rape her well.
 You will make us proud, she paused, you will make me, your sister who loves you, proud to call you brother and Champion of the Race.
 She tugged his rigid and white dick and they halted before the prey.
 Do you see how our young sister has prepared your meal for you, brother.
 Just like in the days of old, when the women folk prepared the feast for the Glorious White Hunter upon his return home.
 It's time for you to come Home, brother, she released his cock, and it wagged with its full fearsome girth before the terrified eyes of the helpless Cock Kitten.
 It is time for you to claim your birthright.
 Joshua licked his lips.
 Don't ….
  The voice in the boy's mind was feeble now, pitiful, laughable.
 Young Joshua threw his head back and roared in joyous mirth.
 Fucking black-skinned animal cunt whore! he shouted as he sank to his knees and aimed his flesh dagger directly into the Cock Kitten's tiny, gaping, juicy gash.
 In his fury, his aim was untrue, and his angry purplish cock helmet butted hard against the tiny Black Muslim girl's cunt.
 Fucking nigger! he shouted in pain and rage.
 Hold still! he slapped her hard across her bawling face as she squirmed with the last vestiges of savage wilfullness.
 He rammed his warhead back down into her hot pink sluice, but he again missed the mark, and his cock head butted against her upper thigh.
 Fucking nigger bitch fuck hole! he exploded, raining a succession of blows upon her face until it was covered with bruises and welts.
 He continued pummeling her pretty, ravaged face with his fists while he battered his prick helmet blindly into her cunt, trying to gain a breach in her cunt walls.
 Oh brother, Bridgette squealed.
 Rape her.
 Shove your hard white cock up her tight black cunt.
 Rape her! someone in the crowd picked up Bridgette's cheer.
 Rape that uppity Black Muslim cunt ho' til there ain't nuthin' left but a stinky little puddle of nigger fuck scum.
 Aiiyyhhh! Tabitha the Cock Kitten found her voice again.
 Help! she howled, as Joshua continued trying to storm her tight, virgin box.
 Someone please, help! Shut her the fuck up, Josh! Mary egged her brother on.
 Rape her nigger cunt til it's in a coma.
 Come on.
 Don't make me ashamed.
 Prove to us all you are an Aryan tried and true.
 Spurred on by his sister's loving encouragement, Joshua managed one last decisive thrust of his hips, punching his enraged flesh sword deep into the Cock Kitten's tender, pink, succulent virgin entrails.
 As he sank down into her sucking, yawning hole, he could feel the flesh of her slender cunt walls tear and rip open.
 The sharp tip of his white cock became soaked with a warm rush of thick sticky fluid, a moisture he knew was not pussy juice now, but sacrificial nigger blood.
 His piss hole drank in the viscous crimson nectar, and his cock became like a giant nose, the scent of the kill rocketing up the nerves along his prick until it burned his brain.
 Bloodlust flared his nostrils now, and every pore in his body wanted to drink the wet life essence from his succulant sub-human sacrifice.
 He slammed his rape sword deeper into the Cock Kitten's mewling soul, his mouth descending on her tiny, pert tits, his teeth thrashing the supple chocolate flesh of her nigger nipples.
 More blood! It dripped like drool from the corners of his mouth, and he continued feasting on the hot, delectable dark meat of his ritual feast.
 By now his cock was skewering the Cock Kitten's bruised body until the sheer viciousness rendered her slack and limp.
 All the animal willfulness bled from her tiny, elfin form, she now instinctively yielded to her breeding, like a broken filly dutifully accepting the stern reins of submission.
 Her perky, black body breathed a veritable sigh of relief as it was finally allowed to cast off the years of ZOG-inspired brainwashing and fully embrace the millennia of breeding.
 Like all beasts of the field, nigger cunts like Tabitha the Cock Kitten yearned to be domesticated and freed from the overwhelming responsibility of living their own lives and functioning as human beings.
 She now spread her thighs even wider and urged young Joshua to break her even further, to strip every last vestige of the false black pride she'd been burdened with throughout her short life.
 Finally, her whole being seemed to sigh as her Savior reduced her to the sub-human status for which she had always secretly longed.
 Finally I can just be what I've always wanted to be, she silently comforted herself, what all nigger cunt whores just want to be - mindless fuck beasts serving the glorious white cocks of our God-ordained Masters.
 Look how well she rapes, how naturally she yields to the God-given mastery of your pure-blood-filled, Aryan fuck weapon, Mary gasped in awe as her once sissified brother now made her and her entire race proud with his raw, unbridled brutality.
 You worship my brother's holy Ravager, don't you nigger fuck-hole? Mary mocked the Cock Kitten, petting the junglebunny's sweat-stained brow as Tabitha withstood the savagery of Joshua's gutting like a true subjugated and thoroughly domesticated beast of burden.
 Y .
.
y .
.
 yes, Tabitha wept for joy amid the furious rape tornado that splintered her tiny, elfin body like ebony balsa wood.
 R .
.
 r .
.
 rape m .
.
 me, M .
.
 Massa, she stammered.
 I'll be yo' good li'l Cock Kitten.
 Jes' rape my skinny nigger ass til it be blue and black.
 You thought you were as good as us, didn't you? Joshua sneered now as he reared back and began delivering hard, obliterating cock-blows, bending the Cock Kitten's tiny body into violent contortions.
 You fucking thought you were fucking better than us! Well, what do you think now, nigger fuck beast rape hole? What do you think of your equal rights and affirmative action and racial pride and Minister Louis Farrakhan now, you fucking genetically inferior piece of sub-human pickaninny ho' trash garbage … he ranted, letting 12 years of curses spill from his brain: all the things he'd longed to say through out his entire subjugation beneath the ZOG-inspired mind control of mass media and so-called public education.
 What do you think now?! I's don't thinks, Massa! she whined, bucking uncontrollably as her young white dominator eviscerated a volcanic cum from her tight chocolate tummy.
 .
 I's jes fucks my, Massa.
 Tha's all dis dumb niggah ho' do, she blubbered as her gut-wrenching climax seeped all the way down her limp, rag-doll legs to her tiny black toes.
 Tabby don' think at'all.
 Tabby jes be cock kitten rape meat fo' her big, strong white Massa.
 Dat's all Tabby be thinkin' - when my Massa gonna rape my worthless black ass again? When my Massa gonna treat me like the niggah cunt ho' I is? When my Massa gonna stick his hard white cock up my slimy niggah pussy and give me a reason to live? She bucked about on his cock now and rode him wildly, coaxing yet another aftershock cum from her quaking quim.
 She was the one doing all the fucking now, scooting up and down on his young, stiff 12-year-old pole and chasing his masterful hardness with the kind of true rape hunger only a thoroughly-broken nigger fuck beast can know.
 Look at her chase my boy's fuck, Mr.
 Miller boomed with the pride of his Blood and his Race.
 He's defilin' her stupid nigger cunt, and she's scootin' up and down on his hard, Aryan manhood begging for more.
 I've never been so proud, Joshua's mother beamed.
 You go on and rape that little pickaninny nigger fuck toy, honey, she cheered on her son.
 You show that little piece of rape trash what my boy can do.
 That's quite a little cocksman you have there, Miller, one of the brethren spoke up admirably.
 A true chip off the old block, eh? You know it, Mr.
 Miller laughed, putting his arm around his wife and squeezing her to his side.
 And a credit to the Blood, too.
 My God, look at her drooling! little Bridgette giggled in glee, unable to contain herself now.
 As her big brother made her proud, little Bridgette straddled the Cock Kitten's face and jammed her pink, hairless pussy into the fuck beast's slobbering mouth.
 Eat my Aryan pee-pee, you pee-pee-licking nigger ho'! Bridgette squeaked, and the whole assembly broke out into a raucous cheer.
 I'm your Mistress, and say eat my wet little pee-pee til I cum, or I'll take a big knife, cut off your pee-pee lips and make you eat them! I's eats my li'l Misstress's pussy real good, you see, Tabitha bawled, desperately stabbing her tongue into the virgin ivory purity of the young girl's sacred snatch.
 Tabby gonna make her li'l Mistress's pee-pee real happy, you see! Ooo, that feels so good, Bridgette giggled as she ground her teeny cunny deep into Tabby's mouth.
 She eats my little white pee-pee so good.
 I really like having a cock kitten, she cackled, bouncing up and down on the elfin nigger's face and bumping her pin-prick clit into Tabby's darting, catlike tongue.
 Oh … ah … she's gonna make my pee-pee cum … ooo .
.
 yeah .
.
 eat my pee-pee, Tabby.
 Oh, I love my little cock kitten! she hollered as she mashed her bald, 11-year-old pussy into the nigger fuck beast's ravenous mouth.
 Her small, pre-pubescent body trembled and writhed, and then she collapsed in a flood of pre-teen pussy juice all over Tabby's contented face.
 Did I's do good fo' you, li'l Mistress? Tabby asked.
 Did I's eat yo' sweet li'l pink pee-pee good? Mmm hmm .
.
 Bridgette kissed the junglebunny sex-slave on her thick, swollen lips and hugged her.
 I want to get a toy cock now and rape you like Josh is doing.
 She scooted off Tabby's face and went over to her big sister.
 Mary had just finished outfitting herself with a 10-inch white strap.
 In her other hand she held an identical dildo and extended it to her little sister.
 You're probably going to need mom's help putting that on, Mary laughed as she stroked her fake cock and licked her lips.
 Oh, you girls, Mrs.
 Miller laughed, stepping up to her daughters and taking charge of Bridgette's strap-on.
 Keeping up with you is going to be the death of me yet, she cooed, and the crowd laughed.
 Now step through the leg holes here, darling, she assisted Bridgette, who enthusiastically began climbing into the rape apparatus.
 Am I really going to rape her, mom? Bridgette gushed.
 Huh? Am I really going to rape Cock Kitten's ass? This is so cool! Hold on there, short-stuff, Mary snapped.
 The Cock Kitten's asshole is mine.
 You can fuck her pussy, though.
 Mom! Bridgette whined.
 Mary's hogging the Cock Kitten! Mom, she's being a brat again, Mary protested.
 I called Tabby's ass.
 You heard me.
 I get to rape her ass! Mom, Bridgette bawled.
 This isn't fair! Shhh, both of you, Mrs.
 Miller scolded while the crowd tittered.
 You're going to have to learn how to share.
 Now why don't you quit acting like little girls and start acting like true Aryan rape maidens.
 But I wanna rape Tabby's ass, too! Bridgette whined.
 Bridgette, your big sister called Tabby's ass first, so she gets to rape it first.
 You can rape her pussy, and then rape her ass when your sister is finished.
 You know, hon, Mr.
 Miller cut in, they could DP the junglebunny cunt - turn her over on all fours and Mary gets her ass while Bridgette gets underneath.
 He approached his wife and daughters now and helped Bridgette tighten the strap-on contraption tight.
 It wasn't intended for such a small operator, but the straps and buckles were adjustable.
 How'd you like that, baby? he asked his youngest daughter, brushing the hair back along her forhead and pinching her pre-teen tits until the nipples hardened like tiny kernels of candy corn.
  Would you like to double stuff the little dark-skinned fuck beast with your sister.
 Tabby will really like it.
 All nigger ho's really like getting raped up both their hot holes.
 Mmm, Bridgette thought about this for a moment, then smiled up at her big sister.
 Is that cool with you, Mary? she asked.
 We could double rape her like dad says.
 Then we could trade, and I could get her ass after you.
 Okay, munchkin, mary laughed and tossled her little sister's blond hair.
 Sorry I yelled at you.
 I just want to rape her nigger ass so bad.
 Me, too, Bridgette giggled as her father finally finished adjusting the strap-on so it was nice and snug.
 Now let's go and have some fun with our Cock Kitty.
 She proudly wagged her fake 10-inch cock around, and the crowd cheered.
 As the two girls now approached their brother and the spastic nigger fuck toy at his mercy, all eyes turned back to the elflike junglebunny fuck beast.
  She was bathed in sweat, and her hips were caught up in yet another seizure.
 Having her true Roots raped back into her subhuman body had reduced the once proud Black Muslim girl into a slavering fuck zombie.
 Her crazed, cue-ball eyes bugged out of her head, and her cute little monkey nostrils flared out to the diameter of dimes.
 The puddle beneath her on the floor testified to the multiple cum-quakes that had been ripped from her nasty nigger nookie, and she was now humping Josh's steely12-year-old Aryanhood with a brainless abandon.
 I .
.
 I'm gonna cum! Josh gasped helplessly as his body became wracked with pre-cum tremors.
 Shove it down her fucking throat and make her drink it! Mary instructed her little brother, pulling him off the snarling fuck slave.
 She pushed Joshua forward, and he stumbled slightly, his knees rubbery from the extreme exertion of raping the little junglebunny into a quivering mass of sub-human fuck flesh.
 Mary pointed to a spot on the floor, and Bridgette lay down on her back.
 Then the older Miller sister grabbed Tabby by the legs and spun her over on all fours atop Bridgette.
  The little Miller sister now began stabbing her fake 10-inch cock up into the Cock Kitten's gaping rape wound.
 As it battered Tabby's tight brown tummy and swollen cunt lips, the crowd laughed and clapped.
 It was so cute to see the little Aryan maid struggle to gain access on her first dildo rape.
 She bit her lip, and her face was drawn in complete concentration while she punched her 10-inch rape toy valiantly up into Tabby's chocolate crack.
 That's it, munchkin, you're getting it, Mary encouraged her sister.
 A little lower, she moved Tabby's ass down so that her little sister had a better angle.
 Now shove it up there … HARD! she barked.
 Bridgette obeyed her big sister, and the 10-inch rape toy suddenly sunk full-tilt into the Cock Kitten's still slick pussy.
 Even with the raping her chocolate cunt had just endured, the elfin nigger's natural resilience had already begun to tighten the cunt muscles in her teenage twat.
 Ahhh! she drooled as the 10-inch white rape toy drove up hard into her hard, flat, black belly.
 The 10-inches of hard rubber were a far cry from the six-inches of boy cock that had previously violated her, and even though young Joshua had supplied her with quite a savage reintroduction to her Roots nothing satisfies a junglebunny fuck beast quite as much as a huge white cock drilling into her guts.
 The bigger the better.
 It didn't matter if the rape weapon in question was fleshly or artificial in nature, as long as it was being directed by the dominating, subjugating hand of a true Aryan Master or Mistress.
 And little 11-year-old Bridgette certainly fit into that category.
 As she stabbed the huge dildo up into Tabby's stretched-out cunt, the brown-skinned fuck beast acclimated to the assault just as her breeding dictated, and in just several short seconds she was driving her black hips up and down on the huge rape toy like she was a happy little pickaninny riding a see-saw.
  Yes, li'l Mistress, she bellowed.
 You rapes Tabby's worthless black pussy so well.
 Rape my niggah cunt with that big white cock! You think that's good, huh? Mary hissed in her ear as she spread the Cock Kitten's sweet chocolate ass cheeks and pressed the head of her huge rape toy up against the elfin jungle cunt's dry, unprepared sphincter.
 Wait til you feel this big white cock shoved up your tight cherry asshole.
 She grabbed the petite nigger fuck beast by her oily, kinky black hair and yanked her neck back.
 You want that, don't you, you fucking piece of nigger garbage? You want me big white cock to rape your cherry black asshole, don't you? Yes, Mistress! Tabby howled.
 Tabby wantsa feel your hard white cock rape her hot black black asshole.
 Please, Mistress.
 Please stuff your huge white cock up my asshole and rape yo' Tabby's ass so hard.
 Please Mistress! she pleaded.
 Shut your fucking mouth and open your fucking mouth! Joshua growled, as he pried open the Cock Kitten's slackened jaws and jabbed his proud, six-inch Aryanhood deep into her gasping throat.
 She gagged immediately and the crowd cheered as she relented to the boy's savage choke rape while Mary gritted her teeth and impaled the nigger's dry, cherry poop chute with one obliterating stroke.
 Wwwggfffff …wwwffeeggghh … Tabby's agonized screeches were muffled beneath the fury of Joshua's cock pacifier, but her anguish was still clearly audible as the sibling threesome brutalized her petite black body with the Berserker rage of true Aryans dominating a thoroughly cowed and pliant fuck beast.
 To her credit, the Cock Kitten let her instincts take over and rode the rape hurricane with an animalistic ease that would have made her slave forefathers and mothers proud.
 How naturally and contentedly she adjusted to each savage violation tearing into her respective orifices.
 Like all nigger fuck beasts finally freed of the ZOG-sponsored mind control of the mass media and so-called public education system, she took it with enthusiasm and joy, just as her birthright and breeding biologically dictated.
 Her body working in three directions, she desperately tried to stuff as much white domination into her gaping rape wounds as her body would allow.
  Joshua had stretched Tabby's thick, rubbery, swollen lips far apart between his two index fingers, and his dick was lodged deep in her choking windpipe.
 Even suffocating beneath the onslaught of Aryan meat smothering her throat, the Cock Kitten still tried inhaling even more the 12-year-old boy's manhood, and he managed to wedge his balls between her greedy and obscenely distorted lips.
 Not content with just her mouth being ravaged, Tabby also slammed up and down on the 10-inch rape toy skewering her pussy like a jackhammer.
 Simultaneously, she shimmied her chocolate shit chute back and forth along Mary's furious dildo with the frenetic frenzy of an epileptic.
 This was truly a holy moment, and as the video crew captured the ceremony for all posterity, I dreamed of the day when this scene could be shown in all the ghetto schools as a training film for the millions of young nigger fuck beasts who would one day return obediently beneath the yoke of their benevolent Aryan Masters.
 For upon seeing this scene, what young nigger ho' would not gladly give up the Big Lie of Equality and Equal Rights for a chance to serve her True Masters in such rapturous, glorious, and worshipful fulfillment? Oh, if only the young nigger ho's in our country would be allowed to see the truth.
 But they will, some day, for the Lord Yahweh has Promised us this in his Word.
 Until, then, however, we must win the war against the ZOG-sponsored mass media and the so-called public education system one subhuman cunt at a time.
 As we all watched Tabby pursue her true calling in life, it quickly became apparent that the Process had reclaimed yet another beast of the field for the Glory of Yahweh.
 We all watched for several more minutes until Josh withdrew his scalding schlong from the Cock Kitten's hungry, cum-starved mouth and then bathed her perky nigger features in a heaping splatter of Aryan baby batter.
 As he pumped every last drop out from his swollen white cock, he wiped the sticky splooge all over her grateful, panting features, paiting her chocolate face with pure-blood vanilla frosting.
 The sisters now withdrew their respective rape toys and shifted the nigger fuck beast's between them so that little Bridgette now sliced Tabby's shitter while big sister Mary pronged the pickaninny's pussy.
 The crowd had lost count of how many multiple cums Tabby's pussy had endured, but with this new invasion her dark, elfin body convulsed yet again, and the tremors continued as the sisters thrashed the petite junglebunny like a black Raggedy Ann doll.
 Lord Yahweh be Praised! I shouted the prayer as I withdrew from Tabby and turned everyone's attention back to the fourth and final Black Muslim girl on the auction block.
 By now, the kindred's collective appetite had been whetted far beyond what any of them had experienced before.
 And there knelt our lovely Rape Raven, her proud defiant eyes scourging us all with a hatred so all-consuming we could taste it on our own lips.
  For a frightening instant, I found myself doubting whether even the Process could break this wild-eyed fuck beast.
 Then I opened my heart to Yahweh and let His Spirit subdue the demons of doubt.
 Of course she would beak.
 All nigger fuck beasts break, even the strongest and proudest among them, because they are beasts of the field and the Lord Yahweh has placed them under our Divinely-appointed stewardship, to bend and break as we see fit.
 The Aryan just needed to have Faith and show no Fear.
 He needed to exercise a stern, ruthless discipline, and eventually all the niggers, kikes, spics, gooks and other mud peoples would obediently and joyously accept their true and rightful place.
 I looked into the ravishing teen's cold, cue-ball eyes and smiled.
 And finally we come to you, our final auction lot of the evening, the succulent, chocolate-skinned Rape Raven, I said aloud so the entire crowd could hear me.
 How does it feel, you junglebunny ho'? How does it feel to be sold up on an auction block the subhuman fuck beast that you are? I moved the bit away from her mouth so she could speak freely.
 Go to hell, she whispered back.
 What was that? I asked, yanking her leash so tha the collar snapped her neck.
 I said 'Go to hell!', you sick blue-eyed devil.
 All of you! she hollered at the assembly.
 All of you burn in hell! You will be punished.
 When the great Mother Plane descends and the Day of Wrath descends upon the white devils, you will be the first to burn in the Flames of Righteousness.
 Then your men will feel the yoke, and your women sold into bondage just as Allah has promised us.
 The kindred laughed uproariously at the junglebunny's bug-eyed rantings.
 I'd love to hear you say that all again with four huge white cocks shoved down your nigger cunt throat, you ignorant little ho', one of the Christian Identity shouted back.
 Me and my Aryan brothers here will show you a fucking Day of Wrath! You see what happened to your little Black Muslim girlfriends, didn't ya', ho'.
 When we got done with them, they were calling us 'Massah', worshipping our Almighty White cocks, and begging us to rape their subhuman nigger hides.
 That'll be you supplicating yourself to the white devils soon enough, ya' thick-lipped, bug-eyed, black-skinned fuck beast.
 I will never call you or any other blue-eyed devil Massah! Rape Raven spit from her savage black mouth.
 No white man or woman will ever make me surrender my sacred birthright as a Daughter of the Tribe of Shabazz! All that shit didn't mean much to your little pickaninny girlfriends now, did it? a Southern Klansman shot back.
 We raped two of the cunt ho's to death, and they fucking begged us to do it.
 You sat there and fucking heard them.
 You heard them reclaim their Roots, ho', and you know the fucking truth.
 You fucking witnessed it.
 Black bitches ain't good for nothin' but worshippin' a white man's prick.
 You'll take any kind of abuse we dish out as long as you get you some Almighty Aryan prick stufffed up your useless, subhuman fuck holes.
 Why, just look at your little Cock Kitten buddy over there, he pointed to the elfin rape toy still being savaged by the Miller children.
 Look at the look on her fucking face.
 You ever see your little girlfriend so happy in all her life, ho'? That ain't no lie.
 That's the God's Truth, and you fucking know it! She is a disgrace to our race, Rape Raven hissed.
 She is weak.
 Her Faith in Allah is not strong.
 I will never betray myself and my people.
 Never! You heard her, kindred, I interrupted.
 That's a challenge to Aryan Pride if I ever heard it.
 Just look at her.
 Cowed beneath the yoke of her True Masters, and her eyes still blaze with defiance.
 She says she will never yield beneath Yahweh and his Law.
 She spits in our Lord's face.
 She must pay for such utter, unspeakable blasphemy.
 Who will be our Phineus, and mete out Yahweh's harsh judgement with the point of his fleshly war-spear? Which of you will be Man enough .
.
? Aryan enough .
.
? Who among us here will redeem our Blood upon this uppity, subhuman slice of prime, Grade-A, black-skinned rape meat? What do I hear for the honor and privilege of breaking her proud black ass - mind, body and spirit? $10,000, the Christian Identity pastor from the Pacific Northwest boomed up.
 A wave of excitement swept through the crowd.
 A very respectable bid, I smiled, but certainly this opportunity is worth more than a mere $10,000.
 Look at her.
 She is as fine a piece of chocolate-skinned rape candy as the young nigger cunt ho's who parade before white America under the auspices of the ZOG-sponsored television and film industry.
 Here is your opportunity to rape Brandy, or Halle Berry, or Jada Pinkett, or any of the other countless ho's who mock Aryan Pride with their so-called Black Pride and equal rights.
 One day, of course, on the Day of the Rope, we will bend and break those willful nigger cunts beneath the unyielding hand of White Justice as we take all subhuman fuck beasts into sexual bondage just as the Lord bid Moses to do among the savage tribes he conquered.
 But why wait for such an opportunity when you can possess it today.
 Now what do I hear? Certainly, such a Holy Sacrifice is worth more than a mere $10,000? $15,000 American dollars! the British skins shouted.
 $17,500! a group of Southern Klansmen countered.
 $20,000! the Christian Identity pastor offered.
 There was a long puase.
 Going once … I spoke.
 $25,000! the German neo-nazi contingent raised the bid.
 $27,5000! the Christian Identity pastor answered immediately.
 There was another long pause.
 Going once .
.
 I announced.
 Going twice … $30,000! the German group finally blurted out.
 All eyes turned to the Identity pastor.
 He smiled.
 $50,000, he almost whispered, rubbing his crotch, licking his lips and peering directly into Rape Raven's coal-black pupils.
 You will be ours, nigger cunt, he hissed.
 We will take you back to our compound in chains, and there you will be the first animal in our subhuman, fuck beast zoo.
 We will parade you before visitors, and you will willingly surrender every orifice and inch of your black-skinned body to any Aryan brother who pays to use your worthless body.
 We will make films of your rapes and tortures and market them through the Kindred Community so that all may see the Glory that awaits the White Man when the day of the Rope is finally upon us.
 You will perform at children's birthday parties, crouched on all fours with your gaping ass and cunt splayed open while blindfolded Aryan boys and girls 'Stick the White Cock in the Nigger Fuck Beast.
' And most importantly, as we bring other fuck beasts into our menagerie - spics, gooks, kikes and other assorted mud cunts - you will joyously train them to be as worshipful and content as you will be.
 We will also breed you to produce a brood of pickaninny rape toys, and you will teach them to serve their Masters from the very moment they begin suckling at your firm, chocolate tits.
 That is the fate that awaits you, ho'.
 The room was silent as the two locked eyes in a battle of wills.
 Going once … twice … Sold, I finally broke the pitched quiet.
 The Rape Raven is yours for $50,000, I announced to the pastor, handing him the leash.
 Congratulations.
 I will never bow to you, white devil, Rape Raven sneered.
 You can rape and torture me all you want, but I am a Daughter of the Tribe of Shabazz, and my will is the will of the Original Man … the Black man … the Superior Man.
 We shall see, the pastor nodded.
 Chain her up and secure her in our van, he spoke to his followers.
 We will leave for the compound tonight.
 You mean you ain't gonna break her here now? one of the Southern Klansmen asked.
 Look in her eyes, the pastor pointed to Rape Raven as his men shackled her up.
 She knows only rage.
 She has seen far too much tonight.
 She has grown inured to the pain and suffering of her sisters.
 To break her at this time, we would end up killing her.
 This would make my investment a waste of money.
 No, we will give some time to mull over what has happened, to consider what the rest of her life will be like.
 Right now we must make her greatest fear be the future, the unknown.
 We will allow demons to stalk her nightmares.
 Then, when we resume the Process, she will be fatigued and truly terrified.
 We will see how long her uppity nigger willfulness lasts then.
 Won't we, Rape Raven? he chucked her chin.
 Never! she spat at him.
 Never! You may know by now that I've been in love with my cousin Susan.
 How unfortunate and stressful it has been for the both of us to hold ourselves back from sensual lust when our family has gathered, though her mother does know.
 However, that is another story altogether.
 Certainly though the rewards of such forbidden love can and are tremendous.
 The sex has been wondrous, and yet it is the utter passion that is unbelievable.
 Thus when Susan suggested that the two of us go camping, to spend time alone, you can imagine I didn't hesitate a second.
 It was mid May when we set out to a local state park, where we were to spend a week hiking, canoeing, swimming, or so we said.
 Certainly our packing should have been a dead giveaway as along with the tent, some food, a few clothes, we brought our one sleeping bag.
 The ride for one was magical, with Susan sitting next to me, with her skirt riding high up on her milky thighs.
 With the air on high I was still sweating as I caught the flicker of her tongue across her moist red lips.
 And that was only the beginning.
 As I thrust the truck into high gear my eyes widened as I watched Susan plunge her fingers under her skirt directly into her dripping cunt.
 Over the blaring music I listened to her fingers slipping in and our, and to her increased moaning.
 She continued to hump the seat, one arm around my back, and the other thrashing wildly about.
 After what seemed like hours of her moaning, and as the scent of her juices filled the air, she buried her head against my shoulder and screamed.
 When I came to my senses and dodged past a semi truck I glanced down to see the seat and floorboard flowing with Susan's cum.
 At that very moment Susan lifted her head, removed her hand from her cunt, and lifting her glistening fingers to my tongue.
 Such a taste as her juice delivered I could just keep from nibbling each finger whole.
 Finally she slipped in front of me as I desperately tried to stay on the road, and Susan delivered a mind numbing kiss to my lips.
 She slipped back onto the drenched seat again and asked, Are we almost there yet? Not too long afterwards we did arrive at the park, found a nice, somewhat secluded campsite, and set the tent up underneath the pines.
 Thus situated we took stock of the surroundings.
 While we were tucked away in the forest there was another campsite about 30 yards away, where a middle aged couple sat having lunch.
 While I noticed the husband glancing at Susan, and for that matter the wife as well, she spun me around for a passionate kiss.
 By this time I could feel the couple's eyes boring into us, so I lead Susan into the tent, with our shades drown tight.
 She immediately fell back on the sleeping bag and opened her legs, exposing her pantiless cunt, still a bit damp from the drive over.
 Within a minutes, I too dropped to floor clad only in boxers while she had wrenched her halter top off as well.
 We kissed again as my hand wandered down towards her breast, where I found her hard nipples heaving up and down.
 I slipped my tongue slowly from Susan's mouth, dragging it down along her neckline.
 I planted little wet kisses along the rim of her collarbone, all the while coping with Susan's body pressing closer and closer.
 Finally I reached her nipple and began sucking her erect teat, listening to Susan groan with pleasure.
 Stealthily I slipped my right hand down to her thigh where I felt her jerk in surprise before she relaxed her leg against my hand.
 While caressing her inner thigh I continued to suck at her nipples, then slowly my finger slipped across Susan's cunt lips.
 Without warning she impaled herself on the finger, and crushed my head tightly against her breasts.
 I was certain that the neighboring campers could by now hear the two of us, panting, moaning, and yelling, but what the hell.
 Finally needing air I escaped Susan's headlock and ceased the incessant fingerbanging.
 Instead I rolled Susan over on her belly, slipped my boxers off, and drove my cock deep into her rear.
 After her initial surprise, and shout of, OH, God.
.
.
.
 , Susan turned her head to the side, and with her teeth clenched began to rock forcibly on my erection.
 As her breathing and my hear picked up speed we cried out, as our orgasms meshed together.
 Cum spurted into Susan's anus, only flooding out when I removed the head.
 With her own stream of cum tapering off, we lay together, lips locked, and drifted off to sleep.
 Upon rising and dressing we sat arms locked outside the tent, listening to the matinee next door, and laughed together at the obvious effect we had already had on our neighbors.
 Hurry up, Scottie, implored Janet, we gotta get right to my place right away and help out my mom!!! Awwwww, come on, Jan, Scottie protested, I've got to get home and do my home work! You know how much she needs our help, Jan persisted, and after all the times she helped you out, you'd think you'd be a little more helpful!!! Scottie shrugged his shoulders, a sure sign that he was giving in, and then replied, You're right, I'll come and help, but can't stay late, I've got physics and calculus to tackle, and then there's that history report.
.
.
.
.
.
 I get the picture, Jan replied thankfully, no more than half an hour, okay!?! The two nineteen year olds pushed through the back door and Jan yelled out, We're home mom, is everything all right!?! Jan's mother, Doris, waddling into the kitchen in an old house coat and a pair of pink slippers replied, Thank god you two kids are here, I think I'm going to explode!!! On the front of Doris Atkins house coat were two large wet circles that obviously came from lactating breasts! Oh, mom, Jan said soothingly, Scottie and I will take care of you right away, isn't that right Scottie!?! Uh, sure, Mrs.
 Adkins, we'll take care of them right away! Let's go into the living room and settle down on the sofa, Doris said, as she led the two nineteen year olds down the hall.
 Doris settled down in the middle of the sofa, opened up the front of her robe, and then offered each of them a large nipple to suck on! Scottie and Jan each took a place on either side of Jan's mother and lay their heads in her lap, where upon she guided a nipple into each one of their mouths! Oh, god, that feels good, she sighed, as the two youngsters began emptying her massive bosom of her excess milk! As they sucked, Doris made quiet conversation, while occasionally giving encouragement to both of them! For your information, Doris opined, my bra size is up to a 42DD!!! Jan pulled her mouth away from the distended nipple she was nursing on and said, That's up two inches this month alone, that is really amazing!!! Mmmm, yes it is, Doris replied, and another thing I've found is that my clitoris is almost always erect and in need of sexual relief, I had to masturbate twice today just to keep from going crazy!!! Uh, Scottie, asked Doris quietly, could I ask you for a favor, please!?! Sure Mrs.
 A.
, Scottie replied, anything you need!!! I knew I could count on you Scottie, she responded warmly, you're such a good friend to me and my daughter!!! What is it you want me to do, asked Scottie seriously??? Well, dear, she went on, would you please stand up and show me your penis, my clitoris is on fire and in dire need of sexual relief!?! Scottie let the big nipple fall from his mouth, stood up, unbuckled his belt, and let his jeans and shorts drop to the floor, leaving his half erect cock just a foot from Doris Adkins' hungry mouth!! Oh, Scottie,she cooed softly, you have such a beautiful penis, Jan has told me so often how absolutely wonder fully hung you are, but this is the first time I've ever seen it for myself, exactly how large are you, dear!?! Eight inches, ma'am, he replied proudly! And how thick, she pressed on!?! Oh, about six and a half inches, he replied, give or take a quarter inch!!! Scottie, she asked in a barely audible tone, may I suck you off, please?!? By thrusting out his pelvis, Scottie gave Doris Adkins the answer she was looking for, and in one smooth motion, she let Scottie's huge head slide into her warm mouth! Almost in unison, both Scottie and Mrs.
 Adkins let out deep satisfying sighs, Scottie because his pecker was being royally sucked off, and Doris because having Scottie's penis in her mouth was having a dramatic affect on her clitoris!!! For the next five minutes or so, all three of them did what had to be done, Scottie offering his erection for Doris' hungry mouth, and Jan suckling on her mother's massive bosom! The only sounds that could be heard were the slurping and licking noises coming from the mouths of the two Atkins women, and occasionally a soft moan coming from Scottie! Doris was now delirious with lust, and in great vain she tried to press her thighs together in a futile attempt at putting pressure on her now fully erect clitoris! Finally not able to take it anymore, Doris caressed her daughter's head and begged, Could you please do mama's clit for her, dear!?! Jan looked up at her mother and replied, Sure, mom, anything you need! Sliding down to the floor, Jan took up the space between her mom's plump thighs, and as usual, her vagina was bulging obscenely with her overly large clit sticking its head through the mass of tangled pubic hair!!! Do me, dear, her mother exhorted, mama needs a good sucking!!! Jan lowered her mouth to her mother's dripping organ, and with a few lazy swipes of her tongue, she made her mom's body stiffen with the slightest contact on her erect clitoris!!! Does mama want me to suck it harder, asked Jan mischievously!!! Oh, jesus, yes, Doris moan through gritted teeth, take care of mama's vagina, please, honey?!? Chuckling to herself at her mother's desperation, Jan took the plunge and buried her face into her mother's swollen crack, which of course caused her mother to convulse with pleasure as a shock wave of lust swept through her body!!! As Jan sucked on her mom's pubis, she remembered her promise to Scottie that they would only be half an hour, so much to her mother's excitement, Jan began working her mother's clit with almost brutal abandon! Doris pushed her crotch hard into her daughter's face, while at the same time her own mouth was making love to her boy friend's erection!!! When Jan felt that her mother was right on the edge, she pulled away for just a second and ordered, Okay, all together now, let's cum!!! Diving back in, she quickly found her mother's clit and using her tongue, she flicked back and forth across the little bulging head until her mother bucked against her face and flooded her mouth with sweet pussy juice!!! Scottie couldn't take much more of this torture, and seeing the older woman cream his girl friend's face, well that did it, and his thick pecker unleashed a torrent of hot cum into Doris' hungry mouth!!! Scottie pulled on his pants and was halfway out the door before Jan realized he was leaving.
 See you tomorrow, right, she called after him!?! Tomorrow, he yelled back!!! Now turning to her mother she said softly, He's a good boy isn't he mom!?! Patting her daughter on the cheek she replied, One of the best, dear, one of the best!!! Summary- During the Borg attack on Earth in The Best of Both Worlds, Counselor Troi is taken hostage and assimilated into the Borg collective.
 She is then returned to the Enterprise.
.
.
 to seduce and assimilate the crew! Disclaimer- Paramount and Viacom own Star Trek-The Next Generation and all of its characters, but the story of Troi of Borg is mine! If you like what you read and want me to write more, please e-mail me at: infinitetrek@hotmail.
com Please tell me what you like, what you'd like to see, and even any ideas for who Troi should seduce and how she should do it! I'll be posting more as I go.
.
.
 The Enterprise shook again as the Borg latched on with their tractor beam.
 Slowly the ship's shields were drained until they were non-existent, and that's when the true attack began.
 The first Borg was easily felled by Worf's phaser shot.
 The second Borg, however, had already adapted to the weapon's frequency.
 Commander Riker lunged at it, but it threw him aside like a slab of meat.
 The third Borg soldier beamed on virtually unnoticed behind Captain Picard.
 In a second, it had injected him with a sedative in order to transport him back to their cube without incident, but before the return transporter beam could be activated, someone interfered.
 This is where the history of this universe veered off course from almost every other universe.
 Counselor Deanna Troi, seated behind the Captain when the attack began, lunged herself forward at the Borg who had injected Picard.
 Unfortunately, her assault did little except give the Borg another hostage.
 Troi looked around herself at the arching Borg architecture.
 Beside her, Captain Picard was cradled in the arms of the Borg who had attacked him.
 Troi stayed absolutely still.
 She hoped that if she didn't appear threatening, the Borg soldier might ignore her.
 It did not.
 TROI, DEANNA, COUNSELOR OF THE U.
S.
S.
 ENTERPRISE, the Borg group mind announced at once.
 YOUR PRESENCE WAS UNEXPECTED.
 HOWEVER, WE MAY BE ABLE TO FIND A USE FOR YOU.
 Two Borg soldiers grabbed her from behind and dragged her away.
 There was nothing she could do to stop them.
 Deanna Troi next awoke on a cold, metal bed.
 There were Borg soldiers all around her, and as much as she tried, she could not move.
 She didn't see any restraints on the bed, but she assumed that there were forcefields holding her in place.
 The Borg soldiers around her continued milling back and forth, apparently oblivious to her regaining consciousness.
 Well, she would fix that.
 Why are you holding me here? What do you want with me? At first, she didn't expect that she would get an answer, and so she was surprised when the group mind responded, WE HAVE TAKEN CAPTAIN PICARD TO ACT AS OUR VOICE TO YOUR PEOPLE.
 HOWEVER, WE HAVE LEARNED FROM PAST EXPERIENCE THAT MANY RACES SIMILAR TO YOURS WILL ATTEMPT TO RESIST US.
 RESISTANCE IS FUTILE.
 WE THEREFORE HAVE ESTABLISHED BACK-UP PLANS, TO INSURE OUR ASSIMILATION OF NEW RACES.
 YOU ARE ONE SUCH BACK-UP PLAN.
 What.
.
.
 what are you going to do to me? Troi asked.
 She couldn't sense anything from the Borg around her.
 It was like they weren't even there.
 THE FIRST THING WE WILL DO IS ASSIMILATE YOU INTO THE COLLECTIVE, the group mind told her.
 WE WILL THEN MODIFY YOUR BODY ENOUGH TO FIT OUR NEEDS.
 How.
.
.
 what do you mean? Troi demanded, and in that instant a Borg soldier turned to her.
 It ran it's mechanical hand down her uniform, slicing it open with a built in laser.
 When her uniform was sufficiently separated, the Borg soldier removed the remaining cloth.
 WE MUST INSURE THAT THE ASSIMILATION PROCESS PROGRESSES SMOOTHLY, the Borg voice told her, although Troi wasn't sure exactly why.
 YOU WILL NOW BE ASSIMILATED.
 Troi noticed another Borg soldier moving toward her, it's hand outstretched, and she began to struggle yet again in her bonds.
 Her legs flailed as much as they could in her captive state, and her breasts bounced from her motions, but she couldn't prevent the Borg's assault.
 Twin tubes extended from its hand and entered her neck.
 At that moment, Deanna knew it was all over.
 Deanna felt something in her body, something that wasn't there before, and then suddenly she realized what it was.
 The Borg had injected her with nanoprobes that were moving through her, assimilating her blood cells and reproducing.
 Her mind reeled in the sudden comprehension that it was the very process of her being assimilated that had made her aware of it.
 Deanna watched in horror as the Borg probes began having a more noticeable effect on her body.
 Parts of her skin were actually growing mechanical implants.
.
.
 she saw one on her shoulder, one on her stomach, and one on her leg.
 She gasped for air as a new sensation hit her.
.
.
 the Borg probes, moving through her body, was making her heart pump faster, and her blood was racing through ever part of her body.
.
.
 every part.
 She felt her nipples harden as her blood filled them, and she felt her clit become enlarged and sensitive as the same thing happened there.
 Her mind reeled again.
.
.
 here she was, being assimilated by the Borg.
.
.
 and she was becoming horny! The assimilation process continued into her brain, and she began to hear the group mind calling to her, attempting to embrace her even as she hid.
 The assimilation of her nerve center only made the sensations she was feeling even more pleasurable.
 Her pussy was soaked with juices, and she longed to be able to touch it, to bring herself to the orgasm she craved.
 And then she felt the nanoprobes break through.
 The metallic implants were growing on her already sensitive nipples, making her moan ever so slightly in pleasure.
 And then the assimilation of her clit began.
.
.
 the cold metal growing on her, and it drove her crazy.
 Oh God! she screamed, a tear running down her face.
 Not only were the Borg assimilating her, they were raping her.
 But was there really a difference? Deanna continued to scream in uncontrollable ecstasy and her body squirmed in pleasure.
 Finally, she felt it come.
 The orgasm washed over her, making her momentarily forget where she was and what was happening to her.
 Her eyes closed, her head was thrown back, and her back arched as she came.
.
.
 the most powerful orgasm in her life.
 Pleasure coursed through every part of her mind.
.
.
 and then stopped.
 Deanna's body collapsed back on the bed.
 Her breathing slowed, her hands unclenched.
 Slowly her eyes opened, and Deanna stared into empty space.
 Her face was expressionless.
 Even after what she had experienced, she felt nothing now.
 The forcefields that had been restraining her retracted, and she stood like a puppet on a string.
 The sweat that had collected on her body began to race down her skin in tiny droplets, but she didn't notice.
 She just stood, posture perfect, breasts jutted out, arms at her side, eyes seeing nothing.
 And then she spoke, but it was no longer Deanna Troi.
 Her voice was mechanical, tinny, and completely without emotion.
 WE ARE BORG, she said.
 I am picking up lifesigns.
.
.
 very faint, Lieutenant Worf announced.
 This way.
 The rest of the away team followed Lieutenant Worf through the bowels of the Borg ship.
 The four of them: Commander Shelby, Commander Data, Doctor Crusher, and Worf had been given a very simple assignment.
.
.
 rescue Captain Picard and Counselor Troi.
 They had already found Captain Picard's uniform in a drawer.
.
.
 indicating that the Borg were either running all sorts of tests on him.
.
.
 or he was running through the Borg ship naked.
 All right, let's take out a few of the nodes and see what happens, Commander Shelby ordered.
 Although they had known her for less than a week, the Enterprise crewmembers obeyed her order.
 After all, they were in this together.
 Data fired his phaser at the pyramid-shaped device on the ceiling of the Borg corridor.
.
.
 and nothing happened.
 He nodded to Worf, and together they took aim and fired.
 The green node exploded in a flash of light and the Borg ship experienced a temporary power drain.
 The attack was sufficient to get the Borgs' attention.
 Borg soldiers closed in on the away team from all sides, and it was only a few seconds before the Borg had adapted to the team's phaser fire.
 But then, the away team discovered another problem.
 Jean-Luc, Beverly whispered, the first of the team to notice.
 Shelby was next, and she was barely able to suppress a gasp.
 Captain! Worf exclaimed.
 There was Captain Picard, a metallic eye implant imbedded on his face, surrounded by Borg soldiers.
 It didn't take long for the team to realize what had happened to their friend and commanding officer: the Borg were making him one of their own.
 And next to Picard, unconscious and crumpled up against a wall, was Counselor Troi.
 Worf charged at Picard, hoping to attain contact with his captain long enough to beam him back to the ship.
 Unfortunately, Picard refused to cooperate.
 A forcefield knocked Worf down, staggering him slightly.
 Still, he was able to grab onto Counselor Troi before Commander Shelby gave the order to beam back to the ship.
 Captain Picard was left behind, but Counselor Troi was safe on the Enterprise again.
 Everything checks out, Commander, Doctor Crusher announced as she finished her final scan of Deanna.
 I guess the Borg were interested in her like they were in the Captain.
 They didn't touch her at all.
 Riker nodded.
 Can you wake her up? I'd like to talk to her.
 I think she's rested for long enough now, Beverly replied, pressing a hypospray into Deanna's neck.
 The Betazoid's eyelids fluttered a few times as she regained consciousness, and then her eyes focused on her surroundings.
 Will! she exclaimed.
 I'm back on the Enterprise! She paused, and her face filled with terror.
 The Captain! Did you get him back? Riker shook his head.
 Captain Picard has been.
.
.
 altered by the Borg, he told her.
 To put it bluntly, he is a Borg, now.
 We were able to recover you from the Borg ship, but he forced us to leave him behind.
 He then gave the Borg sufficient information to be prepared for our deflector blast.
 Troi looked concerned.
 I'm sure he would never do that of his own volition, she said.
 That's the thing, Riker agreed.
 To think that the Borg are manipulating him, using him completely against his will.
 It must be a horrible experience for him.
 Can we try to get him back again? Troi asked.
 Riker shook his head.
 Not until we finish fixing the warp drive.
 That deflector blast left it pretty much worthless.
 When we get it up and working again, we'll try one more time.
 In the meantime, I think Doctor Crusher wants you to rest here.
 I'll come check in on you later.
 Deanna smiled and thanked Riker for his concern.
 After he left and she was alone, Deanna Troi did something no one would have expected: she ran a self-diagnostic.
 Everything was operating within established limits.
 Her Borg implants had completely hidden themselves beneath her skin, and she knew that no scan done on her would detect them.
 Of course, the Borg had also given her something else besides her new implant: a new being.
 Not only had they assimilated her completely into the collective, but they had combined her with their very essence, what in human terms could best be termed as their queen.
 The joining had resulting in an interesting new personality.
 Deanna Troi, being half-Betazoid, was already very sensual before her assimilation.
 The Borg Queen, on the other hand, loved the thrill of being in power, and loved even more exerting that power on other people.
 She also noticed that her senses had been enhanced as well.
 Her sense of smell picked up pheromones much better than they had before, and her empathic sense now detected even the slightest trace of arousal in a person, given her an inside view of what turned any person on.
 Her new outlook on the people around her, in concert with the Borg implants sending minuscule electrical charges through her nipples and clit, left her in a constant state of arousal.
 She was hot, horny, and she needed satisfaction.
 And since she couldn't do that here in sickbay without being noticed, she instructed the Borg implant in her clit to stimulate her more.
.
.
 until, unnoticed by anyone, she brought herself to orgasm.
 She reset all of her bodily functions.
.
.
 heart rate, pulse, temperature, back to normal and pretended to fall asleep.
 Her adventures on this ship would be very interesting indeed.
 The Enterprise, under the commander of Captain William Riker and Commander Elizabeth Shelby, did eventually rescue Captain Picard, and with his help they were able to destroy the Borg ship.
 Captain Picard was cut from the Borg link, and after that he was slowly able to return to normal, but this was not true for Deanna Troi.
 The Borg Queen held her grasp on the Betazoid, even during the destruction of her ship, and now the Federation celebrated the defeat of their most powerful enemy.
.
.
 not knowing that the threat was even greater now.
 Deanna Troi walked down the corridor of the Enterprise that led to the guest quarters.
 Now that the crisis was over, she hoped that she would be able to.
.
.
 quench some of the desires she had experienced since her assimilation.
 After all, some things just aren't done during a battle.
 She stopped outside a door and pressed the chime.
 The doors parted for her.
 She loved how everything seemed to obey her.
 Commander.
 May I come in? Commander Shelby nodded to the woman in the doorway.
 Of course you can, Counselor.
 What can I do for you? Troi stepped into Shelby's quarters and the doors slid shut behind her.
 I hear you're leaving the ship, she stated.
 I've been assigned to work on the taskforce, Shelby told her.
 We need to get the fleet back up after the attack on Wolf 359.
 But that's not the only reason you're leaving, is it, Elizabeth? Troi asked.
 Shelby tugged at her uniform top.
 Was it just her, or was it getting hot in here? She had to sit down, and so she did so on the couch.
 I will admit that ever since I arrived on the Enterprise, I haven't exactly felt like I fit in.
 Troi sat down in the chair across from her.
 Well, perhaps sat was the wrong word.
 Lounged perhaps? No, that wasn't it either.
 Deanna sat with her legs slightly parted and the top half of her body leaned forward, given Shelby a view of the Counselor's breasts.
 For some reason, Shelby couldn't help but steal a few glimpses.
 What? Shelby asked, snapping out of her thoughts.
 What did you say? Deanna came to sat next to Shelby on the couch.
 I was wondering if there was anything on the Enterprise you might miss, she repeated.
 To Shelby, her voice sounded.
.
.
 compelling.
 A few things, I'm sure, Shelby muttered, totally entranced by the Counselor's eyes.
 It was getting even hotter in her quarters.
.
.
 maybe the environmental controls were malfunctioning? And there was an odor coming from somewhere.
.
.
 it was getting Shelby very excited.
 Deanna suddenly stood up and reached behind her back.
 Shelby heard a zipper being undone, and the next thing she knew, the Counselor was standing naked in front of her.
 She cupped her breasts in her hands.
 A few things? Like these? she asked softly.
 Shelby nodded without saying a word.
 Something strange was going on, but at the moment, she didn't really care.
 I've seen you look at them, Deanna went on, went you thought I wasn't looking.
 And I know what you want to do.
 Don't worry, everyone wants to.
 She sat back down next to Shelby and cupped her hand behind Shelby's head, drawing it in closer to her chest.
 Shelby licked her lips.
 She had never been this close to another woman's breast before.
.
.
 in fact, she had never wanted to be this close before.
 Now, she wanted nothing but to taste the Counselor's swollen nipples with her tongue.
 Indeed, the first touch was electric.
 That's good, Elizabeth.
 Lick my hard nipples.
 Mmmm, that feels so nice.
.
.
 your tongue is so soft! Deanna moaned as Shelby's tongue caressed her tit.
 Shelby had no idea what she was doing, and the Counselor almost seemed to sense her confusion.
 Let me make things clear for you, Commander, Deanna said as Shelby sucked her breasts with abandon.
 While I was on the Borg cube, they assimilated me into their collective.
 They have.
.
.
 supplemented my body to make me more appealing.
.
.
 to both men and women.
 The reason you felt yourself becoming hot was because you were detecting the high levels of pheromones I was producing.
 In fact, I still am producing them.
 She roughly removed Shelby's head from her chest and pushed it down between her legs.
 See? It's overwhelming, isn't it? Shelby's mind was racing.
 She should be calling security.
.
.
 letting them know what was happening to her.
 But for some reason, all she could do was press her face into Deanna's pussy.
 Shelby sucked up every last drop of Deanna's juices, unaware that the Counselor's wetness also included the Borg nanoprobes that had assimilated Troi.
 And so as Commander Shelby dug in deeper and deeper into Deanna's wet pussy, the Borg probes began assimilating her from the inside out.
 They began with her nipples and her clit, exciting Shelby even more so that her pumping blood rushed the nanites into her brain.
 The whole process took about a minute, until Shelby suddenly stopped eating out Troi.
 Deanna, who had seconds before been in complete ecstasy, smiled at Shelby evily.
 She watched as Shelby stood in front of her, posing as she had done just days before when she acquired her new life.
 The Commander's eyes were blank, her mouth was covered in Deanna's juices.
 The whole show was so erotic that Troi couldn't help but slip her hand into her pussy.
 WE ARE BORG, Elizabeth Shelby said robotically.
 Troi smiled as she continued to rub herself: her first assimilation.
 It felt good.
 But her new personality wasn't done yet.
 The Borg Queen, inbedded deep within Troi's mind, withdrew it's control from the woman, leaving her as mindless as Shelby.
 Troi stood next to Shelby, in the same posture perfect postion.
 WE ARE BORG, Troi stated monotonously.
 Take off your clothes, the Borg Queen ordered.
 The Borg-Shelby responded quickly, tearing off the uniform of the Starfleet officer she no longer was.
 The metallic Borg implants had not yet begun hiding themselves, but the Queen didn't mind.
 In her mind, it made Shelby even sexier.
 In fact, she instructed the implants in Troi's body to show themselves, so that she would be able to watch two Borg drones going at it.
 The Borg Queen smiled wickedly again (or at least she would have if she had a face) as she sent her next command telepathically.
 Shelby and Troi instantly obeyed, with Troi lying down on the couch and with Shelby turning slightly to line her own wet pussy up with the Counselor's mouth.
 Troi began flicking Shelby's hard clit with her tongue, and through the link they now shared, she felt the same sensation in her own clit.
 And when Shelby actually began eating her again, the pleasure was two-fold.
 Each of them felt the sensation of two tongues probing their wet pussies and attacking their sensitive clits, and when they came, they came together and shared the orgasm.
 And the Borg Queen felt it all.
 The Queen then re-established her dual control of Deanna, and Troi ordered Shelby to stand, even though the woman's legs were wobbly and did little to support her.
 Their Borg implants had hidden themselves under naked skin, and now they both looked as normal as they had before their assimilation.
 I'll now return the control of your body to your new protocol programs.
 They will create a personality that mimics that of Commander Shelby so that you will be able to live everyday life, Troi told her.
 Shelby blinked twice, and then her eyes came alive as her personality activated.
 I will continue to serve the Borg, and I will continue to serve you, my mistress, she said.
 The Counselor was pleased, and with a thought, she turned off Shelby's personality protocols and left her empty and robotic as a Borg drone again.
 There was no practical reason for this.
.
.
 she just enjoyed having complete control over her drones.
 I'd do more with you, but I know you need to be disembarking soon, she said.
 Get cleaned up, get dressed, and report to Captain Picard.
 You will then leave the Enterprise, and begin your new life as Shelby of Borg.
 I AM SHELBY OF BORG, Shelby said.
 RESISTANCE IS FUTILE.
 ALL WILL BE ASSIMILATED.
 ALL WILL BECOME ONE WITH THE BORG.
 WE ARE BORG.
 And Deanna Troi of Borg enjoyed the show with a finger deep in her wet pussy.
 She couldn't wait to assimilate her next victim.
 Beverly was taking a walk, eventually she planned to arrive at Ten Forward.
 Ever since her visit with Troi and her overwhelming need to hug her, she had felt strange.
 She wouldn't say that it excited her, but it was definitely having some kind of an effect.
 The more she walked, the hotter it got.
 'Boy, I am out of shape'.
 she thought.
 It wasn't until she turned a corner and bumped into an unfamiliar lieutenant.
 She stepped back, and her usually impeccable red hair fell into her eyes.
 She looked upon the man in front of her not as a fellow officer, but as a pure instrument of her desire.
 She felt every inch of her skin, some inches felt a lot better than others.
 Excuse me sir.
 Sorry.
 Said the officer clad in a yellow uniform as he attempted to steady the higher ranked officer in front of him.
 Her mind and body betrayed her.
 Her nipples were actually visible through her uniform.
 Her breath was coming quicker.
 'What's wrong with me.
' She forced through the haze in her mind.
 She didn't know what was happening, but she knew what was going happen.
 At this point, it was out of her hands, and in his.
 No, excuse me, I wasn't looking.
 She was letting him go, then, You know, I have never really like the term 'sir', why don't you call me Beverly.
 Um, OK, Beverly.
 I have to be getting to.
.
.
 Are you feeling OK? You look a little, warm.
 Warm no, Hot yes.
 I want to throw you down right here and fuck your brains out.
 He voice was whispery.
 Well, I am due to go on duty in a few minutes, but thanks for the offer.
 He said, completely shocked.
 I'll write you a note.
 Then she flung herself at him.
 Her lips were sealed to his, any resistance he had was quickly diminishing.
 Her body was on fire.
 She was kidding about fucking him in the corridor, but it was quickly becoming her only alternative.
 He broke the kiss.
 Jordan to Maintenance.
 Maintenance, go ahead Jordan I'm going to be a little late for my shift, Glancing at Beverly Medical reasons.
 Anything we should know about? No, I'll contact you later.
 Jordan out.
 'A janitor? I'm about to fuck a janitor? Who cares if I hump the doors of a turbo shaft?' She smiled and then took Janitor Jordan by the arm.
 Wesley was going over the latest batch of test samples.
 Everything looked like it was going smoothly.
 He began to hear Ro moaning.
 He thought she might be waking up.
 He spun around only to see Ro with one hand on her crotch, and one hand her breast.
 The readouts on the wall said that she was asleep, and her eyes were closed, but her hands were in warp speed.
 It was then that he noticed that several of her hormones were almost off of the scale.
 He stared back at Ro only to see something new and amazing.
 The front of her uniform began swelling.
 The more it swelled, the louder she moaned.
 Her other hand drifted up from between her legs, to start caressing her other breast.
 They were beginning to stretch the already tight fabric of the front of her uniform.
 He saw that the zipper at the top of the jumpsuit began to separate in response to the growth.
 Wesley's curiosity led his eyes down to the writhing woman's crotch.
 The front was completely sopped.
 Wesley had about all he could take.
 He couldn't decide whether to administer the cure, or to screw the Bajorian silly.
 He reached over and picked up the hypospray with the cure.
 He looked at it and said 'Oh well.
' He placed the injector to her arm, and then the images came flooding in.
 His mind was filled with images of he and Ro in positions that would have shocked even the crewmen of a deep space exploration ship.
 No! he cried, as he threw the hypospray back at the table.
 He grabbed the front of Ro's uniform and peeled it away from her white flesh.
 It was then he had a flash of brilliance.
 Computer.
 Reduce Gravity to 0.
00 on the Med Bed.
 The bed had this setting so that more delicate operations could be performed without risk to the patience health.
 With the gravity off, he was able to lift Ro off of the table and strip off her uniform.
 Starfleet's dress code when it comes to undergarments is pretty liberal.
 Ro's policy was even more liberal.
 As Wesley pulled the last of her uniform over her tiny feet, he was able to gaze upon every bit of Ro's body.
 She wore no underwear.
 Her breasts had nearly tripled in size at this point, and it looked like they were continuing.
 Ro had orgasmized at least four times while Wesley was pulling her uniform off of her.
 Wesley now stripped off his own uniform, and climbed into the Zero G with Ro.
 The momentum of lifting and pulling her uniform off had Ro in an almost standing position.
 Wesley lifted Ro up so her cunt was in line with his face.
 He could see that her fluids had run down and coated the backs of her legs from when she was still lying down on the table.
 Wesley dove in.
 The first touch sent waves of pleasure through the helpless alien in front of him.
 The wave continued and didn't seem to ebb at all.
 'Hmm.
.
.
' Wesley thought.
 'Sweet, not like what I would expect.
 Good thing she is already passed out.
 I don't think she would be conscious for much longer.
' He looked up and Ro's breasts had stopped growing.
 However from his current position he could see anything past the peaks of her breasts.
 'Boy I could use something like this when I'm walking across the campus when it's raining.
' He slowly pulled her down, and himself up.
 Luckily the beds were equipped with low level restraining fields to keep bodies from floating off.
 Once he was equal to her now gigantic breasts, he began to suck and bite at her nipples.
 Even though her breasts were now huge, her nipples were still what he would classified as normal.
 They seemed to still be fairly small compared to the melons on her chest.
 Once again the analytical side took over.
 He noticed that her muscles were much smaller.
 That must account for the increase in the upper regions.
 He grabbed her ass, it felt rounded, and he couldn't really tell but he thought her hips had also filled out.
 He wasn't completely familiar with Bajorian anatomy, but that was why the Academy required advanced biology.
 Suddenly, .
.
.
uuugh, Fuck meee.
 Pleeeease, I want.
.
.
 Ro was back to rubbing herself furiously on the crotch.
 This time both hands were buried, and pumping away.
 Wesley couldn't take it anymore.
 He spun her around and spread her ass.
 It wasn't a gentle entry, but it did the job.
 He had never taken this particular 'course' before, but since the other entry was otherwise occupied.
 Just as Wesley had pressed into her she froze.
 Wesley was afraid that she had woken up, then it happened.
 She let out a yell and her whole body shook.
 Wesley began pumping furiously.
 He could feel her contract as she was wracked with a constant orgasm, she pressed back harder and harder, pounding as hard as they both could.
 Wesley reached around and was massaging her tits.
 She still had both hands going at it.
 Then he felt it.
 Her breasts began to shrink a little.
 She was now panting and back to a low moan.
 Wesley knew something was going on, so he had to hurry.
 It didn't take much to push him over the edge.
 He came for what seemed like hours, but in this case it wasn't quite that long.
 Once he opened his eyes he found that they had fucked so hard they were upside down, and floating against the ceiling.
 He pushed off, pushed out of the field, and got off of the bed.
 While he got his uniform back on, he set the computer to bring his specimen slowly back to the table.
 He was in a hurry to get her uniform back on before she woke up when he heard Mmmf, Wesley? What happened? My clothes? My Breasts! Oh no, what have you done?' Indeed both breasts had stopped shrinking, but now she has almost no chest at all, only two little nubs for nipples.
 Then Wesley noticed that her figure had lost some of it's curviness as well.
 In fact her shape wasn't very different from his own.
 She started to get off of the bed.
 Computer, restraining field full strength.
 Wesley barked.
 The computer complied, a little rougher than he had intended.
 She was thrown back into a lying position, unable to move.
 Don't worry Ro, I can fix this.
 and Wesley started up his computer.
 End Part 4 Part 5 - Satisfaction Troi had been in her quarters for the last hour, in the dark.
 She had lowered the light level so she could relax.
 It had been a fairly busy day, and now that Beverly had stopped in, she had the added task of talking to Wesley.
 It wasn't that she was complaining, but it was all in the line of duty.
 As time passed he hands began to slowly roam around her body.
 She liked the way her new uniform made the other crewmen respect her, but it was a little harder to get off than her other outfit.
 She closed her eyes, and began to unzip the front of her uniform.
 As she sat there, she let her mind wander.
 Very clearly she saw that she was walking along one of the corridors of the Enterprise.
 She couldn't see clearly where, but she could see enough to make out general details.
 She turned a corner and bumped into the man of her dreams.
 She knew it was nobody real, but this was a fantasy.
 She had unzipped her uniform to the bottom of the zipper.
 She had her right hand running across the smooth silk of her panties.
 Occasionally she brushed her clit, and it sent shock waves through her.
 Her other hand pressed into the couch as if to steady herself.
 Back in her illusion she was being helped up by her fantasy man.
 Once she stood up, she brushed a tuft of red hair out of her eyes.
 The other person in her fantasy was there holding her.
 He said something that wasn't really audible, but she knew what it meant.
 She pounced on the chance and slammed her lips into his.
 Back in the real world the uniform had been slowly inched down past her ass, and was down around her knees.
 Both hands were now moving all over her body.
 She wanted this fantasy to last, and she was going to take it slow.
 At first he responded to the kiss, but then he pushed her away.
 She was disappointed, and she thought that it ended before it began.
 He said something, and then he took her by the arm and lead her down the corridor and into a cabin.
 Beverly already had her chest fully in view when Jordan opened the door to his quarters.
 He was afraid that someone might see her, and put an end to his fun.
 However once in the main room of his cabin, 'all bets, and clothes, were off!' he thought.
 Please, let's go.
 I need it.
 Please! Beverly pleaded.
 No, not yet my horny little doctor, I want to look at my good fortune.
 Just stand there.
 She had a very disappointed look on her face, but it quickly changed to a very anxious look.
 She quickly pulled the uniform off of the rest of her body.
 'God, it feels like I'm going to cum right here.
' She threw the uniform onto the table next to her companion, and then slid off her bra and panties.
 He looked at her, absorbing all he saw.
 Her breasts were firm, not perfect, but definitely not bad.
 After all, she wasn't a teenager.
 Her nipples were almost as bright red as her hair had looked in the bright lights of the corridor.
 She was definitely a red head, but the triangular patch of hair between her legs was darkened from the juices freely flowing.
 He watched as she began rubbing both her neck and her breasts.
 Her hand went up and began messing up her hair.
 She was beginning to shine all over from the sweat covering her body.
 Beverly had no idea what was going on.
 At this point she felt like she was along for the ride.
 She began to feel the beginning of an orgasm coming on, and almost falling over snapped her back to reality.
 Please.
 I really need to fuck.
 I'm so horny, I can't stand up anymore.
 Then don't.
 said Jordan, as he leaned back in a chair.
 Beverly didn't have to be told.
 She fell to her knees and crawled over to her Janitor on hands and knees.
 Even though she had completely removed all of her clothing, he had not.
 He hadn't even unzipped the front of his uniform.
 She ran her hands up the outside of his pant leg until she got to the prize.
 She could feel him hard as diamond.
 She couldn't wait for him to get his uniform off.
 She began to stroke and lick the outside of his uniform.
 After a few passes, she could make out most of the major veins in his penis.
 In fact she could name most of them, if she weren't busy at the moment.
 He began to moan, and she let her hands slide up his chest.
 Suddenly her fingers had slipped into his collar, and began to violently separate the front of his uniform.
 She pulled herself up, and at the same time spread her arms as far as they would go.
 The shock caused him to let out a little gasp, this was definitely not what he thought was coming next.
 By the time she was done, the rip extended part way down his right pant leg.
 She quickly grabbed his old style boxers (much to her surprise), and ripped them off.
 As she did this, her nails poked into the tender flesh between his legs.
 He let out a little yelp, and Beverly smiled devilishly.
 He leaned back and helped her up.
 Troi slammed herself down on her mystery man's cock.
 He wasn't overly big, but it's not the size that matters.
 She began to rock back and forth.
 She could feel him going deeper and deeper with every thrust.
 He leaned forward and began lightly kissing her nipples.
 He then gave her left nipple a bite, and a little tug.
 Her eyes popped open, and she gasped from the new experience.
 She looked at him, and he had a devilish grin on his face now.
 Turnabout is fair play.
 They locked in a deep and passionate kiss.
 They had stopped rocking while in this position.
 The kiss was so deep, her eyes watered.
 Once the kiss was broken, it was time to get down to business.
 She brushed her long hair out of her eyes, not that it mattered much now.
 She wrapped her arms around his back, and he locked on to her buttocks.
 They began to pull into each other.
 Troi thought that she was going to have black and blue marks all over her pelvis after this assault, but she didn't care.
 Slowly her senses began to shut down.
 First her vision went blank, then her ears rang and she no longer heard what sounded like two hands slowly clapping.
 The only thing that she felt was an orgasm unlike anything she had ever had before.
 Her eyes snapped open and she looked around her office.
 She had flipped over the coffee table in front of her.
 She slid down the couch and looked at the aftermath.
 There was a rather large sweat mark that covered the whole area where her body was.
 Where her crotch had been was a very large stain.
 Oh my, I don't know if that will come out she said.
 She knew anyone who came into the office now could have smelled her passion, but the air filters would remove that shortly.
 Maybe she would call maintenance and ask about getting that spot out.
 No, I'll just replicate a new cushion.
 Beverly could have sworn that she was in Troi's office when she opened her eyes.
 However she blinked once, and looked down to see herself still impaled on the now rapidly diminishing cock.
 She could see the cum other both of them mixing and oozing out of her.
 She quickly got up, and grabbed her uniform.
 She got a glance of herself in the top of the table, she was a mess.
 So, does what kind of note are you going to write for me? He smirked.
 Umm, I have to get back to work.
 Uh, thanks, it was great.
 She said as she pulled on her uniform.
 She couldn't find her underwear, and she didn't care.
 This was embarrassing.
 She didn't know what came over her.
 She zipped up the front of her uniform and headed for the door.
 Jordan was still naked and covered in fluids.
 She turned to him on the way out.
 He was holding up her panties.
 Can I keep these? He said as he sniffed them, As a souvenir? She didn't respond, she just walked out of the door.
 End Part 5 Part 6 - Explanations You may be able to get a doctor here in under a minute, but I can do the same with security! Now let me go! Ro was really getting upset.
 Go ahead and try.
 Wesley had no reaction.
 OK cadet.
 Ro to Security.
 Nothing.
 Ro to Worf! Still nothing.
 Computer, recognized Ro, access code Delta Omega Beta Four.
 There was not the familiar chirp from the computer.
 What is going on? There is no way you have that kind of security clearance.
 I don't, but the Chief Medical Officer does.
 You see Mom got upset with people always being bugged while in examinations, so once someone is on the beds, your communicator is 'off'.
 Also thanks to security for turning off the computer access.
 They figured it was better not to let people who are probably under duress access to the computer.
 So that was disabled as well.
 The only thing left on is a subroutine to notify the medical officer on duty.
 And at this moment, I am the Med on duty.
 Suddenly the terminal on the wall beeped.
 Wesley went over and punched some keys.
 He began chuckling to himself.
 Lieutenant Stewart Jordan.
 Only two months on ship.
 Assigned to.
.
 He blurted out a loud laugh.
 Engineering, Maintenance Engineering! She got nailed by a janitor! Well, that's not it.
 Computer, randomize virus to next configuration and continue program.
 He turned to Ro.
 I think she should be busy for a while.
 Now as for you.
 I hadn't accounted for my virus causing such a radical different effect on your 'species'.
 He inspected her completely naked, although extremely underdeveloped body.
 My original plan had been to make a virus that would slow down the aging process.
 It did it by stimulating different organs and glands to release the bodies own chemicals that assist in the body's own regeneration.
 As I experimented through last night, I found that I could isolate certain chemicals and cause a response in the body.
 From there it was simple to generate a virus that, once released, would help to set off slight imbalances that the body would automatically correct.
 The body itself caused the changes to take place.
 I gave you an injection to simply help the body to repair itself faster.
 Of course that was a projection on 'human' systems.
 I didn't think the change would be so radically different on another species.
 But it did, neat huh? Ro was barely listening to the Cadet spout his 'technobable'.
 She was more interested in trying to get out.
 By the time he had finished, she had given up for now, and waited for an opportunity.
 Yeah, virus, chemicals, interesting.
 But what happened to me? Can't you figure out a 'cure' for this virus? Wesley didn't know if Ro had any idea what Wesley had done to her.
 He wasn't even sure if she knew what her own body had done.
 He decided to go for broke.
 Ro, do you remember what happened to you after I gave you the injection? No, you injected me, and then I passed out.
 Why? What happened.
 Did you do anything to me? She suddenly looked a little alarmed.
 No, of course not.
 But you did have an interesting reaction.
 What kind of a reaction? Wesley, tell me! She was back a more authoritative tone.
 Well, you kinda, grew.
 I was monitoring the virus' progress, and it was working fine, even better than I hopped.
 Then some of the other glands in your system went crazy.
 Then you grew.
 What do you mean by 'grew'.
 You mean I became some kind of giant? No, not exactly.
 Wesley still hesitated.
 Explain, please! She was becoming concerned that she had changed into some kind of a monster.
 Well, you got rounder.
 He glanced at her and then away.
 Your, breasts geometrically increased there, uh, dimensions.
 And the rest of your body, uh, softened.
 You mean I became some kind of a sexual distortion of myself? Her voice raised a pitch.
 Um, yeah.
 Did anything else happen? No.
 He thought that he better hold back some.
 What he did could really get him in trouble.
 He turned back to the terminal.
 I don't understand.
 It shouldn't do that to you.
 I mean after the first test on myself worked so great.
 You injected yourself? Yes, but not with the same virus as I used on you.
 I tried a little variation that help to stimulate the chemicals used during active thought.
 Besides some strange readings I hadn't planned on, everything is working fine.
 I have some other experiments with different combinations, but you don't need to know about those.
 After a few minutes of staring at ceiling, Ro meekly asked, Wesley, can I have some clothes? I mean I don't have much of a body, but I still have pride.
 Please.
 Wesley considered the request, and then said simply, No.
 Turning back to the computer he started talking again.
 Hmm, there's something I'm missing.
 Wait, the hormone levels! Twenty minute later.
 Oh, Wesley, What? Ugh! Ro was squirming as much as she could in the restraining field.
 There was a pale blue light bathing her body, it was coming from an emitter on the wall.
 Excellent.
 That's it.
 These results are wonderful! Wesley was staring at the readouts on the wall.
 He was noting that the same hormonal imbalance was happening all over again.
 The results looked almost identical, except for the variations brought on by her being conscious.
 Ro was trying to control herself.
 She was a little startled when ray was turned on, but she was beginning to think clearly again.
 It felt like her body was being caressed all over.
 After she shook her head a little, she looked down her body.
 Much to her surprise, her breasts were back.
 Wesley.
 I don't know what you did, but it worked.
 Now get me off of this bed! She was able to sit up as she felt the field disappear.
 The blue field was still on her, but she was able to move.
 She tried to get off of the bed, but the familiar buzz of a force field stopped her.
 What? Un Uh.
 Were not through yet.
 I think that you will like this almost as much as I will.
 You see I have modified a field project to basically 'project' a much stronger version of the sonic showers.
 You have noticed the effects by now.
 Ro's had her body back all right, but her nipples were stiff, and she could feel herself definitely aroused.
 Wesley was right, it was like the sonic shower.
 Wesley punched a few buttons on the terminal.
 Ro could now turn to see what Wesley was doing.
 On the screen was a computer generated 3-D form, roughly her shape.
 Ah, now this is interesting.
 He turned to Ro.
 Now Ro.
 What would you like to look like? A teenager just out of puberty? He tapped a few keys.
 Ro felt the stimulation lessen.
 She felt her chest loosen a bit.
 She looked down at it.
 They had shrunk down to size that she was at before she had even heard of the Federation.
 Her waist was filled out a little, and she was almost as plain as when she woke up, almost.
 She definitely had a small amount of her sexuality still.
 How did you do that? Please stop.
 Just give me my body back.
 I swear I won't tell anyone.
 That was what Wesley wanted to hear.
 She was now confirming that he was now in control.
 No, not yet, I haven't shown you the best part yet.
 He turned to the keypad.
 The blue light flared up brighter and brighter.
 Ro felt the waves of pleasure building.
 It was much slower than the first blast, but this one didn't stop in it's rising intensity.
 She leaned back for a moment and relished the feeling.
 Then she felt strange all over.
 She leaned forward again.
 Her chest was back.
 She looked in horror back to Wesley.
 The model on the screen was changing.
 The breasts were filling in, and the hips were definitely becoming fuller.
 The model was her! She ran her hands over her breasts, down her stomach, and around to her buttocks.
 The whole pass gave her two pieces of information.
 She could feel her body actually changing, and she was very turned on.
 She had to resist the temptation to ask Wesley to help her again.
 Ah, the body is converting denser muscle tissue into fat cells.
 The loss of muscle tone accounts for the illusion of her looking taller.
 And man do her legs look good! I wonder how far she can go? Computer raise level of emitter by two times.
 He turned to her.
 The blue light filled the entire lab, and Ro began screaming in pleasure.
 Her body began to grow at a tremendous rate.
 After about a minute her breasts were too large for her to even put her arms around them.
 He waist was obscenely tiny, and as an added bonus her long hair was now over a meter long.
 The growth had stopped.
 I guess her body will not convert any more tissue.
 My my, now you I would love to fuck.
 Computer, scan patient.
 He began to tap the key pad.
 The virus construction screen came up.
 After a minute the screen blinked 'Working'.
 The three girls had walked naked into the trees and found a shady path, and their mindless progress had soothed Jan into a trance.
 It took effort to rouse herself, but it was worth it to be aware enough to see Tina becoming equally mesmerized, even while she tried to keep focus.
 And Tina looked very erotic in the control headset, especially when her slim body wore nothing else.
 Tell me what you are thinking, Tina.
 Tracy's assured voice woke them both without really freeing them from the reverie.
 AbouthowIcan--uhhhh! Tina staggered, reaching for her head again.
 As before, the hypnotic block paused her hands before they could reach the headset.
 You must obey, Tina.
 Tracy smiled but didn't look at her.
 Even when only i command you.
 Nnno.
 Tina panted.
 You .
 .
 .
 can't .
 .
 .
 Unless you can hold out until the compulsion fades, yes.
 They programmed me with more powerful ways to compel you if i need to, Tina.
 You will not resist those.
 But it is not hard to infer your thoughts.
 You have always been a very focused girl, with goals.
 You are trying to think of how to get out of the headset that keeps you docile.
 Tina kept walking, letting her breathing slow down.
 Jan, she said, straining.
 Can you hear me? Jan waited for Tracy to nod permission.
 Of course I can hear you, Tina.
 Jan, you have to fight what they're doing to us.
 They've done something to Tracy but you can-- They did something to me, too, Tina.
 Jan felt the air on her skin.
 They enslaved me.
 Jan is responding well to Their control, Tracy confirmed.
 You mean they 'corrected her thoughts'? Tina was bitter but not convinced.
 Tracy looked at Jan approvingly.
 Well, we can hear one, and see how corrected it is.
 Jan, do you remember how They took control of you? Tina had asked her the same thing, up against her, warm and needing her.
 Jan knew what she'd said then, about remembering the raid and the terror, and it was still true, but in a flat, black and white, out of focus way.
 Something better hummed into her head.
 Something that tasted like the pussy of a girl sleeping with her eyes open.
 Something They wanted her to think.
 Yes, Tracy.
 Of course I remember.
 You brought us here for Them to capture and control.
 Tina looked over at her sharply, despite what the headset must be doing to her ability to concentrate.
 Yes.
 Yes! She tricked us into-- I remember very clearly, Jan went on.
 Back at school, you explained to us that some aliens from a UFO had robotized you, and then programmed you to select other girls for Them to enslave also.
 Some of us got very excited.
 I know I wanted to touch myself.
 Jan gasped with the fictional heat.
 And, when you told us that, it awakened our ancestral memory that we're actually a slave species They're coming back to reclaim and control.
 It explained the erotic submissive dreams that each of us suddenly remembered having, and we knew it was true.
 We realized that becoming Their livestock again was our destiny, and of course we agreed that you should bring us to our Owners.
 We are stray heifers, but They have herded us in now.
 She looked over at Tina, who was gaping at her, and then traded smiles with Tracy.
 Of course, the redhead purred, among all those panting heifers, not everyone had your self-control.
 Did they, Jan? Jan felt that trigger another non-memory.
 She could almost feel Their tube around her as she stood rigid, stupefied by the strobelights, while They poured Their lovely shimmering nonsense into her.
 No, Tracy.
 Just seeing them succumb to it almost had me doing it.
 She let her voice drip with servile flattery.
 That's when you realized the whole bunch of us would probably be masturbating all the way here on the highway as we got closer to being taken.
 You told us it wouldn't be fair to the girls driving, who couldn't jill off.
 Even if we kept changing drivers it wouldn't work.
 But you offered to hypnotize us all and keep us in trance until we got here.
 We all agreed that would be cool.
 You kept us hypnotized while we set up the campsite to your specs.
 Nothing like being a will-less submissive to make someone a great team player.
 Jan giggled.
 You woke us to undress and eat, and we just had sex together until dark.
 Then we built the fire, and knelt, and stared into the flame.
 And waited for Them to come for us.
 Her voice hushed, remembering the worshipping girls' awe and the deeper arousal as the Owners' ship had become a blacker, nearer sky over their heads and settled slowly down .
 .
 .
 No, Tina said.
 She closed her eyes and shook her head.
 That didn't happen.
 None of that happened.
 No, it did not.
 Tracy turned where the path sloped downward.
 And Jan knows that.
 But she knows, as i do, that They could replace her memory with that and remove what you are thinking of now.
 She would not fight Them if They told her They would do that.
 Tina was silent for a while.
 Is that what your monsters are going to do to us? Brainwash us into believing this 'slave-species' crap and accepting their will? They are experimenting with that, Tina.
 Some of you will receive that programming, and be content as nothing but Their livestock.
 Others will be allowed to remember what really happened.
 How you ran and screamed and tried to escape Their will.
 But the girls They select to remember that will want to, because it will be addictively erotic to relive their capture, over and over.
 She laughed.
 That was my idea.
 i think.
 But They will compare how these affect your acceptance of Their ownership.
 Whichever mode makes a more devoted slavegirl will be what They standardize.
 Then, the other subjects will be brainwiped and reprogrammed with the more useful memories.
 Jan purred with the thought of it.
 That'll be so wonderful, Tracy.
 Whatever They tell us to think will be what makes us hottest.
 And most obedient.
 Your thoughts are completely correct now, Jan.
 Tracy's approval was colder, but it felt even better.
 Tina sobbed once.
 Later she asked, Why just girls, Tracy? Why not .
 .
 .
 breeding pairs? They're not Martians.
 Who 'needs women' this time? Tracy laughed.
 The Owners do not have gender.
 Poor Them, i suppose.
 i do not know if They are cloned; i think They are too complex to fission.
 Of course, i am ecstatic that They can somehow exist, so i can serve Them! Um.
 She swallowed.
 Anyways, They prefer female humans because we are both breeders and workers, and we are more suitable for mind-slavery.
 What? Jan was amazed that Tina's beleaguered mind still had room for indignation about that.
 In a vague way she shared it.
 Men resist mind control better? Quite the opposite, Tracy said, unperturbed.
 They are much more susceptible, especially with sex.
 However, the Owners discovered males tend to focus entirely on sex.
 Too little of their awareness can be kept on-task.
 They still have, so to speak, one thing on their minds.
 But since it is what controls their minds, they just get overwhelmed.
 We can function while still under total control.
 Some males can, but not enough for Their purposes.
 And only Their purposes matter.
 No one said anything as they walked on.
 Jan realized she had no idea where they were going, or what Tracy would tell them to do when they got there.
 But her absolute lack of need to think about it--to do anything but obey Tracy's commands--made her euphoric.
 Still, she felt badly for Tina, still fighting the soft pressure of Their superior power and Their obvious right to erase her freedom.
 For a second she wondered if she could tempt Tina by showing how intensely her own obedience was turning her on.
 Oh.
 I'm still trying to think for myself.
 Tracy will tell me what I must do.
 Jan relaxed and listened to Tina's rapid breathing.
 The free girl was almost moaning.
 Tell me, Tina, came Tracy's quiet, compelling whisper, what you are thinking this time.
 I'm .
 .
 .
 wondering.
 What they did to you.
 To make you accept their ownership.
 Tina seemed to perk up as she found a way to obey without revealing whatever she was trying to conceal.
 Jan thought again of betraying that to Tracy, but They hadn't programmed her to monitor Tina's obedience.
 Besides which, Jan herself wanted to hear how They'd made Tracy Their slave.
 Although, unlike Tina, she'd listen with pure envy.
 They walked for a while before Tracy said anything.
 i have already been programmed to discuss that, actually.
 They determined it could demoralize or perhaps seduce a non-brainwashed Earthling girl.
 How had that gone? Had Tracy looked up from her Psych 301 text a year ago and called silently to Them through the implant They controlled her with, offering her masters a new idea? Or had They put it together from what They scooped from her and then grafted it into her thoughts? Jan licked her lips, hoping Tracy would tell them that, too.
 They abducted you before, Tracy, didn't they? Tina seemed to be keeping the lethargy at bay, and Tracy was letting her.
 Two years ago.
 That was what happened to you.
 And the other girls.
 Yes, Tina.
 In another park.
 Tracy sighed, but it was just as she got into the pace of the tale.
 They came while we were sleeping.
 Well, i was awake, actually.
 Off in the bushes peeing, when Their ship came down overhead.
 She smiled crookedly, as if recounting an awkward date.
 i remember i screamed.
 Her grin was chillingly natural.
 Even then, i think it turned me on to be enslaved by something from a UFO.
 But i may just have been reprogrammed to think i remember getting hot for that.
 Mmm.
 They did not have the docility field that time, but They brought a paralyzing beam.
 kim and jessie and i just lay there.
 we could not even scream anymore.
 Tina made a sound like a sob.
 It was a few moments before she managed, Tracy, did they hurt you? Some.
 Tracy kept smiling.
 But They already knew about human bodies, so They had no need to probe too much.
 Mainly They wanted to know how to control human minds, and They were curious about hypnosis.
 They hypnotized each of us.
 we tried to resist.
 Without breaking step, Tracy reached down and touched herself.
 Mmmm.
 Ohhhh.
 Oh.
 Fight--um.
 Fighting it was useless.
 Almost.
 They had ways to make us sleepy and less resistant.
 They did have a docility projector, not a field like now but just a narrowcast to subdue large thinking-species specimens.
 It usually just blunts aggression.
 They did not even use it during the hypnosis, at first.
 Her eyes lit up.
 But human brains are wired differently.
 They found when They use it on humans, it makes us want to obey.
 They kept following the path's curve through the trees, sloping up to a low, forest-roofed ridge.
 They learned that after one of us found a way to resist the hypnotic machine They were using, and she broke loose.
 17.
 Tracy grinned and tilted her head.
 Well, actually, it was me.
 When 'i' am aware like this, They let me remember that i tried to get away from Them, because it turns me on so hard to know i failed.
 Anyways, They panicked with the beam and just meant to stun me .
 .
 .
 then, boing, i was willing to do whatever They wanted.
 They were just as surprised as i was.
 She chuckled.
 Of course, i was also mindless and utterly open to suggestion.
 First i just felt--empty.
 i dropped the tool or pipe or whatever i had grabbed and was brandishing at Them, when i forgot why i had it.
 Ideas seemed just as hard to hold on to.
 Then, when They told me to, i went right back to the hypnotic machine and climbed in.
 Her voice caught.
 my mind felt so--soft.
 So yielding.
 Suddenly i knew what it felt like to be putty in someone's hands.
 Just giving up and walking back to let them dismantle my mind was .
 .
 .
 ohhhhh .
 .
 .
 Hooh! They were actually hesitant, because at first They did not get how really obedient They had made me.
 i was too dopey to notice, though--even Their tentative commands rang in my head like pealing cathedral bells.
 It felt soooo good to obey.
 They asked me how i had resisted Their machine, before, and of course i told Them.
 She winked at Jan and waited until Tina had forced her gaze around before shaking her head.
 Hee.
 Made you look.
 No, Tina--i shan't tell you how.
 It would not help you.
 They have learned how to hypnotize even a resistant girl.
 But, as i was lying there, staring up at Them, wondering why it was so hard to think, kim and jessie were trying to stop me.
 They kept us in little cages when we weren't being tranced, and we could see and hear what They were doing to whichever of us They were working on.
 Jan thought about that.
 What could it be like to stand in a cage and watch Them brainwash another girl--but not want to be her? kim and jessie were screaming at me not to tell Them how i had resisted Their trance.
 She laughed.
 Poor things.
 they did not know my will had been turned off.
 But thennnn .
 .
 .
 Tracy's voice lowered.
 Then my new Owners saw i was wet.
 That was the end of that.
 In no time i was Their slave, and They were hypnotizing me more and more deeply.
 By the time They took jessie from her cage, i helped Them subdue her until she was docilized.
 i wanted to because They told me to want to.
 i was Theirs.
 Then, i helped Them make jessie Theirs, too.
 Tracy smiled nostalgically.
 When she stopped fighting it, They used both of us to bring kim out.
 i get hot just thinking about it.
 All They did was stand there and give orders, and kim was crying and thrashing, and the only ones who actually did the work were jessie and i.
 Perfect slaves--until we got even better.
 Tracy stopped walking when they reached the ridgetop.
 Jan and Tina stopped too, losing even the impulse to move when she was no longer leading them.
 All three of us wanted to help Them after that.
 They didn't need to lock us in the cages anymore, but They told us to stay there when They weren't using us, to keep from taking up space.
 When we were allowed to be awake and serve Them, we were eager to help Them find better ways to keep us controlled.
 we got to pleasure and sex-triggers pretty quickly.
 My god.
 Tina held her arms across her chest.
 Are those other two girls out entrapping others like us? Is that what you're--they're--going to program us to do? Tracy looked at her.
 No, Tina.
 After They learned much about how to control us, They prepared us to serve Them while They went offworld.
 They could have brainwashed us with Their orders and our sole purpose in life would have been to carry them out, but They also wanted to use us as remote probe units, and update our programming.
 They had experimented with brain implants on captive humans, but They modified the design, based on what They learned from turning jessie and kim and me into Their creatures.
 She shrugged and put her palms up.
 It did not quite work, at first.
 Or worked too well, maybe.
 kim's implant just turned her into this, well, orgasm.
 With lips.
 There was a feedback effect They did not anticipate, and her mind just .
 .
 .
 melted.
 she was alive, but lost in an endless climax, useless to Them.
 jessie tried to snap out of it when she saw kim curled up, drooling and humming and twitching.
 she was still compelled to obey Them but she started hating Them.
 What did you do, Tracy? Tina asked.
 When you saw that? i came hard, Tina.
 Then, when They told me to, i submitted to implantation.
 So you could die happy? Tina roused herself with the anger and aimed it at Tracy.
 kim did not die, Tina.
 And i did not want to be lost in climax like her.
 i was Their slave, and 'my' pleasure matters only as a way to reward and control me more deeply.
 When kim became nonfunctional, i hoped They would succeed in controlling me, so i could serve Their purposes.
 They did.
 As Their robot, i carry out all remote commands perfectly.
 They can control my 'conscious' persona, too.
 Though They never really need to, now.
 It chained my mind to Them after They released me, even when They moved offworld.
 They programmed me to infiltrate humanity and learn whether and how we can be mass-enslaved.
 So it was natural to change majors when i returned.
 Tina blinked, as though she had a question, but when Tracy looked brightly at her, she shook her head.
 She kept looking at Tracy, almost unbelievingly, but the shorter girl just stood there, matter-of-fact and as real as the trees around them.
 Jan let her eyes run lingeringly down Tracy's sleek nudity.
 She was mildly startled to realize Tracy was shiny, her freckled curves glistening with sunscreen.
 At some point after seducing Jan into the ship, she'd been told to apply it--maybe with the instructed help of another of the entranced girls.
 Jan could not picture her doing it on her own.
 The Owners had already decided Tracy would travel out of the saucer's shade.
 They take care of Their livestock.
 i am glad They found my mind suitable for this mission, Tracy affirmed.
 It was a brilliant idea of Theirs, after They helped me think it.
 i am Their research tool, subject, laboratory, and lab slut, all in one remote unit.
 Hee.
 i am like one of those Mars rovers--but way more fun at parties.
 She grinned, gleefully but with a cold sparkle in her eye.
 Speaking of which, one of my psych professors at the U saw me as lab slut material, too: new in the department, needing to make up credits.
 Eager to please.
 Tracy's nose crinkled adorably.
 And, she had a thing for redheads.
 She had me help her research some innovative conditioning techniques.
 If she could have kept herself from trying to addict me to her, she might have noticed my responses were anomalous.
 i doubt she would have read them as 'already-brainwashed alien slave,' but at least she might not have been careless enough to fuck me so often.
 Jan watched her grin sharpen.
 And leave herself so open for sexual imprinting while she did.
 Long story short, she changed careers.
 Her new one does not pay well, but that many small bills stuffed in her garter each night may feel like a lot to her.
 And i made sure she is not in it for the money.
 Jan felt a chill go up her spine--she'd thought the professor who'd quit to become a stripper was another urban legend--but it was a very nice sort of chill.
 She pictured the hapless woman swaying to the beat in a strobelit club, mesmerized and wet.
 Dreaming of Tracy as she writhed.
 Tracy's expression softened.
 When They accessed me the next time, that pleased Them.
 She started walking again, and Jan and Tina found themselves borne along with her.
 But i got a lot done in the rest of my time.
 They have no idea at the U, but i have done research for the equivalent of two doctorates.
 All for my Owners to extract through the implant.
 i have no use for the credit--its only value is equipping Them to control us.
 Tracy's voice shook with quiet pride and conviction, and to a tiny part of Jan's mind it was scarier than a fanatical scream.
 They had made Tracy believe.
 i am also used to process the data.
 Part of my value to Them as a collection unit is my human background.
 i am the lens They use to see human information, before They assess it Themselves.
 So much data, too! i was thrilled for Them, to see how thoroughly humans had already done the groundwork for their eventual subjugation.
 i read--everything.
 It gave me migraines until They told me to forget the pain.
 She smiled happily.
 Now They can use my brain and i feel nothing.
 i also carried out other experiments on suggestibility and behavior modification.
 i created a conditioning protocol that turned my RA into a dominatrix.
 That was fun.
 Version 1.
0 of her was a real sweetheart, but 2.
0 was blast to play with.
 Although i show bruises way too much--blamed a lot on my karate class.
 Then, after i moved out of the dorm, i hypnotized my housemates to 'help them study.
' Jan could see herself in a quiet room, surrendering to Tracy's soft insistent voice, learning to like the blankness, the posthypnotic suggestions.
 Gradually losing awareness of the other girls nodding off around her.
 The unfamiliar but erotic joy at obeying Tracy's instructions, agreeing with her ideas, pleasantly unable to remember .
 .
 .
 And .
 .
 .
 my landlady.
 Tracy smiled.
 Marlena.
 Rrr.
 She's about twice my age, and way hot but completely unaware of it, which just makes her hotter.
 Enslaving her was a way to test some serial recruitment scenarios.
 Tina stared at her.
 Have you just been creating slaves for them? She swallowed.
 Did you hypnotize me? Is that how you got us all to come with you? Tracy reached over and touched her forehead.
 Tina stood in a daze and just watched as she did.
 No, Tina.
 i have some control over one or two of the girls here--study buddies who let me entrance them--but not you.
 Not before They came here and tranquilized you all.
 While They were offworld, They were using me to test what i was learning, not to recruit.
 They will not harvest humans in quantity until They can ensure we will obey.
 my purpose--really, my reason to breathe--is to help Them do that.
 Tracy looked so--normal as she said all this.
 Who I Enslaved On My Summer Vacation.
 Tracy.
 Tina's voice was tight.
 You haven't said what happened to your other--friend.
 Jessie.
 True.
 Jan watched how the sunlight dappled Tracy's skin.
 my obedience pleased the Owners, but They decided testing it further was more useful than an additional remote unit.
 They instructed me to kill jessie.
 Jan's head spun, but her thighs loosened to think of Tracy, smiling and obedient, stepping remorselessly forward.
 Not even wanting to resist.
 That pertly pretty face, the last thing Jessie ever saw.
 Tina swayed and balled her fists, gaping at her.
 Tracy? No .
 .
 .
 she had to obey when They told her to hold still, Tracy beamed.
 And i lived to obey, when They told me to-- Tina screamed.
 18.
 The free girl bent at the waist and held her head.
 But as she straightened she was blinking.
 The headset uses feedback, Tracy told her.
 As your vestigial willpower tries to revive, the headset intensifies the soothing effect.
 The angrier you are, the more submissive you will become.
 Tina lowered her arms, looking at them in wonder.
 No.
 She looked up at Tracy.
 No, it's not.
 I can-- She blinked, and started breathing harder.
 I can think! She backed away a step and turned.
 Jan knew the headset had failed.
 She waited for Tracy to instruct her.
 Tina spun back to look at her.
 Jan! Come with me! We can-- Then she just ran toward Jan, reaching for her.
 Jan clearly remembered Sally trying to drag her off the first night.
 But there was no docility field here to put them both into trance.
 I must capture her for my Owners.
 Jan felt herself brace to hold Tina and bring them both down until Tracy commanded her--or the Owners turned Their girlbot back on.
 Tina stopped and almost fell.
 She'd seen Jan's eyes, and a small bark of dismay escaped her as she lunged out of reach and sprinted down the path, not looking back.
 Jan felt proud that her own obedience was so clear, but she was sorry it had frightened Tina away.
 Even as part of her cheered to see the other girl run like hell.
 Tracy stood still, smiling faintly.
 Nice ass.
 Tracy? She's getting away.
 She is running, Jan.
 Their control has malfunctioned.
 Howevvv-- The light went out of Tracy's eyes and she stiffened.
 In the sunscreen she looked like a gleaming statue as They accessed her.
 Her head rotated and her zombie stare impaled Jan's gaze.
 Jan went taut, doubly aroused to respond to Their direct command and to the impassive redhead They were using.
 Robot and Jan-unit will await another slave, the girlbot droned.
 Her eyes slid shut.
 Robot being reprogrammed.
 Tracy opened her eyes.
 Do not worry, Jan.
 They had me inject each of you with trackers while you were in trance.
 They will know where she goes.
 She will try to get to the cars, Jan said, enjoying the greasy feel of betraying the free girl.
 Of course she will, Tracy said, but grinned.
 Mmm.
 They brainwashed you well, Jan.
 Anyways, Tina may not be able to find the SUVs.
 And they are far, and she is barefoot.
 we are to wait here.
 i know what we must do.
 We will obey, Jan said fervently, and felt her pussy twitch.
 Yes.
 The two nude girls stood quietly on the woodland path.
 It was arousing just to look at Tracy as she waited serenely, but Jan was becoming damply conscious of her own willing paralysis.
 Impulses to chase Tina, to go to Tracy and eat her out, just to move kept slipping down the sides of her mind, as she kept submitting, breath by breath, to the soft restraints she'd been brainwashed into accepting.
 She had no will, and it was easy and sexy to wait to obey.
 She could speak, though.
 Tracy? Yes, Jan.
 If you killed Jessie on Their command, and They had brainfried Kim, then-- --how did all three of us return? Tracy smiled again.
 Such an active mind.
 Well.
 That might have occurred to me, but i was under Their spell when i strangled her and incapable of thinking anything contrary to Their command.
 But They realized a death would complicate reinserting me as Their remote unit.
 So They put an implant into jessie and a new one into kim, and They were able to operate both girls on a vegetative level.
 Jan gasped.
 They brought jessie back to life? Not really.
 But They got her basic biofunctions working again, with her lower brain slaved to one of Their ancillary computers.
 i helped Them burn some basic behaviors into both girls, and They looped them into self-contained routines in the implants.
 Essentially They turned kim and jessie into cyborgs, very simple ones with limited repertoires.
 Zombies.
 For real.
 She considered something like Tracy in girlbot mode, but never waking from it to grin at her.
 After They finished my programming and released us, the humans who found us diagnosed them as catatonic.
 Tracy giggled.
 i had a story ready of being attacked in our camp, fleeing through the forest--too lost and traumatized to know where we had been, so no one could go there to investigate and see the lack of evidence.
 Whenever they pressed me too hard i just fell apart on them.
 Actually, i think i did the crying part really well, although Tina screamed better just now than i ever managed to.
 The search, such as it was, was more limited since now it was for some badly-described felons.
 See, the authorities would have tried much harder, if they were looking for two lost coeds.
 It was good that They prepared the girls to send back with me.
 Sooo--the families wanted it hushed up, and while some rumors leaked out, overall no one heard the 'real' facts.
 Those who did were happy enough to leave us be.
 Tracy's pink nipples arrowed out as she remembered.
 Jan thought about being helplessly submissive to someone who'd gotten wet obeying commands like that, and got wet herself.
 Everyone was so proud of how well i held up.
 Especially after kim drowned herself a few months later, and jessie's heart just--stopped.
 their implants disposed of them, but quietly, and not mysteriously.
 The Owners were protected.
 Jan heard footsteps but felt no desire to turn away from Tracy to see who it was.
 Then she heard Tracy say, Speaking of cyborgs, now .
 .
 .
 Shelby stepped into view, her strong horsewoman's legs moving liquidly while her arms hung down and swung a little.
 Her eyes were unfocused.
 She was still nude, but wore one of the larger backpacks.
 As she moved, Jan could see a mechanical sameness in her step.
stood at attention upon reaching Tracy, and realized They had put an implant into the other girl's brain.
 She remembered Shelby spasming in her mine when Their docility effect overwhelmed her, and it loosened her thighs to see how easily They had found a way to make Shelby useful.
 She wondered if Shelby had died from what They and done to her, and was now a zombie like Tracy's friends, but she realized it didn't matter.
 Reanimated or simply plugged into Their systems, the girl was now like the horses she would never again ride--less than they, because she lived only to bear burdens now, and needed a command to spur her to move at all.
 Cyborg-Shelby rotated her head to see Jan, but gave no sign of recognition.
 Unblinking, she swiveled toward Tracy, then stopped.
 Jan realized an Owner back at the ship was using Shelby's senses to steer her.
 She wondered what it felt like, and then whether Shelby even felt anything.
 Tracy walked around the paused girlbot, who stood still, mouth slightly open, as Tracy opened the knapsack like a saddlebag.
 Jan saw two pairs of hiking boots emerge, and lock-top plastic bags with socks.
 She recognized her own boots, and Tracy, still unloading Shelby, caught her look.
 After the girls on cleanup were done, They questioned them about whose stuff was what--They knew this might happen.
 She dropped her own boots to the ground and tossed Jan hers, with some socks.
 Before settling to don her own, she strapped on a fanny pack.
 we will put these on and go to the SUVs, since even if Tina can find them she is on a longer route.
 Jan felt odd as she realized that Tina might actually make it, if she were faster and tougher and desperate enough.
 She remembered that Lisa had left her cell phone in the vehicle she'd ridden in.
 If Tina could use it to reach help .
 .
 .
 Jan wondered if her own brainwashing was permanent.
 Or, if humans interfered and took her and the Owners' other livestock from Them, could they take this blissful obedience away from her and make her think for herself again? She looked at Tracy, hypercompetent and utterly Theirs until she died.
 She stopped worrying.
 Shortly they were off along a narrower track.
 The Owner who was controlling Shelby turned her around, and at their next signal she slowly padded back to the ship unladen.
 Ahead of her, Jan just watched the redhead's lithe body as it moved.
 Wearing nothing but hiking boots and socks and the rakishly-slung pack made Tracy's nudity even more erotic somehow.
 Seeing her legs flex and her back dimple as she started onto some rocks, Jan was still on smooth ground as she stumbled.
 Tracy paused with one leg raised as if posing for a figure study.
 All right? Her eyes were full of knowing exactly what had distracted Jan.
 Jan had no will to hide how hungrily she looked at the other girl's delectable butt, and Tracy's laugh felt good as Their senior slave turned away to continue doing Their will.
 Jan followed her, brainwashed by Them and mesmerized by Tracy's lovely freckled ass.
 Then, just before a clearing, the ass stopped its pert swaying and Tracy's thighs came together as she stopped--robotized again.
 Jan stopped behind her, wondering if Tracy had any awareness left when They possessed her this way, and if she knew Jan was there, dutifully awaiting instructions.
 She watched a droplet of sweat bead on the nape of Tracy's neck and roll down her back, vanishing for a moment and then gleaming again at the top of her asscrack.
 She dreamed of kneeling to kiss it off with pursed lips and the tip of her tongue--and then succumbing to the need and sliding her mouth down to nose her way in toward Tracy's rosebud.
 The droplet vanished as Tracy turned to her, ending the little wetdream.
 The cleanup girls reported a compass was missing--one of the small ones.
 i wonder, she smirked, where clever Tina hid it.
 Too bad she could not ask you to tongue it out of her, she went on, and they shared a smile at Jan's new fixation.
 But of course you would not.
 No, Jan breathed, staring into the green eyes.
 I am Their slave.
 Yes.
 You are.
 You told Them about Tina's plan to take something from the campsite.
 She nodded at Jan's surprise.
 You were not told to remember.
 It was just after you were hypnotized inside the saucer.
 You very cooperatively answered many questions.
 Everything They asked about Tina.
 Such a helpful slave.
 Jan shivered.
 She was still certain that if They'd taken Tina instead, Tina would have held out somehow and not given up all of Jan's secrets.
 But the shame just made her feel softer and juicier to know how easily she'd been broken.
 Oh, yes, Jan.
 You are Their slave.
 Jan yielded to an impulse.
 Tina is Their slave, too, she declared.
 Their slaves should not escape.
 Their slaves must obey.
 Tina--must obey.
 Tracy breathed deeply.
 i know you want to kiss my ass, Jan.
 Among other things.
 And i would let you--if i had will.
 But first, right now, you look so perfectly Theirs that i would throw you down and fuck you silly.
 Her breath was ragged and Jan trembled, wanting to ask if she could beg.
 But They want Tina now.
 Jan nodded.
 Obeying Them was better than orgasms.
 They started walking again, on the heading the program in Tracy's mind had given them.
 19.
 Tracy's breath was soft and warm and regular against Jan's shoulderblade as they stood quietly beside the tree.
 Its leaves and a bush in front of it provided excellent cover, but even so Jan's darker tan would be harder to see than Tracy's defiant northern-European pallor, so she stood in front.
 With hypnotized patience, the two girls watched the SUVs and waited for Tina to come out of the woods.
 Jan had half-expected Them to put Tracy into robot mode now and then, but They had no need to issue progress reports.
 Jan stood a little straighter, as more tube-truths shimmered through her mind: she was just a slave, and had neither the right nor the slightest desire to expect updates or explanations.
 She was programmed.
 When situations triggered her, she would respond as instructed.
 If she was not programmed for one, she would relax into luxurious helplessness and wait for someone with will to tell her what to do.
 She must obey, and They had brainwashed her to make anything else impossible.
 It made her clit hum.
 The fanny pack They had sent to Tracy via pack-Shelby had yielded keys for the vehicles, and she and Jan already knew which one had been left with spare keys in the wheel well for an emergency.
 The task Tracy had given Jan then seemed odd, but that had only made Jan hotter to carry it out.
 She'd waited patiently afterward for orders until Tracy finished with her own work under the hood and led her off to hide.
 Then, there was just waiting, and feeling the nearby body of the robotized girl who controlled her.
 Jan? Yes, Tracy? What are we doing here? Tracy wasn't confused.
 She sounded like a teacher with a quiz, and Jan relaxed and answered.
 I don't know, Tracy.
 I must obey you.
 Very good, Jan.
 The other slave cupped her asscheek and ran a finger inward.
 But you may use your mind.
 What do you think my instructions are? Um--to capture Tina, and return her to our Owners so They can destroy her will.
 Tracy's hand was on her back now, soothing and possessive, and Jan just stood and stared forward until Tracy told her to do something else.
 How do you feel about that instruction, Jan? Jan sighed and leaned back onto the other girl's hand.
 I feel very happy, Tracy.
 I am Their slave and all I want to do is obey Their will.
 And I know Tina will love being Theirs too, after They make her obedient.
 She moved against Tracy's touch.
 It's just as you said it would be, Tracy.
 Outside the ship, when you were weakening me and preparing me for Them.
 I'm so glad you helped make me Theirs.
 She swallowed.
 Thank you, Tracy.
 I've never felt this right before.
 It's what I've been brainwashed to think, but it's true.
 B-but-- There was something else, too, rising under her like a hot thick wave, and in the new joy of having no will, she let it wash her away.
 But--she will fight it.
 Jan's voice was strange to her, low and fierce.
 She must be enslaved.
 Her resistance must be destroyed.
 She must obey.
 She must be mindstripped and made helpless.
 She-- Jan stopped instantly at a small pressure from the other girl's fingertips.
 Tracy let her be as she stopped shaking, the lust ebbing from her, only massaging her lightly like someone soothing a pet to remind her that she was one.
 That is a very good attitude, Jan.
 i did not know whether you would be this receptive to Their control.
 When They uploaded from my mind the girls i had selected as potential slaves, before i was instructed to bring you all here to Them, They saw that some of you might not be fully suitable.
 Some of you would make very intelligent slaves, but you might resist too intensely.
 Some of you might even have needed to be destroyed.
 Her hand moved up to Jan's neck, holding it tenderly.
 i am happy that They did not have to tell me to destroy you.
 Jan shivered at how close she'd come to being that terribly useless to Them.
 Of course, if They did, i would also have been very happy as i destroyed you.
 Jan thought about dying under the hand that caressed her now, and moaned.
 You do not need to speak, Jan.
 i know how you feel.
 Of course, that was because the Owners had probably downloaded into Tracy's mind everything They had done to Jan's, but to Jan it still sounded like empathy.
 Part of her conditioning was probably to fall into something like love with Their primary slave.
 It was an emotional shackle Tracy didn't need, but Jan loved the way it made her feel.
 They stood quietly for a while.
 Jan, i am going to program you now.
 There are some things i will need you to do when Tina arrives.
 Because i will be dealing with her, you will need to obey automatically.
 Turn, and look into my eyes.
 Jan pivoted to face the other girl.
 Her heart sped with the glimpse of Tracy's lithe, still body before she fell again into Tracy's unblinking green gaze, as instructed.
 Tracy could probably have tranced her with a word just as she'd stood.
 As Jan's thoughts started slowing down into emerald stillness, one of the last was how nice Tracy was to let her feel the thrill of hypnotic submission.
 Completely under the other girl's control now, she opened her mind and listened to Tracy speak, each soft command becoming part of her thoughts.
 Jan stood and juiced and went blanker.
 She was facing the clearing again when Tracy woke her.
 I have just been programmed.
 Now I can obey without even knowing why.
 Jan grunted as she came.
 Tracy might have laughed slightly, but Jan couldn't be sure.
 Or make herself turn to find out.
 Then Tina was there.
 Tina moved well, and no rustling of leaves betrayed her.
 But across the clearing where the vehicles stood, even a tanned girl stood out against the woods in nothing but her skin.
 She seemed to realize that and rose from a useless crouch, but she only stepped a little way from the treeline like a fawn wary of wolves.
 A hungry fawn, though, whose gaze was irresistibly drawn to the SUVs as though to food.
 Jan looked at her free friend's face and tried to see her eyes.
 It might just be her imagination, but Tina seemed dazed.
 She wondered if the mindnumbing headset had come back on, leaving Tina to make her way here on sheer inertia, helplessly obeying her last imperative--her own inner I must reach the cars.
 As if catching the same thought, Tina's hand rose to one of the metal strips that bound her head but had failed to bind her will.
 She'd probably been trying to get it off, and already the fidgeting had become unconscious.
 But Tina's body language was alert, and she might only be stunned that she'd made it this far.
 She looked rapidly from SUV to SUV, and then darted for the larger one they'd all agreed on as the getaway car in case they had to flee survivalists or pot growers--oddly, no one had joked about meeting aliens--and lost their keys in the retreat.
 They heard her little shriek when she tried the wrong wheel well, and then saw her sag with relief against the fender when she found the key caddy on the other side.
 The woods seemed to swallow up the alarm chirp as she opened it and climbed in, slamming it shut behind her.
 She locked herself in.
 The ignition's empty mutter was louder and uglier in the clearing, and then there was a muted squawk from the horn.
 The windshield was a mirror from this angle, but Jan could imagine Tina smacking the wheel--possibly with her head--as the engine didn't start.
 Nothing else happened.
 Tina might have wondered if the problem was deliberate, and why any pursuers hadn't just come after her.
 Jan did not know what she and Tracy were programmed to do if Tina just barricaded herself inside.
 But she didn't need to.
 The hood release popped.
 Then the door opened, and Tina's long lovely legs slid out.
 Looking warily around, the free girl moved quickly to raise the hood.
 In her hand she clutched Lisa's cell phone.
 She stepped up on the bumper to peer inside, looking artlessly sexy as she stretched and bent.
 No wiser about the malfunction, she dropped down, and looked around.
 Feeling safer, she rested a hand on the fender and raised the phone to her ear.
 Jan felt a faint stirring.
 They knew this spot was covered by a tower in the system, and as she watched, the one Earthling girl who had not yet been taught to obey her true Owners was calling the Earthling authorities for help.
 Then she saw Tina straighten, keeping the phone by her ear but letting her other hand fall from the side of the SUV to flop against her hip.
 Go to her, Tracy said, and followed as Jan stepped obediently through the leaves.
 Tina was facing them, and her body moved a little.
 She saw them, but dimly.
 Jan could see the free girl's eyelids droop and then rise as they were forced open.
 Tina's jaw was slack and even as she stood stiffly there was a looseness about her.
 As she came nearer, Jan heard an oscillating tone.
 It must be even louder in Tina's ear as the cell phone buzzed it into her head, and the other girl's eyelids were starting to flutter in synch with its changes.
 Jan remembered giving her own phone to the Owner who had asked for it, and watching Shelby surrender hers too.
 Her Owners had found a way to use even primitive Earthling technology to control Their errant livestock, and overridden the third phone with Their own tranquilizing signal.
 She smiled, and wondered if Tina was aware enough now to see it.
 It was a cruel thrill to hope the other girl knew Jan was exulting that They had won.
 Tracy came around them.
 She savored paralyzed Tina for a moment, and then glanced at Jan.
 Do not worry, Jan.
 When They brainwashed you, They programmed you to resist the tone induction.
 Also, They used Their sensor readings to tailor this to Tina's brainwaves.
 It would make any other Earthling girl tranquil and suggestible unless They had already corrected her thoughts.
 But it has opened the core of Tina's mind like an oiled key in a soft wet lock.
 She would eventually awaken from its effects, if she were left alone for an hour or so.
 Tracy licked her lips.
 But, of course, she has been left with us instead.
 Jan understood and kept smiling at Tina.
 They were will-less slaves, and she knew their Owners had prepared them to turn Tina into one of them.
 Tina trembled.
 In what the signal had left of her thoughts, she knew it, too.
 20.
 As Jan realized that, she felt things slide over each other in her head.
 It was a trigger Tracy had primed her with, and she was already responding mindlessly.
 She was Tracy's automaton, and the helpless obedience was too strong to spare her an orgasm.
 It was more erotic anyway.
 Stand still and look at Tina.
 Look only at Tina and wait.
 Jan straightened her hands by her sides.
 She looked only at Tina, and the free girl looked like a racy cell phone ad as she kept the unit by her head, letting the sound pulverize coherent thought.
 Her small breasts moved as she panted, wide-eyed as though the message on the phone shocked her.
 Tracy watched Tina intently and then wrapped herself around the spellbound girl.
 She peered avidly at her slack features, then stroked Tina's breasts and belly before sliding her hand across to cover the one holding the phone.
 Firmly but gently she forced it away from Tina's ear, and as she extracted the phone Tina's arm fell to her side.
 Tracy stepped away, and then turned off the phone.
 Even now, Tina was fighting the mind control.
 She closed her eyes and opened them, and her breathing was faster.
 Jan knew Tina could probably free herself from the trance in less than the hour Tracy had allotted.
 My friend's will is so strong.
 I must help destroy it now.
 Hot and transfixed by the nude girl struggling to think, Jan waited to be told how she could help.
 But when Tracy spoke, it was to Tina.
 It is too late, Tina.
 You have heard Their beautiful slave-call and it is echoing in your mind.
 You hear it, you want it, you drip for it.
 Tina's lips moved, reluctantly mouthing the words as Tracy's voice drove them into her.
 Your mind is blank and soft and open to me, Tina.
 Open and willing to accept the power of my Owners' truth.
 i do not resist Them.
 You cannot resist Them.
 You are in Their power and ready to be hypnotized.
 You will look now at Jan.
 She is your friend.
 She is a brainwashed slave.
 She belongs now to the Owners, and worships Them, and has no thought except to obey Them.
 Her mind and will are completely asleep.
 She is very happy, Tina.
 They have reprogrammed her and now she thinks only what They want her to think.
 Happy, erotic thoughts of mindless obedience and endless sex and doing as she is told.
 Tracy's chant tightened Jan's muscles as she hummed with the arousal of hearing the robot-girl say all that about her.
 She felt herself becoming more and more the perfect dronegirl Tracy was describing for Tina.
 You can share her bliss, Tina.
 You will keep staring at the beautiful brainwashed girl and as you do, becoming sleepy and aroused as you listen only to my voice, you will find yourself becoming more like her.
 More like Jan.
 More like brainwashed, obedient Jan-slave.
 Tina's eyes widened and could not look away from Jan.
 As Tracy talked her deeper, the free girl's world was shrinking to nothing but Jan, and Tracy was imprinting both of them with how much of a slave Jan was.
 Jan is hypnotized, Tina.
 She is so deeply hypnotized that her mind is no longer merely in a trance, but has been altered into something more, something better, something more controllable.
 Jan's arousal was unbearable but that just increased it, as she felt herself becoming more of an object with each word their green-eyed hypnotist murmured to them.
 She was falling into Tina's beginning surrender even as Tina was falling into Jan's utter submission.
 The feedback was erasing both their wills as each girl saw the other one becoming emptier, stiffer, more controlled.
 Dead to anything but Tracy's voice.
 She was hypnotized with the rest of you when They first drew you all to Their ship with those pretty swirling lights.
 Just remembering how they blinked and swirled makes you so sleepy, Tina.
 Yes, so sleepy.
 Tracy purred with approval as Tina's eyelids fluttered for a moment before rising again to resume her rapt stare at Jan.
 But not asleep.
 Later, inside the ship, Jan was hypnotized even more deeply by Their irresistible trance machine, to open her mind completely to Their conditioning.
 Now that she is Their brainwashed slave, even i can put her into a submissive trance to receive specific orders.
 Jan obeys without thought.
 As you will obey, Tina.
 Look into Jan's hypnotized eyes, Tina.
 They are blank and deep with the Owners' power in her, and as you look into them you feel that power streaming into your eyes, Tina, drugging your mind and helping you, too, become sleepy and subservient and eager to accept Their will as your will.
 Tina slightly, almost invisibly, nodded.
 Her breathing was slow and regular.
 A breeze came up and spoke through the leaves above them.
 Jan barely heard it, and Tina seemed deaf to it entirely.
 You are becoming just like Jan-slave, Tina, with each soft breath you take.
 Your mind is draining of all thought and your body is relaxed and aroused as you feel your will weakening and your desire to submit becoming more a part of how you think.
 Tina blinked and nodded.
 Tracy's words were so much clearer and stronger in her mind by now than anything else, and Jan felt the other girl's avid, desperate stare all over her body.
 She could almost see herself reflected in her friend's glassy eyes--her own brainwashed gaze, her blankly peaceful face, her long smooth limbs taut in attention to Their domination.
 She had become all Tina knew.
 She went tauter and blanker, pulling Tina with her deeper into slavery.
 They listened to Tracy as the other slave delicately wound Their chains around Tina's selfhood.
 There is nothing in your mind but my voice and the sight of this beautiful obedient slavegirl.
 Jan was resistant, as you used to be, but Jan submitted and became a very good girl.
 You are no longer resisting, Tina.
 You are still and attentive and focused on hearing and obeying me.
 You are a good girl now.
 You will do as you are told.
 Tina was succumbing.
 It was a quiet surrender, and Tina was so deep in trance now that even she didn't know she was giving up her will.
 Jan, slightly more aware, realized again that Tracy had turned her into Tina's hypnotic focus, a nude motionless slavegirl instead of a swinging bauble or a spiral.
 She felt honored to be that sort of tool.
 In a way it was even better than having a girl ride her mouth as stimulator.
 Instead of making Jan need to come, it just sent her deeper.
 Tracy's voice was a low music in her ears.
 She stopped thinking.
 Tina would see that and her own thoughts would fade.
 Jan stared into Tina's eyes, watching the light go out of them .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 .
 Tracy kissed her awake, and she tasted the redhead's tongue before her eyes focused.
 Tina stood rigid, staring through her head.
 Jan leaned against Tracy and realized that Tina looked like Tracy did, when They tweaked the implant and turned Tracy into Their girlbot.
 Is she obedient? she whispered.
 Obedient enough, Tracy whispered back, amused.
 The hypnosis will last well past the time it will take to return to Their ship and give her to Them for final brainwashing.
 She will not need anything like this anymore.
 Before waking Jan, Tracy had taken the inoperative docility headset from Tina.
 She one-handedly folded it to store in the fanny pack.
 Jan looked at the other girl, free no more.
 Tina might never even wake up again before They made her stare into the shimmering wall--if They even needed to, after Tracy's induction, to make Tina receptive to her tube reprogramming.
 Jan felt a distant regret, as if she wished she'd said goodbye.
 But she pressed closer to Tracy and knew that when Tina became functional as Their slave, she'd have so much more in common with Jan.
 With all of them.
 Mindless devotion to the Owners, willingness to obey, all the gifts Tracy had brought them here to receive.
 There was nothing to be sad about.
 I hope I was a useful hypnotic focus, she murmured into Tracy's hair.
 The redhead eased her away and peered into her eyes.
 Mmmm hypnotized groveling.
 i like it.
 So will the Owners, of course.
 i only speculated that you had an inner submissive--i had no idea she was this much of a suck-up.
 She tapped Jan's nose.
 i shan't hold it against you, Jan.
 If it makes you more Their slave, then it is good.
 It fits the profile more closely--addiction to the pleasure of obedience itself, not just to carrying out certain commands.
 In the end it is just how you react to Their control.
 we are still human, and we adapt to losing our individuality in individual ways.
 She smiled.
 Yes, i can appreciate irony.
 Each of the other slaves has her own way of becoming Their creature.
 Kelsey became some fanatical amazon, and Shaheen is just a sweet little balloon blown this way and that upon the wind of Their purposes.
 You turned out to be an eager bitch on the leash.
 She kissed Jan again, carefully.
 Much more than that, obviously.
 But it makes you wet just to feel the leather along your back.
 And you lick the hand that fastens it.
 i do not know if i was like that before, or if it is part of what They did to me to make me Theirs.
 But i feel that way now.
 Oh, do i ever.
 Tracy's mouth quirked.
 we are alike.
 Umm--you go, slavegirl! They laughed.
 Before Jan could be surprised at herself, Tracy snapped her fingers and she was drifting again, attentive and calm.
 Everything was pleasantly unfocused but Tracy's crisp commands.
 Lost in obeying them, she did not even register Tina's travel-worn feet or the need to save them from further injury.
 She only knelt to let the other girl mount her piggyback, and then stood, balancing the heavier weight of an Earthling while Tracy softly instructed the newest slave how to hang on.
 Carrying another girl was not like being an Owner's responsive steed, but it felt good.
 So did Tina's limp warmth and the firm grip of her arms, the startling heat and dampness of her pussy against Jan's back between the cool sweeps of her inner thighs.
 By her ear, Tina began whispering an obedience mantra Tracy must have taught her.
 Jan could not make out the words, but the flawless repetition and Tina's sleepy conviction soothed her into a walking rhythm.
 She stared at Tracy's ass as Tracy led them back to the flying saucer and their Owners, but part of her focused patiently on the pussy pressed into her back.
 After only a very few steps, Jan was deep in trance again It was 12:34 AM by the time they got back home.
 Allison's mind was all but fried.
 Laura sat sagely in the passenger seat, making quiet telepathic conversation.
 To Allison, they were nothing more than fleeting impressions.
 Two hours spent into the bar had destroyed any notion on sexual pleasure she might have previously harbored.
 She briefly remembered that she had not seen Laura participate in any sexual activities, indulging in nothing more than the occasional soul kiss with a sexy lady.
 Allison herself had remained passive--having been pleasured by the women present in the bar, under the careful supervision of her daughter.
 She parked the car in the garage.
 Got out without a word.
 Laura followed, as if everything was normal.
 They stepped into the house.
 Allison went to the living room and sat down.
 Laura fetched a few candles, lit them up, spread them around the room and shut all the lights.
 She was like an angel shining in the darkness.
 Allison felt sudden control returning to her.
 She stood up.
 Laura looked at her, straight in the eyes.
 Expecting fury to spontaneously explode inside her--Allison was surprised to feel.
.
.
 conflict.
 She was hesitating.
 She stood there, trembling.
 She could, at this very moment, run out the door.
 Scream for the police.
 The army.
 The FBI.
 She could scream her daughter had been kidnapped.
 Had been warped.
 She could pick up the phone and.
.
.
 Phone.
 The phone was ringing.
 Allison walked over to the cordless unit and picked it up.
 Mom! I've been trying to reach you all night! Did something happen? It was Julie.
 Allison had turned her back to Laura.
 She felt the urge to whisper secretly to her older daughter.
 Don't come back! Stay away! Send for doctors! Instead, she heard herself say Hello Julie.
 Nothing's wrong, don't worry.
 I've.
.
.
 she hesitated.
 She felt no compulsion, no loss of control.
 I've been out with Laura.
 A.
.
.
 girls' night out of sorts.
 She felt hands clasping her waist.
 Rubbing against her ass.
 A sudden impulse drove her to stick it out, giving Laura full access to her shapely bottom You guys went out without me?? No fair! Julie's tone was betraying genuine disappointment--they hadn't gone out as a family in quite some time.
 I'm sorry dear.
 I'll make it up to you somehow.
 She stifled a moan--Laura was kneeling behind her, hands under her skirt.
 She began removing her panties, slowly pulling them down her long legs.
 As the panties reached her ankles, Allison obediently stepped out of them.
 She glanced back and saw the smile on Laura's face.
 Where are you now Julie? Andrea's place? How was your day at school? As Julie answered, Allison felt fingers rising under her skirt, lifting it up.
 Hot breath caressed her ass cheeks.
 She felt Laura's tongue running up her crack.
 She spread her legs as her daughter nestled, nose lips and tongue brushing against her asshole.
 Her breath became shallow and her pulse raced.
 She was doing her best to pretend nothing was going on Are you all right mom? You sound out of breath Julie's voice seemed unsure at the other end of the line.
 Allison heard Laura giggle.
 Juices were flowing out of her slit and down the inside of her thighs.
 Suddenly, she bit off a scream, as Laura gently probed her budding clitoris.
 No.
.
.
No I'm.
.
.
fine Julie.
 I.
.
.
 just had to run over from the garage when your call came in, that's all.
 Laura shamelessly spoke, between licks up her mother's ass and gentle fingering of her mother's pussy.
 Tell her how much you'd like it if little Laura sucked your pussy, mom.
 Tell her how much you want me.
 How much you want her.
 How you want her to suck your tits and your pussy before you do the same to her.
 Allison cringed.
 Is that Laura I hear in the background? What's she saying? Julie asked.
 Allison quickly responded.
 Laura's a little.
.
.
 excited tonight.
 Maybe it wasn't such a great idea to let her drink even a little wine.
 Julie's tone indicated she hadn't heard Laura's words.
 As Allison closed her eyes, paying less and less attention to Julie's babble, she began to spread her legs wide, bending over, letting Laura in on all the fun.
 Laura raised herself slightly, and began ramming her tongue deep inside Allison's ass.
 The older woman began breathing heavily, keeping a hand over the phone receiver as she whispered to Laura: Yesss, Yessss, Ohhhh Yessss! Julie rambled on about her day, but Allison paid no more attention to her.
 It seemed as if she was penetrated from behind by a wet, slick serpent.
 Having never once considered anal sex, she now felt a huge orgasm well from deep inside her.
 Even as she shook, Julie finally decided to sign off.
 I guess I'll see you tomorrow, around suppertime, 'Kay? Allison managed to acknowledged, following up with a quick goodnight! As she hung up, a huge cry rose from her throat.
 Ohhh! Laura! Oh God!!! Lauraaaaaa! She fell to her knees, Laura's mouth steadfast on her rear.
 Wave after wave crashed inside her.
 She fell flat on her belly, feeling Laura's tongue gently lapping up and about around her fleshy cheeks.
 How? How did you? Allison finally managed.
 You felt so good inside me.
 Laura stood up, liking her lips sexily.
 I'm a fully mature sexual creature, mom.
 And I'm in love with you.
 She winked, and Allison smiled back.
 For the first time, she realized the truth.
 About her feelings towards Laura.
 And Julie.
 And womankind.
 It was a glorious revelation.
 Laura's smile widened as she saw, too, that her mother finally understood.
 Sitting up, the older woman stared, for the first time with loving admiration and uninhibited sexual lust, at the shapely body of her teenage daughter.
 Laura.
.
.
 I want you to know I'm not mad about what you did.
 I'm glad I finally came around.
 You gave me something wonderful, something so precious.
.
.
 Tears streaked down her face as she stood up and embraced the young girl--not as mother but as lover.
 They kissed, lips mashed, tongues dancing to a wonderful song.
 I've.
.
.
 I haven't even done anything to you yet! The guilt in Allison's voice was not for lusting after her little girl, but for not lusting enough.
 Laura laughed, her tears of joy shining in the candlelight.
 Mom, you did enough for me.
 Don't worry.
 Getting to taste you for the first time was all I hoped it would be.
 Allison smiled, remembering the encounter as if it had happened ages ago, in another time and place, where she was a prisoner of taboos.
 How do I make the transition, Laura? How do I become one with what you are? Allison was excited and impatient.
 She wanted to know all.
 To have the power.
 To use wisely, of course.
 But to use, side by side with her daughter, for the benefit of womankind.
 Laura glowed as she turned to the couch and sat down.
 She spread her legs, revealing white set of panties under her skirt.
 Allison walked over slowly, and kneeled in front of her waiting daughter.
 She ran her hands over her legs, her fingers brushing up against the outlines of the panties.
 They were already moist--it occurred to Allison that her daughter's female physiology probably had been altered.
 She seemed fuller and more shapely than any girl her age.
 Her juices flowed more abundantly.
 This was going to be a treat.
 She marveled as the panties were soon soaked.
 She observed how the material had become semi-transparent, how she could she her daughter's slit, her pink pussy lips, her clitoris.
 The raw scent of aroused female rose to Allison's nostrils, intoxicating her.
 Even more intoxicating was the fact that this was her daughter's scent--her own daughter's pussy, which she was about to lick and suck.
 Allison shivered in anticipation.
 her fingers grasped the edges of the drenched underwear and pulled gently.
 Laura brought her legs up like a good little girl, finally letting her mom take charge.
 She began to moan, her excitement already driving her mad with lust.
 Her little heart beat faster and faster in her chest as she thought of what her mother was about to do.
 She had waited for this moment for so long.
 She remembered the private fantasies she had always harbored for her mother and sister, and knew why she had been a perfect choice for those who made her what she was now.
 She praised them for it.
 For the wonderful gift she was about to receive.
 Allison stared in silent admiration.
 Her daughter's cunt was dripping with wetness.
 It pooled slowly on the sofa, and she licked it up.
 Winking at Laura, who was now moaning loudly and licking her lips, Allison moved closer.
 Her nose, her chin, her tongue hung before Laura's waiting pussy.
 Her lips parted slightly, and her tongue probed the pink folds of Laura's cunt.
 She was rewarded with a gush of liquid and a sudden squeal from the young girl.
 Allison smiled and continued her delightful torture, licking slowly, exploring Laura's wet slit with her hot tongue.
 She savored the taste of her daughter.
 She heard Laura moaning, whispering to her Ohhh Mom! I'm so hot for you.
.
.
 suck me.
.
.
 suck my pussyyyy.
.
.
 Her moans became screams as Allison intensified her licking, flicking her tongue on her daughter's exposed clitoris.
 Her lips pressed down on the pink folds, juices flowing on the corners of her mouth.
 Laura's hips gyrated, pushing forward into her mother's mouth.
 Allison felt strange sensations, impressions, as she continued to fuck Laura's cunt with her tongue.
 The very juices she was swallowing were.
.
.
 inducing some sort of transformation.
 Allison shuddered, her own pussy dripping as her mouth consumed Laura's.
 She was becoming Laura.
.
.
 turning into what she was.
 Her own moans rose in a chorus with her daughter's, as the full implications of her transformation were becoming clear to her.
 She felt a warm glow ebbing, from her pussy, her tits, the very insides of her body.
 She augmented the tempo, ramming her tongue deep inside Laura, sucking more and more of the wet cunt secretions.
 Laura began to shake like a leaf, her voice rising to a high pitch.
 OHHHH! MOM!!! YESSSSS! OHHHYESSS! DON'T STOP!!! OHHHH MOOOOOMMMM!! Juices squirted from Laura's pussy, drenching Allison's face.
 She lapped it all up, her mouth still playing with Laura's lips and love button.
 The young girl's orgasm was long and violent, spasms of pleasure coursing through her body, shaking her to the core of her being.
 To be the instrument of her mother's seduction and transformation was, perhaps, what had pushed her so far over the edge.
 She felt Allison's own body shake, felt the waves of pleasure ebbing from her mind as she, too, experienced orgasm.
 The mere task of sucking her daughter's pussy, of being seduced and of willingly getting on her hands and knees to lick Laura's cunt, was enough.
 Both women were in heaven, paralyzed by bliss.
 After several long minutes, the waves of pleasure subsided, and they returned to the earthly confines of their own living room.
 Allison slowly climbed onto the sofa, her hands roaming over Laura's young body.
 They merged into a lover's embrace.
 Laura could see her own wetness dripping from her mother's chin.
 They kissed slowly, their tongues roaming lazily across their lips and cheeks, Laura tasting herself as she licked her mother's chin clean.
 Even now, Allison's vision was becoming blurred.
 She was falling slowly into the deep sleep that characterized the transformation.
 Her mother's body was adjusting, her body chemistry changing--enhancing her physical and mental capacities.
 Laura smiled to her, kissing her forehead.
 Don't worry, mom.
 Sleep.
 Sleep well.
 I'll be here when you wake up.
 Her eyes betrayed only the deepest kind of love for Allison.
 She cradled her mother's body into her arms, letting her head rest in the crook of her neck.
 Though she was excited and impatient for the moment when Allison would wake up--changed forever--she, too, slept.
 7 - Sister Julie knew something strange was going on, but she couldn't put her finger on it.
 Mid-terms exams were behind her, so she took some time off to relax, before the last rush towards the finals.
 She appreciated spending some quality time with herself and with her mother and sister.
 She had broken up with her ex-boyfriend two months ago, and was beginning to get back into the single's mind-set.
 There were a lot of sexy and available guys at school--and hunting season was open! She helped along by taking on a few more chores around the house.
 She also took the opportunity to nag Allison and Laura about their night out, and how they had picked one of the few evenings of the semester when she wasn't around to have fun.
 Allison and Laura exchanged knowing glances--which Julie found unsettling somehow--and smiled broadly, promising that she would get her chance to go out with them soon enough.
 In the meantime, life went on as before.
 Julie began to notice little things.
 For one thing, she was prey to sudden dizzy spells, that left her woozing for a few seconds.
 She didn't think much of it at the time, but they were beginning to worry her slightly.
 Occasionally, they would occur as she spoke to Allison or Laura.
 They did not seem to notice, so she figured it wasn't serious.
 She did worry about her mother and sister's behavior, though.
 At first, she though she was seeing things.
 But the evidence was getting harder and harder to ignore.
 For one thing, they sometimes looked at each other, not speaking a word.
 On these occasions, Julie could almost feel there was a flow of information going back and forth between the two--without a word being spoken.
 At first, Julie felt she had observed these exchanges without being noticed, but she would sometimes see Allison of Laura turn to her, staring her straight in the eye, as if she had been caught peeking.
 It worried her.
 Another strange thing: the household dress-code.
 Growing up without a man in the house, Julie was used to seeing her mother or sister in a state of partial or total nudity.
 She had never thought much of it--it just seemed normal.
 The natural instinct to cover-up or hide one's nudity wasn't programmed into her psyche, as there had been no males in the house for a long, long time.
 She had caught Laura peeking at her when she got out of the shower a few times over the years, and wrote it off as simple curiosity.
 Her younger sister, she reminded herself, was a curious girl--it was only normal for her to be interested in how the female body, and how it matured.
 But over the last two weeks, it seemed as if Laura and Allison were.
.
.
well.
.
.
flaunting their nudity.
 Julie would constantly intrude only to find her mother or sister in a state of undress.
 Taking off a sweater, coming out of the shower.
.
.
 she was now careful to knock before entering any room in the house, and still Allison and Laura would make a point of dropping the towel accidentally or complaining about how the fabric of a shirt before taking it off.
 She was getting strange vibes.
 Images began to emerge in the back of her head, but her conscious self could not grasp them fully.
 She also noticed that Allison and Laura seemed more.
.
.
 feminine.
 Their breasts seemed fuller, more firm.
 Their waists were narrow and their bellies flat.
 Like both had gone on a supermodel miracle diet and exercise program.
 Strange.
.
.
 One morning, Julie arrived in the kitchen, in a slight hurry.
 Grabbing a muffin and pouring herself orange juice, she sat at the kitchen table and reviewed her math notes for an upcoming quiz.
 Laura was sitting across from her, and her mother was up and about, making tea while keeping an eye on the toasts.
 She noted that her mother's nightgown was tied loosely, offering a generous glimpse of her full breasts.
 Julie ignored the usual morning banter, concentrating on her notes.
 She saw Allison bringing jam and toast to the table, from the corner of her eye.
 She munched on her muffin absentmindedly.
 Laura spoke up: Mom, are we out of milk again? Allison: I'm sorry dear.
 I'll get some today, Okay? A pause.
 If you want, you can drink some the old fashion way.
 The comment didn't really register, Julie being too preoccupied with formulas.
 Laura: Are you sure mom? You don't mind? Allison: Of course I don't dear.
 Here.
 Julie's eyes lifted from the page she was reading.
 Laura had shifted in her seat, turning to her mother, who was standing close to her.
 Very close.
 Allison suddenly pulled at her nightgown, exposing her white, heavy breast.
 Laura stared at it, smiling in admiration.
 Her mother put a gentle hand behind the head of her younger sister, and gently guided her mouth to the nipple.
 Laura began to lick around the breast.
 The pink tongue flickered over the nipple, which began to stiffen.
 Allison was moaning softly.
 Ooo.
.
.
 yesss, Laura.
 That's a good girl.
.
.
 that's it.
.
.
 get it hard first.
 Julie was petrified.
 She could not believe what was happening right in front of her eyes! Her sister, eyes closed, was suckling at her mother's breast! Her mother stood next to her, a willing participant! Bells went off in Julie's head.
 Her mother's moans were more than a little alarming.
 She was.
.
.
 she was enjoying this! It's like they were having sex! Julie tried to say something.
 Anything.
 Tried to move, to stand up, to yell.
 But she was paralyzed, unable to even look away from the spectacle in front of her.
 Laura's tongue was working marvels.
 Allison's nipple soon grew to impressive size.
 Gently, her hand rose, soft fingers cradling and fondling her mother's breast as her lips continued to rub over the hot skin.
 Then, Laura's fingers squeezed the tender flesh, and Julie saw a stream of creamy liquid squirt out of her mother's nipple and into Laura's open mouth.
 Both women shuddered and moaned.
 Allison's hand seemed to press Laura's head close.
 That's it, dear.
 Suck it.
 Suck the milk out of mommy's breast.
 Laura's answer was a mumble, as her mouth glued itself to Allison's tit.
 Julie could see streams of milk dripping from the corners of Laura's mouth, and the rise and fall of her Adam's apple as she drank the white liquid.
 Julie's head was spinning.
 Her mouth had dried up in an instant.
 She was feeling the dark tendrils of panic as she tried to fight the force holding her in place.
 But something else was happening.
 She felt her own pussy moisten.
 She was.
.
.
 becoming aroused!! By this.
.
.
 spectacle! Guilt, disgust, curiosity, lust--all fought for control of her mind.
 Even as Laura opened her eyes, as Allison relaxed her grip, as the young girl licked streams of milk flowing from the nipple, trailing over the warm drops running down the lower curve of the breast, Julie felt herself loosing the battle.
 Both women were looking at her, Laura was licking her lips, a look of satisfaction on her face, her mother winking suggestively at her.
 You can have some too if you want, Julie.
 she said, as her hand rose to the fold of her gown and exposed the other tit.
 Julie's eyes focused on the nipple, and dizziness overtook her.
 She blinked.
 Her mother was bringing a second helping of toast.
 Laura was reading the morning paper.
 Everyone was dressed and proper.
 Julie shook her head, once, twice.
 Her heart was still pounding--hallucinations? What's happening to me? Her eyes narrowed to a pint of milk, on the table, next to Laura's half-empty glass.
 Laura and Allison seemed to notice her sudden shaken demeanor.
 You all right sis? Laura asked.
 You seem a little shaken up.
 Julie stammered, grabbing her notes and shoving them in a ruffled pile.
 No.
.
.
 no it's nothing.
 Listen.
.
.
 I'm.
.
.
 I'm late.
 Gotta get to school.
 I'll see you guys later, okay? Both Laura and Allison, seemingly oblivious to the whole situation, nodded and said good-bye.
 As Julie left the kitchen on her way to the front door, finally convinced that this had been an hallucination, her eyes caught something that drove a cold shiver down her spine.
 A small, dark stain on her mother's nightgown.
 Right where her nipple was.
 As if a few drops of liquid had squeezed out of it.
 8 - Beautiful Dreams Julie wondered if she should see a doctor.
 On several occasions, she made for the school counselor's office, or a shrink clinic not too far from her residence, but each time found that she had turned around before she could even get near the place.
 She tried confiding in Andrea, her best friend, and was also unsuccessful.
 Not that she wanted to go through a complete confession--god, how could she live with the embarrassment!--but even the mention of the most minute of details was impossible.
 She wasn't entirely sure this was involuntary.
 Coming back home everyday was starting to bother her.
 Part of her was afraid.
 She wondered if the hallucinations would worsen.
 To her surprise, they subsided.
 Her mother and sister were suddenly coming together, as if worried about her well being.
 She knew how bad she must have looked following the incident at breakfast.
 Maybe they thought she was sick.
 Though waking hallucinations disappeared, she began having trouble sleeping.
 She would wake in the middle of the night, sweaty and breathless, looking around in the darkness, the glimpse of shadows hanging on the edge of her mind.
 She did not recall her dreams.
 Candles everywhere.
 Soft yellow light.
 Beautiful.
 Julie stood inside her bedroom, holding a gentle flame.
 She wore a long semi-transparent silk gown.
 She could feel her naked skin rubbing against it.
 She was at peace with herself.
 She heard sounds.
 Voices.
 Calling to her.
 She felt as if she was dreaming.
 Maybe she was.
 She turned, slowly.
 Everything was moving so slowly.
 She walked, her feet brushing the floor silently.
 Hundred of doors.
 Miles of corridors--but the voices told her where to go.
 Gusts of wind, hot, cold, brushed passed her, but the glow of thousands of candles around her did not waver.
 The light barely shone upon the dark stone walls and floors, but enough light shone for her to see ahead.
 It was as if she was in the heart of a medieval castle, moving steadily inside a labyrinth of gray walls.
 She came to the room.
 She saw the bed.
 A huge, wooden antique, reminiscent of the Victorian period.
 Allison was on all four, her face at the head of the bed, her ass sticking out upwards, her legs parted doggie style.
 Her skin glowed in the ambient light.
 Laura was kneeling behind her, also on the bed, her face buried in her mother's snatch.
 Her tongue darted slowly, parting the lips of Allison's pussy, flicking over her anus, leaving smears of hot saliva dripping all over her mother's hot flesh.
 Both women stopped they sapphic communion, staring at the intruder with warm and loving expressions.
 Julie felt like she belonged here.
 Her inner being did not seem to object to this sight at all.
 A tiny.
.
.
 tiny voice squealed in the back of her head, but she could not hear what it said.
 She figured it might be protesting, telling her that all this was wrong, that she had to leave at once.
 But the look in Laura, in her mother's eyes.
.
.
 the look did not lie.
 They loved her.
 Truly.
 They had never had a chance to show her how much.
 But now was the time to know love.
 True love.
 She approached her sister and mother as they continued in their lovemaking.
 Julie felt this warmth everywhere around her.
 Gusts of soft wind climbed inside her gown, caressing her skin.
 She lowered her head, holding the candle close, chasing away the shadows, revealing the majesty of her mother's aroused cunt.
 Laura looked at her, smiling a secret smile, before returning to the object of her affections.
 Julie noted how careful Laura was to proceed slowly, making sure her older sister had a good view of what she did.
 How slowly and softly her tongue resumed it's exploration, how her lips danced over the warm flesh, dripping with Allison's love juices.
 Julie heard her mother's sounds of approbation, and felt her own body begin to glow with it's own energy.
 The wetness between her legs increasing.
 Her bosom seemed to expand, her nipples hardening, almost painfully.
 Her legs began to shake.
 She was hungry for a taste.
 A forbidden taste? No--she banished the thoughts in a final act of will.
 Her mouth watered as Laura continued to suck their mother's wet cunt, slurping the glorious elixir that oozed out.
 Laura's head receded slightly, and she looked into Julie's eyes.
 Her lips never moving, she still heard her voice--go ahead, taste her-- and Allison's voice, echoing from inside her mind--yessss, taste meeeee--Julie obeyed willingly.
 Her finger rose slowly, and rested on the outer lips of Allison's cunt.
 Julie eye's narrowed on the finger, on the wetness around it, beginning to drip onto the index.
 Slowly, she pushed forward, parting the labia, inserting the finger right to the knuckle, into the moist and hot pussy.
 A pussy she had emerged from, all those years ago, she reminded herself.
 The place where she saw life--a place where she belonged.
 Girlcum flowed from Allison's slit as Julie buried her finger deep inside.
 She felt the cunt muscles tighten around her digit, and her mother's voice echoed once more in her mind--ooooh yesss Julie.
.
.
 yesssss! She had given her mother the gift of pure pleasure with a simple touch.
.
.
 Julie's mind was reeling, feeling the waves crashing inside Allison's body.
 She withdrew her index, coated in love fluids, and brought it to her mouth.
 The taste exploded inside her mouth.
 She reeled, shaking, feeling the beginnings of a transformation taking place--but not quite consuming her yet.
 She felt Laura's hands around her body, taking her in her arms as she trembled, kissing her on the lips, letting her taste her mother on her own lips, then letting her saliva drip into her older sister's mouth, letting her enjoy the new sensations.
.
.
 A change was taking place.
 Julie wasn't sure how or why, but she didn't question it.
 She dreamt every night, and began to recall some of them.
 Things were different.
 Her mother and sister began touching her.
 And each other.
 At suppertime.
 In the living room.
 In the shower.
 Briefly at first, but more audaciously as time went on.
 Kissing her mother and sister on the cheek was a regular happening, but soon, she was kissing them on the lips before going to school.
 One morning, Laura slipped her the tongue, and she responded with equal daring and fervor.
 Allison had to remind Julie she'd be late in order to stop them from continuing to explore each other's mouths.
 Julie took to the habit of wearing less and less around the house.
 It seemed like the natural thing to do.
 She felt--though she had been in no way told as such--that her sister and mother approved.
 She wore tight T-shits and a pair of panties.
 Eventually, she discarded the panties but keeping the shirt, moving about and showing off her nice round ass and beautiful pussy.
 Ever so often, Laura or Allison would stare, and she would let them.
 Her heart raced if they came close, cupping her ass cheeks slowly, letting their hands run all over her rear.
 She wanted Laura and her mother to touch her in any way they liked.
 Why not? They loved her, and she loved them.
 Her mind was totally devoid of any adverse reaction towards the recent changes.
 In her more lucid moments, she would puzzle slightly over her own reaction--as if remembering a time when she would have objected, wondering if something had happened to her to change her mind towards sapphic incidents between her mother, sister and herself.
 She really couldn't see anything wrong with that now.
 In fact she was really beginning to enjoy it.
 Seeing naked female flesh around her proved arousing.
 She would sit on the toilet in the morning and let Laura or her mother in to take a shower, staying to enjoy the sigh of another woman soaping up, hot water flowing over her pale skin.
 Sometimes, Laura and Allison showered together.
 It was a strange understanding--Julie simply wanted to watch, and they were only too happy to oblige her.
 The soft voices in her head continued.
 She obeyed willingly.
 Something had happened to Laura and Allison.
 Something was happening to her.
 But she didn't mind.
 The voices told her to forget about it.
 It didn't matter.
 It was for the best.
 Julie trusted the voices.
 Her body was changing.
 Becoming fuller, rounder, more sensitive.
 She admired herself in the mirror, noticed how sexy she was becoming.
 She masturbated frequently.
 She could sometimes see Laura and Allison peeking through the door, looking at her as she lay on her bed, legs spread, her fingers slowly stroking her slit.
 She like to have them both watch her.
 She knew they enjoyed it too.
 One night, Allison came to Julie, alone, her eyes shining with that strange light Julie had seen so many times.
 The light that had told her things--it was to be obeyed without question.
 Allison unfastened a few buttons, letting her shirt fall to the floor, her large breasts bouncing free.
 Julie knew what she had to do.
 A sudden hesitation gripped her, but only for a moment.
 She somehow felt she was being led to this; Laura and Allison.
.
 seducing her somehow.
 All those dreams, those images.
 Strange, imaginary experiences that still felt so real.
 Was she manipulated? Controlled? Altered? Were the dreams a reflection of reality, her mother and sister luring her, in a state of dream-sleep, to the site of incestuous lesbian lovemaking? Julie was a smart girl, and in the deeper recesses of her mind, as the last barriers of resistance were broken, the truth came to her.
 Laura and Allison had seduced her, controlling her reactions, slowly modifying her psyche, making subtle alterations as they consummated their love for each other, sometimes giving Julie a taste of their bodily fluids--altering her.
.
.
 turning her into a slave and lover, a willing participant in their sapphic triangle.
 She realized the truth.
 And did not care.
 Rather.
.
.
 She embraced it.
 She felt her mother's hands move onto her shoulders.
 She smelled her sweet scent, felt the hot skin caress her cheeks as she was guided to her mother's bosom.
 Julie stared, eyes half-closed, to the beautiful, erotic sight of her mother's tits, hanging inches away from her face.
 Allison guided her, ever so gently, caressing her tenderly, as Julie's lips brushed against the skin, running up the curve of the large, beautifully shaped breast.
 She could feel how heavy the it had become--how full it was.
 Julie parted her lips slightly, letting her tongue out, licking her mother's tit hesitantly.
 Then with more assurance.
 Allison's words echoed into her mind softly.
 That's it Julie.
 Drink.
 Drink deep.
 You're mine.
.
.
 Laura's.
 She's waiting for you.
 And together, we'll worship her.
 A warm liquid gushed inside Julie's mouth as her lips surrounded the nipple, and began to suck.
 Julie drank it, feeling her own head swoon as sensations poured into her brain.
 She wanted to obey her mother and sister.
 The warm milk was coursing inside her like wildfire, changing her.
 The transformation, begun weeks earlier, would now enter it's final phase.
 9 - The Christening They entered Allison's bedroom together.
 Laura was lying on the large bed, fingering herself slowly.
 She smiled as she saw her mother and Julie enter.
 She kneeled up, hands raising to meet Allison's embrace.
 They French-kissed as only the most intimate of lovers did.
 Julie stood at the edge of the bed, her eyes lost in a trance.
 Allison and Laura stared at each other, a mischievous smile on their lips.
 Their conversation was without words.
 Laura: She is now ready? Allison: Yes.
 As you commanded.
 Her will is ours, now and forever.
 She shuddered, pleasure coursing up her spine, the erotic sensation of breast-feeding her own daughter and destroying the last of her will still fresh in her mind.
 You were right to proceed as such, Laura.
 Our plans will have to be implemented in such a subtle fashion.
 Allison gazed at the immobile, naked form of Julie, her pussy moistening in anticipation.
 Womankind was to be seduced.
 Some, like Laura, Allison--and eventually Julie--would rise as rulers.
 As for the rest of womankind, proper adjustment was in order.
 The last month had been crucial for Allison and Laura.
 Their subtle modifications to Julie's psyche had proven very effective indeed--despite being headstrong and feisty, Julie had never been able to resist Allison or Laura.
 Laura had seduced her mother quickly and effectively, bringing all of her powers to bear.
 In the end, Allison's will was overcome--she had willingly resigned to her fate.
 And she had become one with Laura.
 In Julie's case, Laura had exerted restraint.
 She and Allison had toyed with her, taking a subtle approach, testing the limits and skills of their abilities, warping Julie's mind in gradual steps.
 Though Julie had been semi-conscious of the changes, she had been powerless to prevent them.
 This had been an experiment of sorts.
 Important, and successful.
 Now, Laura pondered, it was time to bring Julie into the fold for good.
 Julie blinked.
 She was laying on the bed.
 She felt hands all over her body.
 It felt good.
 The beautiful face of her younger sister was inches from hers.
 She smiled.
 Julie's head rose up, lips parting.
 Her tongue moved out slowly, exploring Laura's mouth.
 They both moaned softly, the intensity of their feelings for each other expressed in their passionate embrace.
 Laura's hand was fondling one of Julie breasts, her index teasing the nipple, feeling it harden.
 Her sister was ripe for the taking.
 Meanwhile, Allison, at the foot of the bed, was running her hands on the inner thighs of her older daughter.
 Smiling and licking her lips, she saw Julie spreading her legs obediently, giving her full access to her snatch.
 Allison saw Julie's pussy, dripping with girlcum, and moved in.
 She inhaled the sweet aroma, her heart beating fast as she contemplated the glorious task before her.
 Her hands kept massaging Julie's inner thighs, creeping ever so slowly towards the moist slit, teasing her, delighting in the anticipation of lesbian lust.
 She knew Julie was getting more and more exited: the sweet nectar, oozing from her cunt, the groans as her kiss with Laura was becoming more and more aggressive.
.
.
 it all seemed so natural.
 Allison's fingers reached the glistering labia, parting the lips slowly.
 Julie broke off the kiss with Laura and let out a long and pleading moan.
 Her whole body shuddered.
 Allison smiled, and continued, fingering her daughter slowly.
 Cunt juice squirted from her pussy, running down Allison's fingers, as she did so.
 The smell, the sight--all of it overpowered Allison.
 She began to breathe heavily.
 Saliva pooling inside her mouth, she stuck out her tongue, letting a stream of it trickle down on Julie's clit.
 Her eyes narrowed, observing every minute detail.
 She saw the saliva, drenching her daughter's love button, running over the slit, around her buried fingers, mixing in with Julie's cum.
 She finally could not resist it any longer.
 She lowered her head and sampled a taste.
 Soon, her tongue had replaced her fingers, and was ramming deep inside Julie's cunt.
 She slurped all of her girlcum hungrily, some of it running down her pretty face.
 She felt Julie's body gyrate against her mouth, her daughter screaming wildly, her legs around Allison's shoulders, bracing her as she ate her out expertly--as if she had done this for years.
 Laura was busy sucking Julie's breasts.
 The nipples were stiffening painfully inside her mouth.
 Julie was in heaven, her mother eating her out while her younger sister was gently sucking, biting and licking her large breasts.
 Laura would fondle the flesh with her free hands, and suddenly open her mouth wide, taking as much titflesh into her mouth as possible.
 Saliva dripped down the breasts, pooling between Julie's tits, only to be smeared and rubbed back into the hot flesh.
 Laura alternated, going from one tit to the other, sucking them, licking them.
.
.
 Julie's cries became louder and louder.
 There was only so much she could take before going over the edge.
 She squealed, crying out her mother's name and Laura's.
 It was the most powerful orgasm of her life, so much more that anything she had ever managed with her boyfriends.
.
.
 it was like a galaxy of supernovas exploding simultaneously.
 Wave after wave crashed into her, smashing her body and mind.
 Allison's face, drenched in her secretions came to Laura's.
 Then, lowered to Julie's.
 She caught the drips of her own cum, licking them off her mother's chin before kissing her full on the mouth, tasting herself again as her tongue rubbed against her lovers'.
 The next few hours were spent in torrid lovemaking.
 Laura was an active participant most of the time, but preferred servicing Julie and Allison rather than being the object of their affections.
 She wanted them both to really enjoy themselves.
 She was very turned on by what she had managed: taking her mother and sister and turning them into incestuous sex-crazed lesbians.
 She would be off to a side, masturbating, while Allison and Julie would finger each other off, lick each other's pussies, and probe each other's assholes.
 Allison's bedroom, soon to become the only bedroom of the house, was permeated with the scent of aroused females making love to each other.
 Julie enjoyed being submissive.
 She responded to commands from her mother with a surprising degree of resignation; she also had a thing for being finger fucked and sucked from behind--probably because she enjoyed being on her hands and knees.
 Laura had no doubt that Julie would make and excellent seductress, controlling the minds of other women and turning them into lesbian sluts, but her submissive streak towards she and Allison excited her greatly.
 She stood up and made for the bed, where Julie lay, ass cheeks up in the air, her face buried into a pillow, screaming as Allison was fingering her to yet another orgasm.
 The mother shifted hands, bringing her wet fingers to Laura's mouth while her other hands brought Julie to a shattering climax.
 Laura fondled Julie's buttocks as she trembled, the orgasmic energies rising and falling inside her.
 Time for you to join my flock, sis.
 Allison smiled as Julie's head turned.
 She was still panting, but was suddenly instilled with a new energy, anxious to please Laura as she joined her and her mother.
 Allison sat back on the bed, her left hand migrating to her own pussy while the right began playing with her nipples.
 Julie slid off the mattress and covers, kneeling in front of Laura.
 The older girl bowed her head, as her sister stood over her, hands to her hips, in full charge of the situation.
 Mom has joined me, Julie.
 She resisted at first, but she's mine now.
 Laura enjoyed being in control.
 It aroused her immensely.
 Allison, sitting on the sidelines, was looking at her with lust in her eyes and fingers buried in her pussy, acknowledging her daughter's mastery over her.
 What about you, Julie? Do you want to join me? Laura's words echoed in Julie's mind.
 Her heart was beating hard in her chest.
 Love and lust was pouring from every pore in her body.
 She wanted to be with Laura so badly.
 She wanted to prove herself.
 To be at her side forever.
 On her knees, at her feet.
 Forever.
 She began kissing Laura's toes, letting her tongue dart over them slowly.
 Showing her submission and acceptance of Laura's will over her own through a display of sexual affection.
 She heard the command to lift her head, and stared into her master's eyes.
 Julie is dead.
 Gone.
 You are mine now.
 To do as I please.
 Mom won't object--her desires are mine.
 Laura's voice was soft, gentle, a breeze inside her head.
 Henceforward, you will be known as Julia.
 The giving of another name, as minor a variance as it was, served a ceremonial and symbolic purpose: the consecration of Laura's supremacy, and a reminder that she had molded her sister's new identity.
 Laura was still Julia's sister, but she was also a person she could now love in a new, deeper, more honest way.
 She was her mistress, her lover.
.
.
 She was her life.
 Allison had already made that transition.
 Womankind would soon follow.
 A thin streak of urine ebbed from Laura's pussy, cascading down her thigh.
 Julia tongue ran over it slowly, licking it up, cleansing her sister and mistress.
 She lapped up all of the yellow moisture, happy to be pleasing Laura.
 She could feel the aura of ceremony around this simple gesture.
 How performing such an act sealed the love between the two young girls forever.
 Laura gazed upon her kneeling slave with reverence, lust, and love.
 She was so happy to confer this new life upon her sister.
 Julia would become as she.
 Her muscles relaxed, a long stream of hot piss squirting out of her pussy, cascading down Julia's waiting and eager face.
 Julia moaned, feeling the steamy liquid dripping down her cheeks, her tongue darting out to taste it.
 She was being baptized by Laura, and felt sudden heat raging inside her own pussy as she was stripped of all inhibitions, submitting to an act she once would have considered depraved and disgusting.
 That only seemed to excite her even more.
 She begged.
 Please, Laura.
.
.
 mistress.
.
 give me more.
.
.
 allow me to taste of you.
.
.
 drench me in your piss.
.
.
 cleanse away Julie.
.
.
 so that only Julia.
.
.
 your willing servant and slave.
.
.
 remains.
 Both Laura and Julia heard Allison moaning from the bed, four fingers slipping in and out of her twat, a sharp and intense orgasm raging through her.
 Laura gazed at her kneeling sister, her mouth open, her pink tongue smeared in piss.
 Her eyes looked up, pleading for more and Laura saw how completely entranced Julia had become.
 A warm glow spread through her body, the sheer erotic nature of her actions bringing her close to the point of no return.
 Whispering sweet nothings inside Julia's mind, urine continued to flow from her hot cunt into her sister's mouth.
 Julia pursed her lips together, catching most of the golden liquid in her mouth, while letting some of it spill down her chin and the corners of her mouth.
 It cascaded down her neck, breasts and belly.
 She moved her head down sharply, closing her eyes as she did so, letting urine soak her forehead, cheeks and face.
 Laura felt her bladder emptying.
 The flow of piss dwindled to a halt.
 She stared at Julia's beautiful, urine-soaked face, streaks of yellow, dribbling down her skin.
.
.
 a look of pure bliss on her face.
 Laura felt the heat in her pussy spreading inside her.
 Then, Julia parted her lips, revealing a pool of urine inside her open mouth.
 Her head thrown back, she locked eyes with Laura, letting her see her slave in urine-drenched splendor.
 Laura saw her kneeling sister beginning to shake, saw her Adam's apple moving up, saw the pool of urine receding, cascading down Julia's throat.
 The sigh of her sister swallowing her hot piss was too much.
 Laura fell to her knees, joining her sister, a fierce inferno erupting inside her, turning her pussy in a furnace that sent heat-waves of pleasure in her insides.
 As she tried to get a sense of where she was, the pleasure she had experienced having momentarily blotted out all of her senses, she felt Julia's lips on her own.
 She could taste the bitter, salty, divine fluids on her sister's lips.
 Even as they kissed passionately, they hands running over their bodies, Laura spoke softly to Julia.
 Bury your beautiful face between Allison's legs, my dear Julia.
 She is soon to become Alicia--we must prepare her for the honor, yes? Both sisters giggled.
 Soon, womankind would be theirs.
 10 - Epilogue - Feminas Sapiens Five thousand years later.
 The Starship Amelia dropped out of Warp in the Mautaran sector, near navpoint Alpha-9.
 A transport had recently logged a strange set of scan-signatures while passing through.
 Galactic central had ordered investigation.
 Captain Shayla came to the bridge.
 She greeted the officers there with her usual grace and enthusiasm, playfully biting the lower lip of the new ensign as she kissed her--she found her particularly cute.
 I'll have to get her back to my quarters some time this week, Shayla thought.
 She was sure Nina, her personal secretary, would be happy to share ensign Coranna's pussy with the Captain.
 Report on the Object Shayla demanded.
 She rarely relied on normal speech when on duty, the use of telepathy carrying a notion functionality and professionalism--a way to remind her crew that they had a mission to fulfill.
 The familiar tone of Science Officer Felecia's thoughts echoed inside Shayla's mind.
 Object appears to be an artificial construct of some kind.
 Approximate weight: 255.
7 kilograms.
 No power signature detected.
 The captain saw her officer's hands move across her 3D holographic control board, activating the ship's visual functions.
 Long-range sensors came on line and an image of the object appeared in the middle of the bridge.
 This thing had floated in space for a long time--that much was evident by the micro-meteor damage.
 Shayla's curiosity was aroused.
 This was obviously sub-light tech--very primitive.
 Who had send it on it's way? Where was it headed? Shayla turned to Navigator Jahnisse.
 Calculate course of the object.
 I'd like to know destination, as well as it's point of origin.
 The woman, a beautiful blonde who had shared the Captain's bed many times, mentally interfaced with the computer core, coming back with the answer in seconds.
 Object is not set for any specific destination Captain--I can't compute anything but system fly-bys.
 It should come within 6.
38 light-years of Proxima Centauri in approximately 21 135 years.
 She paused, as if pondering a grave problem.
 Shayla noted her sudden hesitation, and rose from her seat, walking over to her station.
 Putting a gentle hand on her shoulder, she smiled warmly.
 She thought of the wonderful moments they had shared together.
 Jahnisse was quite charming and intelligent.
 Perhaps, if things worked out well, she would agree to having a daughter with her.
 Chastising herself for letting her thoughts wander while on duty, Shayla looked straight into Jahnisse's eyes.
 What is it? What's wrong? The navigator answered: I've calculated Point-of-origin three times, coming up with the same answer every time.
 It's.
.
.
 Sol Captain.
 Earth had launched this? The entire bridge crew stared at her, incredulously.
 Shayla's gaze returned to the image suspended in the middle of the deck.
 Jahnisse's mental voice added: It's current speed, if constant, puts it's launch date as far back as five thousand years, give or take a decade or two.
 Every mind on the bridge formed the same thought simultaneously.
 Right before Ascension.
 The dawn of Womankind history.
 Shayla felt excitement.
 They had very little information about periods before the Age of Ascension.
 Historians debated as to what was legend and what was truth.
 Perhaps this object held answers to some of these questions.
 Match course and speed with the object.
 Advise me when you have it on board, the Captain ordered.
 Ship's Psychiatrist Keisha came to Captain Shayla's quarters.
 She was greeted at the door by Ensign Coranna, already on her way out.
 Keisha kissed her lightly, reminding her that she still hadn't interviewed her for her psych-profile review since she came on board a month ago.
 Coranna promised to stop by the doctor's quarters later, winking and squeezing one of Keisha's soft breasts through the thin fabric of her regulation uniform.
 Off-duty fraternization was not an affair limited by rank.
 Good thing too.
 The doctor waltzed inside Shayla's quarters, peering through the semi-darkness.
 The smell of sex was in the air, and Keisha found it exciting.
 She saw the Captain and Navigator come through the shower-cabin, water running off their soft skin.
 They sat together, arms intertwined, smiling up at Keisha.
 What's the good news? asked the doctor.
 Privately, she thought it was as obvious as a Red-giant.
 Being one of very few crewmembers with access to every officer profile, she knew Shayla and Jahnisse were an ideal couple for a long-term relationship.
 It had only been a matter of time before they discovered true love in each other.
 Shayla spoke to her secretary, who brought flutes filled with champagne.
 We'll be having a daughter she announced, glowing with joy.
 Jahnisse held her close, lips brushing her lover's naked shoulder delicately.
 Keisha rose and embraced both women, congratulating them with as much decorum as she could muster.
 She wondered if one of the women had already induced conception, but remembered Amelia was due for refit at the Iria IV shipyards.
 Shayla and Jahnisse both had more than enough accumulated leave saved up--and would surely wait before one of them willed herself pregnant.
.
.
 with blissful help the other, of course.
 I wonder who will be the mother, Keisha thought to herself.
 She had always marveled at the beauty of woman's reproductive system.
 Prehistoric legends told of unwanted pregnancies--how was that even possible? How could a woman have a child if another woman was not in her arms, loving her and making it possible for the appropriate physiological reactions to take place--thus bridging another woman into the world? Some of the more ridiculous legends told of women giving birth to demons and monstrosities half of the time.
 Preposterous.
 Still, the discovery of the ancient object was raising a number of questions--sparking debates as to what was legend, and what was fact.
 Stories and rumors were exchanged.
 Many wondered if the object would bring answers.
 As Keisha sipped her champagne, her neck and shoulders stroked by the Nina's divine hands while she sat on the sofa, she spoke of this--and of ship's business--with the captain.
 She was considered the ship's historical expert, having taken many classes at Galactic Central Academy.
 Unfortunately, prehistoric history was not a very popular field--she knew next to nothing of the period.
 She'd be writing the preliminary report, a daunting task indeed, but Captain Shayla reassured her, speaking of her faith in her ability to handle the task.
 The thoughts of the duty Navigator echoed from the bridge.
 We are about to take the object into Cargo Bay 2, Captain.
 Shayla acknowledged at once.
 Mentally scanning the ship, she found Science Officer in the Officer's Lounge.
 Report to Cargo Bay 2, she ordered.
 I'll join you shortly.
 She kissed Jahnisse, taking her time.
 Then, grabbing her uniform and quickly putting it on, she left with Keisha, heading for the lower decks.
 The object floated inside a null-grav field.
 Felicia, Shayla and Keisha stared at it, the Science Officer scanning closely with her pocket computer.
 A large, dish shaped contraption sat on top of a smaller, roughly circular body, containing a number of primitive electronic instruments.
 Three booms jutted out of the body, each with some sort of device mounted on the end.
 .
It soon became evident that this object had been a probe of sorts, probably used to chart and explore Earth's solar system, relaying information back through radio transmissions.
 Shayla had a hard time picturing the use of such rudimentary technology.
 Womankind had long since moved out of the Sol system, exploring the rest of the universe.
 The Galactic Union was constituted of thousands of worlds, all populated by women, since no Intelligent alien life had been discovered.
 The though of a sublight probe, taking years to meander from planet to planet.
.
.
 it was such a primitive, archaic way to conduct exploration.
 Keisha pointed to a golden-like plaque, bolted on the body of the probe.
 Tracing an intricate pattern in the air, she ordered the Cargo Bay computer to shift the grav-field, rotating and lowering the object so they could have a closer look.
 A protective covering was removed, and they saw the engravings.
 There were no written words on the plaque--the builders of the probe had sent it spiraling in intergalactic space, probably hoping to contact alien intelligences; language would not be of any help in establishing communication.
 The three women saw a recognizable diagram of Earth's solar system at the bottom.
 The star-shaped design on the left was probably a chart of sorts, indicating Earth's position relative to several astronomical markings--Pulsars or Quasars, no doubt.
 But the truly puzzling image was a pair of figures on the right, with a representation of the probe in the background.
 The very recognizable drawing of a woman stood on the far right.
 Something else stood on her left, with it's arm raised.
 Keisha spoke for all of them as her thoughts echoed around her.
 What the hell is that, and what's it got between it's legs?
